MINOT, N.D. — Charlie's Main Street Cafe in the heart of downtown here is a monument to small-town Americana.The menu offers down-home favorites: eggs and bacon, chicken fried steak and mashed potatoes, chicken noodle soup, vanilla ice cream and, yes, apple pie. Polished timber panels provide a log-cabin atmosphere. Framed black-and-white photos from generations past adorn the walls: carriage-style cars cruising down Main Street, baseball players in stirrups and knickers, President Dwight D. Eisenhower in a black top hat shaking a man's hand.It is a gathering place for local leaders, and for residents to catch up on gossip.This could well be a haunt on any idyllic American street corner. But Charlie's is a bit different.The purveyor at this landmark of deeply American culture in a town that is more than 97 percent American-born happens to be a South Korean immigrant who traces her earliest awareness of the United States to a story her mom told her when she was in elementary school in Seoul, about a place that boasted of 31 flavors of ice cream.When Geewon Anderson, 48, bought Charlie's in May, she not only embraced the tradition the cafe represented, she also worked to bolster it.She overhauled the dirty and dilapidated interior and then decorated the walls with old pictures of Minot and its people that she found online. Her husband, Joel, a Minnesota native, carved an image of an American Indian and a buffalo out of bloodwood and hung it behind the cash register. She washed an old blue-and-white sign posted behind the building that read "Charlie's Fine Food" and hung it inside the restaurant.Most important, perhaps, she left the menu alone."Meat and potatoes," she said. "That is a tradition of the Middle West. I want them to carry on. I don't want to come here and disturb their tradition. I don't want to modify it. I want to enhance it."She added, "I want my customers to feel this restaurant is theirs."Ms. Anderson moved to Anchorage in 1991 with her husband, whom she met while he worked in Seoul as a computer engineering contractor for the United States military. She built a career as a mortgage originator in Anchorage. She also worked as a translator and was involved in civic activities. She counts a red BMW convertible among the fruits of her hard work.Though she had no ties to North Dakota before hearing about Charlie's, her latest venture, it was the unlikely vehicle she chose to provide her family with a shot at the American dream.Just six months ago, her mother, two sisters and brother-in-law had not even heard of sunny-side ups, ranch dressing or tomato sauce. They moved here from South Korea in June to help run the restaurant. Her brother-in-law, Sung Chun Lee, a 56-year-old retired banker, has taken to American favorites like hamburgers and is now one of the cooks. This Thanksgiving, he helped prepare a turkey dinner that the restaurant served."I am becoming more and more American," he said.Ms. Anderson is helping open a franchise of CherryBerry Yogurt Bar in the mall here that her younger sister will run. Once her family becomes comfortable operating the businesses here on their own, Ms. Anderson hopes to return to Anchorage.Other family restaurants in Minot have come and gone, but Charlie's has endured. Though residents were uncertain about the date it was established, it has been around at least since World War II, when it was called the Victory Cafe. It became Charlie's in 1957, when Charlie DeMakis, a Greek immigrant, bought it, according to his son, Greg, who runs a bowling alley and lounge in town.Charlie once cooked a meal for President Eisenhower when he came to Minot for the dedication of the Garrison Dam in the early 1950s, Greg DeMakis said. The restaurant has always specialized in home-style cooking, though Charlie did occasionally cater special meals for groups, Greg said."It was the meeting place in Minot in those days," he said.Charlie DeMakis sold the place because of failing health, and ownership changed hands several times before Ms. Anderson and a friend from South Korea bought the building that houses the restaurant and 11 apartments this year for $390,000. Ms. Anderson first visited Minot (which she once pronounced MEE-not, before residents corrected her, saying, MY-not) last January after friends in Alaska told her about the economic opportunities that had resulted from the oil boom in western North Dakota.
SPRINGFIELD, Ill. — If ever there was a moment when Illinois's drastically underfinanced pension systems had a real shot at being repaired, some state leaders thought it would be this week.Nearly everyone in this Democrat-controlled Capitol agreed that the circumstances had reached the point of crisis. More than 30 departing lawmakers were preparing to give up their seats on Wednesday, so worries about political futures could, for now, be tossed aside.And several proposals, including one requiring higher contributions from state workers and teachers and limiting cost-of-living increases, were on the table.But as the lame-duck legislative session drew to a close on Tuesday evening, there was no deal. Lawmakers began talking optimistically about how they would keep searching for a fix to the nation's most underfinanced state public pension system during a new session in the months ahead. And the shortfall in the state's pension systems, now about $96 billion, will keep right on mounting at a rate, according to an estimate by Gov. Pat Quinn, of $17 million a day.For months, Mr. Quinn and others had held up this weeklong stretch — before new lawmakers are sworn in — as a make-or-break moment. "We have to be bold," Mr. Quinn, a Democrat, said Tuesday morning. He urged lawmakers not to allow the state's economy "to be held hostage by political timidity" and called a pension overhaul the "challenge of our time."As late as Tuesday afternoon, Mr. Quinn was bringing forth a new proposal, one critics mocked as a "desperate Hail Mary pass."In the end, the failure to overhaul the system, at least for now, was more proof of the tangled nature and expansive size of the problem in a place with a political history like Illinois's. In this state, any fix pits a legislature dominated by Democrats against the wishes of labor unions, long seen as strong supporters of the Democrats. And the State Constitution includes a provision that has stirred endless debate over how much Illinois can change a public sector worker's pension in the first place. It bars pension benefits from being "diminished or impaired.""Some compromises were made, but apparently not enough to pass a bill," said Steve Brown, a spokesman for Michael J. Madigan, a Democrat and the longtime speaker of the Illinois House. "It's another way of demonstrating just how contentious this issue is."For a session that had once been seen as a politically opportune moment to take on all sorts of difficult issues, including pensions, same-sex marriage and gambling expansion, many issues were ultimately put aside.But state lawmakers did approve a contentious measure allowing illegal immigrants to get temporary driver's licenses, clearing the way, experts said, for Illinois to become the fourth state, and the most populous, to allow them to drive legally.The measure, which Mr. Quinn has said he would sign, will allow an estimated 250,000 illegal immigrants statewide to apply for the licenses, which will be valid for three years.The measure was approved after tense debate on Tuesday in the State House, where opponents said it could lead to fraud and supporters said it would ensure that illegal immigrants took road and vision tests and bought insurance.Groups and advocates for immigrants, including Mayor Rahm Emanuel of Chicago, cheered the decision on driver's licenses. New Mexico, Utah and Washington State already have similar provisions, according to the National Conference of State Legislatures.While some states are now wrestling with whether to give driver's licenses to immigrants who qualify for a new Obama administration program granting some illegal immigrants a temporary reprieve from deportation, Illinois's new provision will be broader, reaching beyond those who may qualify for the federal program.Illegal immigrants who had been living in the state for at least a year would be eligible. Social Security numbers would not be required, though other proof of residence — like a lease — would be needed. The licenses, which could be renewed after three years, could not be used for purposes other than driving, including buying guns or boarding airplanes.On the pension question, plenty of proposals had floated around the Capitol in recent days, including one that would have required higher payments from workers and would have frozen cost-of-living increases for six years. Another, passed last year by the State Senate, would have given workers a choice of sorts between state health care and retirement benefits. And another — proposed by Governor Quinn in the final hours of the session — would have created a commission to remake the pension systems. That notion made it through a committee vote, but no further.As lawmakers here began heading home, John J. Cullerton, a Democrat and the president of the Senate, said, "We have to start up again — literally tomorrow."
PHOENIX — Immigration agents arrested the mother and brother of a prominent activist during a raid at her home here late Thursday, unleashing a vigorous response on social media and focusing new attention on one of the most controversial aspects of the Obama administration's policies on deportation.The agents knocked on Erika Andiola's door shortly after 9 p.m., asking for her mother, Maria Arreola.Ms. Arreola had been stopped by the police in nearby Mesa last year and detained for driving without a license. Her fingerprints were sent to federal immigration officials as part of a controversial program called Secure Communities, which the Obama administration has been trying to expand nationwide.That routine check revealed that Ms. Arreola had been returned to Mexico in 1998 after she was caught trying to illegally cross the border into Arizona with Erika and two of her siblings in tow. As a result, she was placed on a priority list for deportation.After being seized on Thursday, she could have been sent back to Mexico in a matter of hours, but Obama administration officials moved quickly to undo the arrests. Officials had been pressured by the robust response from advocates — through phone calls, e-mails and online petitions, but primarily on Twitter, where they mobilized support for Ms. Andiola, a well-known advocate for young illegal immigrants, under the hashtag #WeAreAndiola.The reaction offered the Obama administration a taste of what it might expect when it gets into the thick of the debate over an immigration overhaul, which Congress is expected to tackle this year. President Obama has already been under harsh criticism for the number of foreigners deported since he took office — roughly 400,000 each year, a record unmatched since the 1950s.Ms. Andiola, 25, posted a tearful video on YouTube shortly after her mother and brother were handcuffed and driven away. "I need everybody to stop pretending that nothing is wrong," she said in the video, "stop pretending that we're all just living normal lives, because we're not. This could happen to any of us anytime."She is the co-founder of the Arizona Dream Act Coalition, one of the groups pushing for a reprieve for immigrants brought illegally to the United States as children, as she was. She has been arrested while camped in front of Senator John McCain's office here, protested outside the United States Capitol, and appeared on the cover of Time magazine in June under the headline, "We are Americans — just not legally."In November, Ms. Andiola got a work permit under a program begun by the Obama administration last year that gives certain young illegal immigrants temporary reprieve from deportation. She graduated from Arizona State University in 2009.On Friday afternoon, her mother returned home from a detention center in Florence, 70 miles southeast of Phoenix and usually the last stop for certain illegal immigrants before they are deported. Her brother, Heriberto Andiola Arreola, 36, who had been kept in Phoenix, was let go earlier, at 6 a.m.Their swift releases underline the power of the youth-immigrant movement and their social media activism, which was critical in spreading Ms. Andiola's story overnight.In a statement, Barbara Gonzalez, a spokeswoman for Immigration and Customs Enforcement, said a preliminary review of the case revealed that it contains some of the elements outlined in the agency's "prosecutorial discretion policy" and would "merit an exercise of discretion." Advocates have long argued that the policy has done little to keep families from being broken apart by deportations.Ms. Andiola said in an interview that she told her mother to go to her room before opening the door Thursday night; she suspected the men standing outside worked for immigration. By the time the men came in, her brother, who was outside talking to a neighbor, was already in handcuffs, she said."Where's Maria?" the men asked her, she recalled.Ms. Arreola walked out of the room and, in Spanish, the men asked her to accompany them outside, where they placed her under arrest.Though she and her son are free, their future is uncertain, as they could be arrested again while their cases are under review or deported should the eventual ruling go against them, said Marielena Hincapié, executive director of the National Immigration Law Center, one of the groups helping the family.Stories like this, Ms. Hincapié went on, "happen every day, in every state," outside of the media spotlight. What made it different this time is that Ms. Andiola had connections and wasted no time mobilizing them. There are others, she said, whom "you never hear about."
WASHINGTON — President Obama plans to push Congress to move quickly in the coming months on an ambitious overhaul of the immigration system that would include a path to citizenship for most of the 11 million illegal immigrants in the country, senior administration officials and lawmakers said last week.Mr. Obama and Senate Democrats will propose the changes in one comprehensive bill, the officials said, resisting efforts by some Republicans to break the overhaul into smaller pieces — separately addressing young illegal immigrants, migrant farmworkers or highly skilled foreigners — which might be easier for reluctant members of their party to accept.The president and Democrats will also oppose measures that do not allow immigrants who gain legal status to become American citizens one day, the officials said.Even while Mr. Obama has been focused on fiscal negotiations and gun control, overhauling immigration remains a priority for him this year, White House officials said. Top officials there have been quietly working on a broad proposal. Mr. Obama and lawmakers from both parties believe that the early months of his second term offer the best prospects for passing substantial legislation on the issue.Mr. Obama is expected to lay out his plan in the coming weeks, perhaps in his State of the Union address early next month, administration officials said. The White House will argue that its solution for illegal immigrants is not an amnesty, as many critics insist, because it would include fines, the payment of back taxes and other hurdles for illegal immigrants who would obtain legal status, the officials said.The president's plan would also impose nationwide verification of legal status for all newly hired workers; add visas to relieve backlogs and allow highly skilled immigrants to stay; and create some form of guest-worker program to bring in low-wage immigrants in the future.A bipartisan group of senators has also been meeting to write a comprehensive bill, with the goal of introducing legislation as early as March and holding a vote in the Senate before August. As a sign of the keen interest in starting action on immigration, White House officials and Democratic leaders in the Senate have been negotiating over which of them will first introduce a bill, Senate aides said."This is so important now to both parties that neither the fiscal cliff nor guns will get in the way," said Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York, a Democrat who is a leader of the bipartisan discussions.A similar attempt at bipartisan legislation early in Mr. Obama's first term collapsed amid political divisions fueled by surging public wrath over illegal immigration in many states. But both supporters and opponents say conditions are significantly different now.Memories of the results of the November election are still fresh here. Latinos, the nation's fastest-growing electorate, turned out in record numbers and cast 71 percent of their ballots for Mr. Obama. Many Latinos said they were put off by Republicans' harsh language and policies against illegal immigrants.After the election, a host of Republicans, starting with Speaker John A. Boehner, said it was time for the party to find a more positive, practical approach to immigration. Many party leaders say electoral demographics are compelling them to move beyond policies based only on tough enforcement.Supporters of comprehensive changes say that the elections were nothing less than a mandate in their favor, and that they are still optimistic that Mr. Obama is prepared to lead the fight."Republicans must demonstrate a reasoned approach to start to rebuild their relationship with Latino voters," said Clarissa Martinez de Castro, the director of immigration policy at the National Council of La Raza, a Latino organization. "Democrats must demonstrate they can deliver on a promise."Since the election, Mr. Obama has repeatedly pledged to act on immigration this year. In his weekly radio address on Saturday, he again referred to the urgency of fixing the immigration system, saying it was one of the "difficult missions" the country must take on.Parallel to the White House effort, Mr. Schumer and Senator Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, a Republican, have been meeting with a group of at least four other colleagues to write a bill. Republicans who have participated include John McCain of Arizona, who has supported comprehensive legislation in the past; Jeff Flake, also of Arizona, who is newly elected to the Senate; and Mike Lee of Utah. Senator Marco Rubio of Florida participated in one meeting last month.Democrats in the meetings include Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, the No. 2 Senate Democrat; Robert Menendez of New Jersey and Michael Bennet of Colorado.
As President Obama and Democratic leaders are preparing a major push to overhaul the immigration system, Senator Marco Rubio of Florida is asserting his leadership among Republicans on the volatile issue, previewing a proposal that includes measures to give legal status to millions of illegal immigrants.Mr. Rubio, a Cuban-American in his first term whose star is rising rapidly in his party, has outlined views in recent days that set him apart from many other Republican conservatives, who reject any legalization as a form of amnesty that rewards immigrant lawbreakers. Mr. Rubio said he would not rule out some kind of legal status for immigrants in the United States illegally, although he insists that any measures should not penalize immigrants who have tried to come here through legal channels.Mr. Rubio described his proposals in interviews last week with The Wall Street Journal editorial page and with The New York Times. By Monday he was already gathering support, as Representative Paul D. Ryan of Wisconsin, a conservative who was the Republicans' vice-presidential nominee last year, endorsed Mr. Rubio's ideas.Mr. Rubio laid out three: aside from fair treatment for foreigners who play by the rules, he said, any legislation should also recognize that legal immigration has been a boon to the United States in the past and is "critical to our future." He would also insist on new measures to ensure strict enforcement at the border and within the country."We can't have the kind of vibrant growth we need and the economy we want, based on limited government and free enterprise, if we don't have a legal immigration system that works," Mr. Rubio said. "And in order to have a system that works, we have to deal with those people who are already here illegally."Mr. Ryan, on his Facebook page, wrote that Mr. Rubio was "exactly right on the need to fix our broken immigration system.""I support the principles he's outlined," Mr. Ryan said, "modernization of our immigration laws; stronger security to curb illegal immigration; and respect for the rule of law in addressing the complex challenge of the undocumented population."As one of three Hispanics in the Senate, Mr. Rubio, who won his seat in 2010 with support from the Tea Party, seemed to be trying to set a new tone for his party to discuss immigration. Many Republican leaders have been reconsidering the party's stance on the issue since the November election, when Latinos, the electorate's fastest-growing group, overwhelmingly supported Mr. Obama.Strikingly, Mr. Rubio's principles did not sound that different from proposals for an immigration overhaul by Mr. Obama, Democratic leaders and a handful of other Republicans. Aside from work under way at the White House on legislation, a bipartisan group of Senators has been meeting to draft a bill.Where Mr. Rubio differed significantly with Democrats was on the legal pathway illegal immigrants would follow, with him proposing a long and indirect course before some of those immigrants could apply to become American citizens.In a telephone interview, Mr. Rubio said a starting point for his plan was recognizing that the current immigration system was "burdensome, bureaucratic, difficult to navigate and sometimes it just doesn't work."Mr. Rubio said he would seek to reorient the visa system to bring in more educated immigrants with skills in technology and science. As for the estimated 11 million illegal immigrants in the country, Mr. Rubio said, "We have to understand these folks are here to stay." He added that most of them had not committed serious or violent crimes."The right way to deal with them is not amnesty," Mr. Rubio said, "and it is not a special pathway to citizenship." Instead, he said, he would offer a provisional legal status to immigrants who passed criminal background checks, paid fines and passed English and civics tests.But, he said, "ultimately it's not good for our country to have people permanently trapped in that status where they can't become citizens." After a certain period, he said, immigrants would be allowed to apply through the existing system to become legal permanent residents, a status that would eventually allow them to become citizens.The current system is clogged with huge backlogs, with some immigrants waiting as long as two decades to receive visas. Mr. Rubio said that potentially large flaw in his plan would be worked out in negotiations.Although Mr. Rubio said it would be better for Congress to take up the complex issues in separate pieces of legislation, he said he would not insist on that.Mr. Rubio said he would offer a faster track to citizenship for young undocumented immigrants who came here as children. Members of Mr. Rubio's staff have been meeting with leaders of United We Dream, the largest organization of those young immigrants."To me the most surprising thing was that he was talking about a pathway to citizenship," Lorella Praeli, a leader of the organization, said on Monday. "There has been such a shift in the tone, in his vision."Some conservative Republicans made it clear they would not support Mr. Rubio. In a statement, Senator Jeff Sessions of Alabama said Mr. Obama had undercut the chances for an overhaul by weakening enforcement. "If the administration had spent the last four years ending illegality instead of abetting it," he said, "we would be in a better position for some kind of agreement."
WASHINGTON — From the musicians in new purple uniforms who traveled from places like Des Moines and Montgomery, Ala., to march with a gay and lesbian band, to high school mariachi performers from Texas — including some who took their first plane ride to get here — to scores of elegant African-American women in full-length mink coats and matching hats, the faces of Inauguration Day 2013 were the faces of those left behind by the political process in decades and centuries past.If Jan. 20, 2009, was a day for the history books and a feel-good moment for all of America, Monday was a celebration for the diverse coalition that landed the nation's first black president in the White House for a second term: Latinos, gay people, women and especially African-Americans.Riding on a bus to the heated staging tent on the National Mall, members of the Lesbian and Gay Band Association listened intently as the radio played President Obama's Inaugural Address. A tear streamed down the cheek of Gary Nell, a 53-year-old drum major from Des Moines, as Mr. Obama referred to the Stonewall riots of 1969 in New York, which spawned the gay rights movement. "It was so affirming," Mr. Nell said.Outside the security perimeter, 11-year-old Angel Lucero, fresh-faced and earnest, politely asked passers-by where he and his family might get tickets to the swearing-in. His parents, Mexican immigrants, spoke little English. His older sister, Jennifer, 15, said they had come from Bladensburg, Md., to see the president "because we think that he's going to help us, help other people who aren't free in this country."For gay people and Latinos particularly, the president's second swearing-in was an occasion to savor newfound political clout. But it was also imbued with the sense that Mr. Obama had better make good on the promises he failed to keep during his first term, including an immigration overhaul, as well as a repeal of the law barring federal recognition of same-sex marriage."This time there is a much higher expectation," said Jessica Gallegos, 23, a native of Quito, Ecuador, who works for the World Bank. Despite the president's failure to revamp the nation's immigration laws, she said, "the community still stood behind him. Now it's time for him to deliver."On a day that doubled as a tribute to the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr., Mr. Obama drew a connection between them by swearing to uphold the Constitution over King's Bible. While some African-American leaders wish Mr. Obama would pay more attention to issues like poverty and urban decay, many blacks who trekked to the capital said the second time around was even sweeter."I think the first time a lot of African-Americans voted for him just because he was black," said Mark McDaniel, 42, a retired Navy officer from Chesapeake, Va., as he navigated a packed Metro station. "This time it seemed like the country wanted him back."Throughout Washington on Monday, as the sun rose over the Capitol and gray skies gave way to blue, there was a festive spirit in the air. The cold was not nearly as bitter and the crowds not as crushing as four years ago, but the turnout was still heavy, as tens of thousands of visitors, clutching maps and toting cameras, filled the city.Security was tight. Paradegoers waved American flags, street vendors hawked Obama paraphernalia — which was not selling nearly as briskly as in 2009 — and the streets downtown, closed to cars, became a sea of (mostly polite) humanity."We're here for the history in the making," said Iris Davis-Saulsberry, a high school history teacher from Las Vegas who wore a bomber jacket bearing the presidential seal. Her friend Dorothy Lawson was already thinking about 2016, and the possibility that a woman might become president. "That's our dream," Ms. Lawson said.As the president delivered a message that focused heavily on equality, members of the Texas high school mariachi band, dressed in finery that was hand-embroidered over the border in Guadalajara, awaited their turn to play. Among them was Noel Marquez, a guitar player who recently turned 18 and said he would have voted for Mr. Obama — if only he had been old enough.Not far away, Marita Begley, artistic director of the Lesbian and Gay Band Association, could barely contain her excitement. She had painstakingly prepared a program featuring the work of gay composers (Leonard Bernstein and Aaron Copland), a woman (Lady Gaga), and a Latino (Pitbull).Her group marched in the 2009 inaugural parade, before Mr. Obama came out in favor of same-sex marriage, and before "don't ask, don't tell" was repealed. Although there is still more to do — Ms. Begley would like same-sex marriage to be legal across the land — she could not help notice that inauguration officials allowed her band to bring a much bigger contingent this time, and gave it a much more prominent spot, right next to the civil rights float."It's really good to be here," she said, "as full citizens."
Border Outpost: Luis Colón Díaz is among the thousands of Border Patrol agents who have been stationed at a growing number of military-style outposts near the United States-Mexico border.ALONG THE MEXICO-NEW MEXICO BORDER — A white pickup truck rumbled along the barbed-wire fence that divides the United States and Mexico, toward a crude gate nicknamed Mingas, carved by drug smugglers to bring their loads across the border.On American soil, Daniel Algarate Martínez, a Border Patrol agent, gripped his rifle, staring at the truck that approached on the other side of the divide. A coyote howled in the distance. The truck, loaded with logs, raced past him, past Mingas, and kept on going."I wonder what he has under that wood," Agent Algarate Martínez mumbled.The path to the Mingas gate is a circuitous and sorry dirt trail of unpredictable dangers brought by the desert, the remoteness and the illicit drug trade. It is on the eastern edge of the Bootheel in New Mexico's southwest corner, in Hidalgo County, where the border juts down and Mexico stands briefly to America's east, one of the most remote spots in the roughly 2,000 miles where the countries meet.The closest Border Patrol station is about 60 miles away, an eternity in a region where most roads were cut by ranchers' tractors and cattle hooves. The closest agents are much closer these days, though, stationed for days in outposts deep in the Chihuahuan desert, so close to Mexico that the lights of its farms are the often the only noticeable sign of human life.The agents sleep in bunk beds, sharing meals in a communal kitchen next to lounges where TV sets are tuned to ESPN. Water comes from wells. Diesel tanks hold fuel for the vehicles. Dormitories, command centers and holding cells occupy modular buildings encircled by floodlights and chain-link fences, a setup modeled after the military's forward operating bases in Afghanistan.Ramiro E. Cordero, a special operations supervisor for the Border Patrol's El Paso sector, which is responsible for 268 miles of borderland, including the Bootheel, said the bases were an essential element in the agency's quasi-military strategy of "gaining, maintaining and expanding." They provide a presence in isolated areas where building brick-and-mortar stations would have been impractical.There are two of them in New Mexico, on the eastern and western flanks of the Bootheel. Camp Ramsey, where Agent Algarate Martínez is sometimes stationed, opened in 2009. Camp Garza opened in November — the ripple effect of a rancher's killing in Arizona, most likely by a drug smuggler.Though the number of apprehensions of illegal border crossers has continued its steady decline, the number of drug seizures has remained constant all along the American Southwest, according to a report by the Government Accountability Office, justifying the Border Patrol's expansion into such remote areas. Arizona already has five such forward-operating bases, with three more to open this year.In the El Paso sector, the number of detained illegal immigrants fell to roughly 10,400 last year from 122,000 in 2006. Agent Cordero said that half of them were captured in the Bootheel region, where, unless a migrant got lost while trying to sneak into the United States through Arizona, those who get caught are likely to be carrying bundles of marijuana.Dispassionately, Agent Algarate Martínez, 37, who is from Zaragoza, Spain, said, "This is dope country."There are four to six agents assigned to each shift at Camp Ramsey: morning, swing and midnight. They each stay there for five days and five nights, and they each patrol alone, looking for signs of people where people are not expected to be. It seems like an exercise in futility — agents scanning the rocky, dusty ground for human footprints amid the footprints of cows, bobcats, wild pigs and mountain lions from inside their Ford Raptors, but mostly by foot.Agent Algarate Martínez drove to Mingas to check on sensors that had been tripped in sequence, following the type of northward pattern typically traveled by smugglers. He found no one and figured it must have been a false alarm, which is not uncommon.Dinner at Camp Ramsey that night was burgers cooked on the grill by an agent; he dropped a plate of them on the communal table, and then shuffled to his bed to catch some sleep before his shift began at midnight.
WASHINGTON — President Obama and a bipartisan group of senators will begin separate but simultaneous efforts next week to build support for an overhaul of immigration laws, an effort that had long stalled in Washington but was pushed to the forefront again during the 2012 presidential campaign.The group of at least six senators with a long-held interest in immigration issues is preparing to release a detailed set of principles next Friday, laying the legislative foundation for what they hope will become a comprehensive immigration bill. Their initiative coincides with a similar push by the White House. On Friday, the president met with members of the Congressional Hispanic Caucus, calling the issue "a top legislative priority," and on Tuesday he is set to give an immigration-focused speech in Nevada, where Hispanic voters are growing in numbers.The Senate proposal will probably include four main elements: border enforcement, employer enforcement, handling the future flow of legal immigration (including temporary agriculture workers and high-skilled engineers) and a pathway to citizenship for those who entered the nation illegally. Mr. Obama's approach will largely echo his 2011 immigration "blueprint," which he first outlined in a speech in El Paso, and calls for a pathway to citizenship for the more than 11 million illegal immigrants already in the country.Though all members of the Senate group agree that some pathway to legal residency must be a part of the final proposal, they are still divided on what exactly that route should be. Republican lawmakers are urging that border security be tied to a pathway to citizenship and other requirements like having those who entered illegally go to the back of the line behind immigrants already waiting to enter the country legally, paying fines and back-taxes, and learning English."You've got border security, you've got employer verification and you've got a temporary worker program that addresses the magnet, so those three things have to go together to address operational control over your border," said Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, one of the senators mapping out the legislation. "Then you go to the next big thing — the 12 million. How do you deal with the 12 million in a firm, fair way, realizing you can't put them all in jail and they're not all going to self-deport?"The bipartisan group, which has been meeting regularly since the November election, includes Mr. Graham, the Democratic Senators Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, Robert Menendez of New Jersey and Charles E. Schumer of New York, and the Republican Senators John McCain of Arizona and Marco Rubio of Florida. Senator Michael Bennet, Democrat of Colorado, and the Republican Senators Jeff Flake of Arizona and Mike Lee of Utah have also taken part in the discussions."It's going far better than any of us expected," Mr. Schumer said in an interview. "On both sides, there is a spirit that everyone is going to have to meet somewhere in the middle, and we're very close to coming out with a detailed list of principles."Aides said that the group hoped to have legislation ready by the end of March and was aiming for a vote in the Senate before the August recess. Though Republicans talked about handling immigration reform in steps, the senators are aiming for a comprehensive bill.Mr. Rubio, who has been publicly promoting his own set of principles, was approached by the group in December, said a Republican close to the senator. However, it was unclear until recently whether he would join the bipartisan team or offer his own proposal.In 2010, Mr. Graham and Mr. Schumer outlined a framework for overhauling immigration in a Washington Post op-ed. Their proposal similarly called for four central elements and "a tough but fair path to legalization for those already here," but it did not advance. It is now being used as a starting point for the group's efforts.The 2012 election, in which Mr. Obama beat Mitt Romney with the help of 71 percent of the Hispanic vote, has also proved a galvanizing force for Republicans. "Because of the mood of the country that it's time to move forward on this issue, it's different than it was some years ago," Mr. McCain said. "The election results always have an effect on that."Both Democratic and Republican advocates for immigration changes are hoping that the White House will delay releasing any specific plan of its own to allow a bipartisan bill to emerge from the Senate. While Republicans have previously called upon Mr. Obama to take the lead, they say the timing, now that compromise in the Senate is under way, is inauspicious.
A bipartisan group of senators has agreed on a set of principles for a sweeping overhaul of the immigration system, including a pathway to American citizenship for 11 million illegal immigrants that would hinge on progress in securing the borders and ensuring that foreigners leave the country when their visas expire.The senators were able to reach a deal by incorporating the Democrats' insistence on a single comprehensive bill that would not deny eventual citizenship to illegal immigrants, with Republican demands that strong border and interior enforcement had to be clearly in place before Congress could consider legal status for illegal immigrants.Their blueprint, unveiled on Monday, will allow them to stake out their position one day before President Obama outlines his immigration proposals in a speech on Tuesday in Las Vegas, in the opening moves of what lawmakers expect will be a protracted and contentious debate in Congress this year.Lawmakers said they were optimistic that the political mood had changed since a similar effort collapsed in acrimony in 2010. Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona and one of the negotiators, said he saw "a new appreciation" among Republicans of the need for an overhaul."Look at the last election," Mr. McCain said Sunday morning on ABC's "This Week With George Stephanopoulos." "We are losing dramatically the Hispanic vote, which we think should be ours." The senator also said he had seen "significant improvements" in border enforcement, although "we've still got a ways to go."He added, "We can't go on forever with 11 million people living in this country in the shadows in an illegal status."According to a five-page draft of the plan obtained by The New York Times on Sunday, the eight senators — including Mr. McCain; Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York; and Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina — have agreed to address the failings of the immigration system in one comprehensive measure, rather than in smaller pieces, and to offer a "tough, fair and practical road map" that would eventually lead to a chance at citizenship for nearly all of the immigrants here illegally."We on the Democratic side have said that we are flexible and we want to get a bill," Mr. Schumer told reporters in New York on Sunday. "But there's a bottom line, and that's a path to citizenship for the 11 or so million people who qualify. We've made great, great progress with our Republican colleagues."Under the senators' plan, most illegal immigrants would be able to apply to become permanent residents — a crucial first step toward citizenship — but only after certain border enforcement measures had been accomplished.Among the plan's new proposals is the creation of a commission of governors, law enforcement officials and community leaders from border states that would assess when border security measures had been completed. A proposal would also require that an exit system be in place for tracking departures of foreigners who entered the country through airports or seaports, before any illegal immigrants could start on a path to citizenship.The lawmakers intend for their proposals to frame the debate in the Senate, which is expected to take up immigration this spring, ahead of the House of Representatives. Compared with an immigration blueprint from 2011 that White House officials have said is the basis for the president's position, the senators' proposals appear to include tougher enforcement and a less direct path for illegal immigrants than Mr. Obama is considering.In a parallel effort, a separate group of four senators will introduce a bill this week dealing with another thorny issue that is likely to be addressed in a comprehensive measure: visas for legal immigrants with advanced skills in technology and science. The bill, written primarily by Senator Orrin G. Hatch of Utah, a Republican, and Senator Amy Klobuchar of Minnesota, a Democrat, would nearly double the number of temporary visas, known as an H-1B, available each year to highly skilled immigrants. It would also free up more permanent resident visas, known as green cards, so those immigrants could eventually settle in the United States and go on to become citizens.
GREENVILLE, S.C. — At Tommy's Country Ham House, a popular spot downtown for politics and comfort food, not much has changed since 2007, the last time conservatives here made it crystal clear to politicians how they felt about what they see as amnesty for people who entered the country illegally."What we need to do is put them on a bus," said Ken Sowell, 63, a lawyer from Greenville, as he ate lunch recently at the diner. "We need to enforce the border. If they want to apply legally more power to them. I don't think just because a bunch of people violate the law, we ought to change the law for them."Six years ago, the intensity of that kind of sentiment was enough to scuttle immigration overhaul efforts led by President George W. Bush and a bipartisan group of lawmakers, including Senators John McCain of Arizona and Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, both Republicans.Now, as a new bipartisan group of eight senators, including Mr. Graham and Mr. McCain, try again — this time with President Obama as their partner in the White House — members of Congress will have to overcome deep-seated resistance like that expressed in the restaurant if they are to push legislation forward.Republicans are betting that opposition from Tea Party activists and the party's most conservative supporters will have less impact because of the dire electoral consequences of continuing to take a hard line regarding immigrants. The senators on Monday released a blueprint for a new immigration policy that opens the door to possible citizenship ahead of a Tuesday speech on the subject by Mr. Obama in Las Vegas.There is some evidence that the politics of immigration may be changing. Sean Hannity, the conservative host at Fox News, said days after the 2012 presidential election that he has "evolved" on immigration and now supports a comprehensive approach that could "get rid of" the issue for Republicans. Senator Marco Rubio of Florida, a rising star in the Republican Party, is pushing his own version of broad immigration changes — and getting praise from conservative icons like Grover Norquist and Ralph Reed.But the Republican-controlled House remains a big hurdle. Speaker John A. Boehner on Monday was noncommittal about the emerging proposal, with a spokesman saying that Mr. Boehner "welcomes the work of leaders like Senator Rubio on this issue, and is looking forward to learning more about the proposal."Representative Lamar Smith, Republican of Texas and a senior member of the Judiciary Committee, said that "when you legalize those who are in the country illegally, it costs taxpayers millions of dollars, costs American workers thousands of jobs and encourages more illegal immigration."And if the lunch rush conversation at Tommy's is any indication, many Republican lawmakers will soon return home to find their constituents just as opposed to the idea as they were before. Concern about immigration varies regionally. But in many Congressional districts around the country, the prospect of intense opposition carries with it the threat of a primary challenger if Republican lawmakers stray too far from hawkish orthodoxy on the issue."The people who are coming across the border — as far as I'm concerned, they are common criminals," said Bill Storey, 68, a retired civil engineer from Greenville. "We should not adopt policies to reward them for coming into this country illegally. I have all the regard for them in the world if they come through the legal system, but not the illegal system."Charlie Newton, a construction worker in the Greenville area, praised the work ethic of Hispanic co-workers, but said he opposes any laws that would provide benefits to illegal immigrants, including help becoming citizens."I think we need to help our own people before we keep helping somebody else," he said.The president's proposals are expected to include more border enforcement, work site verification systems that allow employers to check the status of their employees online, and a road map to citizenship for the estimated 11 million illegal immigrants now living in the country. Democratic senators could begin work on a bill in the next couple of weeks.In the Fourth Congressional District in South Carolina, which includes Greenville, the formal arrival of such a plan is likely to anger the constituents of Trey Gowdy, a Republican House member who was elected in the 2010 Tea Party wave and is now the chairman of a key subcommittee that will deal with immigration.Mr. Gowdy has already taken a hard line, signing on last year to the "Prohibiting Backdoor Amnesty Act," which aimed to reverse Mr. Obama's plans to delay deportations for some young illegal immigrants. The congressman will be under pressure to change his mind from the White House and its allies, including groups like the U.S. Chamber of Commerce. But when he goes home to Greenville, Mr. Gowdy may find that his constituents want him to hold firm in his opposition."If you had to go find the heartburn, you'd find it in Greenville," said Katon Dawson, a former chairman of the Republican Party in South Carolina. Mr. Dawson, who supports comprehensive immigration changes, said the matter was likely to become a hot-button issue again, as it was in 2006 and 2007."All I'd ever hear is, 'Why don't you enforce the laws that we already have?' And then I'd hear, 'Why don't you just build the fence?' " Mr. Dawson said, describing the comments he expects to hear again during the immigration debate.Mr. Gowdy referred questions about the immigration debate to the Republican chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, Representative Robert W. Goodlatte of Virginia. But veterans of South Carolina politics say the reaction in his district, and others like it across the country, will help determine the fate of the national legislation.Bruce Bannister, the Republican majority leader of the South Carolina House of Representatives, said much of that response will depend on how the White House and its allies in Washington frame the debate."The amnesty provisions that got everybody fired up — I think you're not going to see states like South Carolina ever support that, even though we recognize that shipping or sending home all the folks that came here illegally is almost impossible," Mr. Bannister, who represents Greenville, said.Josh Kimbrall, a conservative radio talk show host in South Carolina, agrees with Mr. Bannister. Mr. Kimbrall supports immigration law changes, but says Republicans like Mr. Bush and Mr. McCain allowed their effort in 2007 to be portrayed in a bad light by opponents."It's how you message it," Mr. Kimbrall said. "In Greenville, it's the rule of law. As soon as the word amnesty is thrown in, very few people are willing to go along."
As one bipartisan group of senators released its blueprint on Monday for a comprehensive overhaul of the immigration laws, another group in the Senate was ready to present a proposal addressing one dysfunctional aspect of the system: a shortage of visas for highly skilled immigrants working in science and technology fields.Four senators, led by Orrin G. Hatch, a Republican from Utah, will introduce a bill on Tuesday that would greatly increase the number of temporary visas available for those immigrants, and would also free up permanent resident visas, known as green cards, so more of those immigrants could settle in the United States and eventually become citizens.The bill will be the first legislation introduced in Congress on immigration in a year when the once-toxic issue has gathered surprising political momentum. Lawmakers who have shied away from it in recent years are now offering proposals that they are framing as practical solutions to fix a failing system.Major technology employers like Microsoft, Oracle and others have been calling for years for more visas for foreigners with computer, engineering and mathematics skills, saying they have more jobs than they can fill with Americans who are graduating in those fields from American universities. White House officials and lawmakers on both sides of the aisle acknowledge that a broad overhaul, including a pathway to citizenship for 11 million illegal immigrants, would have a better chance at attracting votes for passage, especially among Republicans, if it had vigorous support from business.A group of eight senators, led by Charles E. Schumer of New York, a Democrat, and John McCain of Arizona, a Republican, on Monday unveiled principles for an overhaul that focused on solving illegal immigration, with increased border security and measures to give legal status to illegal immigrants. Their blueprint referred to changes for highly skilled immigrants, without specifics.The bill by Mr. Hatch's smaller group, by contrast, is a detailed plan to recalibrate the high-skilled visa system. It would immediately increase the cap on temporary visas for those immigrants, known as an H-1B, to 115,000 a year from the current maximum of 65,000. It would also create, for the first time, a "market-based" system that would rapidly increase the numbers of those visas if the supply ran out, to a maximum of 300,000 H-1B visas in one year.In the boom before the recession took hold in 2008, there were several years when businesses snatched up all the available H-1B visas in a few days. The market mechanism in Mr. Hatch's bill would lower the cap on temporary visas if demand from employers declined.Also sponsoring the bill are Senator Marco Rubio of Florida, a Republican who was among the eight senators endorsing the broader blueprint, and Senators Amy Klobuchar of Minnesota and Chris Coons of Delaware, both Democrats.In a statement on Monday, Brad Smith, general counsel and executive vice president of Microsoft, said the company "strongly supports efforts to permanently reform our high-skilled immigration system and enact broad immigration reform in 2013." He enumerated measures the company would like to see in any legislation, including all those in Mr. Hatch's bill.Randel K. Johnson, senior vice president of the United States Chamber of Commerce, said his organization had worked closely with the senators on the bill and would send "a letter of strong support."Ms. Klobuchar said immigrants had brought new ideas and businesses to the United States. "I truly believe we have to be a country that makes stuff again, that exports to the world," she said in an interview. "To do that, we have to have innovation.""Sadly," Ms. Klobuchar said, under the current system "we have been training our competition," because many skilled immigrants were forced to return home after studying and working in the United States.Mr. Hatch, who fought off a re-election challenge from the right last year, has not said whether he would support comprehensive legislation including legal status for illegal immigrants. Ms. Klobuchar and Mr. Coons said they expected their bill would become part of the broader overhaul.The bill would allow spouses of temporary immigrants to work, a change that would bring relief to many foreigners — many of them educated women from Asian countries like India — whose careers languished when their spouses came to work in this country. The bill would make it easier for temporary immigrants who are tied to one employer to find a new job if their first job did not work out.It would also tinker with the system to make more permanent resident green cards available for immigrants in science and technology fields, but without increasing the number of green cards over all, something many Republican lawmakers are loath to do. It would allow the immigration authorities to distribute as many as 300,000 green cards that went unused over the years because of twists in the system.The bill would make changes to ensure that a much higher percentage of 140,000 employment green cards available each year would go to the skilled immigrants, and not to their family members, as happens now.Responding to insistent demands from universities, the bill would make an unlimited number of green cards available for foreigners graduating from American universities with advanced science and technology degrees. It would increase visa fees and use the money for training programs for Americans.Some employee groups said they would oppose the bill, saying the large number of temporary immigrants would undercut wages for Americans. "America is a nation of immigrants, not of guest workers," said Keith Grzelak, vice president of the IEEE-USA, which represents more than 400,000 engineers.
WASHINGTON — As Congress and the White House prepare to refight two epic policy battles from the past — a new agenda to stem gun violence and another to address the nation's  heavily criticized immigration system — political, demographic and economic shifts  are propelling  immigration changes  forward as forcefully as they are pulling lawmakers away on guns.Bruised by successive presidential defeats in which Hispanic voters played  a significant role, Republicans are eager to join in producing legislation that would make it easier for people to immigrate to the United States or stay here in some cases if they entered illegally. The cause has been helped by years of a sputtering economy, which has reduced the flow of illegal immigrants, and thus the red hot anger directed at them, as well as increased border security.But while Republicans are drawing back from their outspoken stance on immigration, as well as opposition to gay marriage and other social issues, they have found gun rights a secure policy to defend, often with the help of Democrats from conservative states, and are almost certain to oppose any agenda beyond changes to background checks for gun owners.The dynamic in Washington mirrors the sentiment back home for many lawmakers. "We are getting closer to a balanced approach," said Chad Connelly, chairman of the South Carolina Republican Party, about immigration.  "We got spanked in November, and I think what Republicans are looking for is something that enforces border security while making it easier to come here."Changes to gun laws, he said, have no such support. "They will have a rough row to hoe," he said. "I have some donors who own gun stores who said they can't keep stuff in the store."One of the most significant changes between 1994, when the omnibus crime bill instituting an assault weapons ban passed, and now, is the number of competitive House seats; there were more than 160 back then, now there are fewer than 100.This means that Republicans in politically mixed districts who feel the pressure to vote for new gun control measures "are fewer and farther between than there have ever been," said David Wasserman of the nonpartisan Cook Political Report. Democrats in Republican districts — there are about a dozen of them — would also be disinclined toward such legislation.Further, there are Senate Democrats up for re-election in 2014 who are loath to get behind the president's broad gun agenda, which includes a renewal of the assault weapons ban, a restriction on size of ammunition magazines and new background checks. "I am a strong supporter of Second Amendment rights," said Senator Mary L. Landrieu, Democrat of Louisiana, who said she is hearing both sides of the issue back home. "Over all, the state is probably more supportive of less restrictions than more."Tellingly, Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, said on Monday that he was "committed to ensuring that the Senate will consider legislation that addresses gun violence and other aspects of violence in our society early this year," but added that when it came to President Obama's immigration agenda, he would "work tirelessly to make reform a reality in the Senate."In 1994, a group of House Republicans banded together to support a broad crime act that included an assault weapons ban. Part of the bill included tough crime measures that appealed to some of them, but it was still an enormous lift; in the end 46 Republicans supported the measure while 131 opposed it."I jumped off the cliff with Jon Kyl, who was running for the Senate that year," said former Representative Jim Kolbe of Arizona, referring to his colleague, the former conservative House member and senator from Arizona. The two flew to Tucson, where they faced angry voters at a public meeting, Mr. Kolbe said."We explained why we did it, why we thought it was a reasonable trade but a lot of people were very unhappy," Mr. Kolbe said. He noted that the National Rifle Association remained supportive — an unlikely outcome today.On the flip side, Republicans, who were deeply divided just two years ago on immigration issues now largely believe their party needs to be behind some legislation. Senator John McCain of Arizona, who made tough border enforcement the cornerstone of his 2010 re-election campaign, stood with Democrats this week to nearly reverse his position once again on the issue, saying he would seek a bipartisan plan."Necessity is the mother of political invention," said Bill Whalen, a fellow at the Hoover Institution. "Republicans are looking at a third straight presidential defeat if they don't improve their image with Hispanic voters." He added, "You don't have a lot of Republicans walking around town saying he lost an election because of our bad relationship with the gun control lobby."A gun bill that is limited to background checks, however, still remains a strong possibility in Congress this year, if the Republican leadership of the House would bring such a measure on the floor. "I was a co-sponsor of a conceal carry bill in Nebraska that had a significant background check component," said Senator Deb Fischer, a newly elected Republican from Nebraska.Such a measure, many gun experts say, may actually do the most to stem gun violence, because it would help keep weapons out of the hands of the mentally ill and criminals. "We might be in a happy place where effectiveness conforms with political feasibility," said Jon S. Vernick, the co-director of Johns Hopkins Center for Gun Policy and Research.
LAS VEGAS — Seizing an opening to rewrite the nation's immigration laws, President Obama challenged Congress on Tuesday to act swiftly to put 11 million illegal immigrants living in the United States on a clear path to citizenship.But his push for speedy action and his silence on proposals to defer the opportunity for legal residency until the country's borders are deemed secure provoked criticism from a Republican leader on the issue. The response suggests that reaching consensus on immigration law changes remained difficult despite a new bipartisan push since the November elections.Speaking at a high school here in a state that has seen rapid growth in its Hispanic population, the president praised a bipartisan group of senators who proposed their own sweeping immigration overhaul a day earlier, saying their plan was very much in line with his own proposals.Mr. Obama warned, however, that "the closer we get, the more emotional this debate is going to become." He said that if Congress did not move forward "in a timely fashion" on its own legislation, he would send up a specific measure — something the White House has put off for now — and demand a vote.The president's speech immediately exposed potential fault lines in the coming debate. He said, for example, that there must be a path to citizenship for illegal immigrants "from the outset," a statement that would seem at odds with the assertion by some senators that citizenship must be tied to tighter border security.Senator Marco Rubio, the Florida Republican seen as an influential party voice on an issue that cost Republicans in last year's voting, said he was "concerned by the president's unwillingness to accept significant enforcement triggers before current undocumented immigrants can apply for a green card.""Without such triggers in place," he went on, "enforcement systems will never be implemented, and we will be back in just a few years dealing with millions of new undocumented people in our country."Although Mr. Obama did not say it in his speech, the White House is also proposing that the United States treat same-sex couples the same as other families, meaning that people would be able to use their relationship as a basis to obtain a visa — another element likely to be resisted by some conservative Republicans.Brendan Buck, a spokesman for Speaker John A. Boehner, said in a statement that House Republicans "hope the president is careful not to drag the debate to the left and ultimately disrupt the difficult work that is ahead in the House and Senate."A senior administration official said the speech was the start of a concerted campaign to force Republicans to follow through on the bipartisan proposal. He predicted that given the president's popularity with Hispanic voters, they would find it hard vote down a bill with his name on it.Mr. Obama offered a familiar list of proposals: tightening security on borders, cracking down on employers who hire illegal immigrants and temporarily issuing more visas to clear the huge backlog of people applying for legal status in the country.His speech, on the heels of the bipartisan Senate proposal, sets the terms for one of the year's landmark legislative debates. These are only the opening steps in a complicated dance, and both the politics and the policy can be treacherous ground, as shown by the failed effort to overhaul immigration laws in the George W. Bush administration.But the flurry of activity underscores the powerful new momentum behind an overhaul of the system, after an election that dramatized the vulnerability of Republicans on the issue, with Mr. Obama piling up lopsided majorities over Mitt Romney among Hispanic voters."Most Americans agree that it's time to fix a system that's been broken for way too long," Mr. Obama said to an audience of about 2,000 high school students, many of them Hispanic. They applauded loudly when he mentioned the Dream Act, which offers amnesty to children of immigrants who are in the United States illegally.In scrambling to present their blueprint on Monday, the day before Mr. Obama's speech, the senators stole a march on the president. But their intent appeared less to undermine his efforts than to stake out their own role in drafting a comprehensive bill."It is a fascinating Washington horse race that you don't always see, and a signal of the seriousness to get across the finish line," said Angela Kelley, an expert on immigration at the Center for American Progress, a liberal research group.
WASHINGTON — As the specifics of immigration legislation take shape on Capitol Hill, President Obama is making it clear that he wants the overhaul on his terms.Officials in the West Wing are convinced that the politics of the immigration issue have firmly shifted in their direction. That belief is fueling the president's push for quick action and broad changes that go beyond what Republicans are signaling would be acceptable if they are to back legislation that allows a path to citizenship for millions of illegal immigrants.The administration's confidence — which was communicated to immigration advocates in a series of conference calls and meetings last week — is rooted in the sense among the president's political advisers that Republicans are eager to embrace broad immigration changes as a way of improving their electoral appeal among Hispanic voters."We're giving them some space," said Dan Pfeiffer, a senior adviser to the president. But in the meantime, he said, "we're going to continue to make the case to the country about why immigration reform should be done and to put pressure on Republicans that they need to do it."While aides say Mr. Obama is open to some negotiation over the contours of the immigration changes he laid out Tuesday in Las Vegas, senior administration officials are convinced that there is little risk in pushing hard for Mr. Obama's immigration priorities, betting that Republicans will think twice about voting down a bill championed by a president who is highly popular among the very voters they covet.The principles Mr. Obama embraced this week differ in some central ways from the effort under way in the Senate, where Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, and Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, and six other senators are working toward a bill that could be debated and voted on as early as this summer.Mr. Rubio and the other senators have said illegal immigrants would not be given a pathway to citizenship until the government had taken certain measures — so far unspecified — to secure the border. The White House fears that could become a source of endless delays for immigrants eager to become citizens. The Senate outline also includes a guest worker program for low-income workers, something Mr. Obama and his allies have been concerned about in the past.In legislative fights over health care and stimulus spending in his first term, the president and his team earned scorn from their own supporters for being too willing to compromise. Liberal activists who helped Mr. Obama get elected in 2008 criticized him for trading away a public insurance option to secure passage of the Affordable Care Act.But immigration advocates and White House officials say the dynamic is different now. With his re-election secured and the Republican electoral problems obvious, the president is more likely to stand his ground, they say."They know that the political momentum is on their side," said an immigrant advocate whose group participated in conference calls with White House officials last week. "They are pretty confident that they have a broad cross section of civil society behind him on this."Asked whether White House officials seemed willing to compromise with Republicans to ensure passage, the advocate said, "That is not the message we heard at all."Mr. Obama, in an interview Wednesday with the Spanish-language network Univision, rejected Mr. Rubio's criticism that he was not paying enough attention to border security."We have done more on border security in the last four years than we have done in the previous 20," the president said. "We've actually done almost everything that Republicans asked to be done several years ago as a precondition to move forward on comprehensive immigration reform."The president's aides said he would welcome legislation that met his principles but that could also earn broad, bipartisan support in the Senate. They believe that a vote of 80 or more senators from both parties would put more pressure on Republican lawmakers who control the House. But the White House is also willing to fight for a more partisan immigration measure if need be, advisers said. Already there is evidence that Mr. Obama may end up with a messy political fight in spite of the show of bipartisan spirit on display in the Senate this week.
WASHINGTON — As eight senators in a bipartisan group look ahead to a broad immigration overhaul, they are also looking back to 2006 and 2007 — the last time a major immigration measure was considered — as something of a reverse playbook.Lesson 1? "Make sure you get out there and define what you're trying to do," said former Senator Trent Lott, the Mississippi Republican who, in 2007, was the minority whip when his chamber's immigration efforts imploded. "Don't forget to pay attention to the message, and don't let the media define what you're trying to do."It is a tip that Mr. Lott says he has communicated to the staff of Senator Marco Rubio, a Florida Republican involved in the current effort, and so far Mr. Rubio seems to be heeding the advice. In recent weeks, he has focused on conservative media powerhouses, tirelessly wooing influential voices on the right like Bill O'Reilly and Rush Limbaugh."The outreach by Marco Rubio has been very positive," Mr. Lott said. "He's very good at explaining what he wants to do."Getting out ahead by articulating their immigration principles, as the group did in a Monday news conference, is only one of the ways the senators hope to learn from the mistakes of the past. This time, they said, they are capitalizing on a promising political environment, using more conciliatory language, and trying to harness media outlets to their advantage. They also plan to move their legislation through the Judiciary Committee, a step not taken in 2007 and one that helped doom the bill, and are working more closely with businesses and labor unions to make sure the two can also reach a compromise."Our timing is right," said Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, the No. 2 Democrat in the Senate. "The election results are still fresh in the minds of my Republican colleagues and they don't want to go through this again."President George W. Bush said in 2009 that it was "a mistake" to have pushed for changes to Social Security, rather than immigration, immediately after the 2004 election. By the time he took on immigration late in his second term, he was a lame duck president, weakened by the war in Iraq and facing dissent within his party."By his own admission, President Bush made a strategic error in not pushing the issue right after his re-election," said Kevin Appleby, the director of migration policy at the United States Conference of Catholic Bishops. "President Obama is not making the same mistake. He still has a lot of political capital to spend."In the wake of the 2012 presidential election, where Mr. Obama's defeat of Mitt Romney came with the help of 71 percent of the Hispanic vote, those on all sides of the immigration effort believe the climate is ripe for another attempt.And, at least in the early stages, they are taking steps to reach across the aisle, even with the words they choose."The most important lesson I took way from 2006 and 2007 is that people had no faith that there wouldn't be future waves of illegal immigrants," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, a Democrat of New York in the Senate's bipartisan immigration group.To show that he is serious about an overhaul, he explained, he is especially conscious of the language he uses; Mr. Schumer now refers to "illegal immigrants," a term preferred by the right and an acknowledgment that the 11 million illegal immigrants currently in the country did, in fact, break the law.In a similar linguistic concession, Mr. Rubio, during Monday's immigration news conference, referred to the "undocumented" workers, a term generally preferred by Democrats and loathed by his party's conservative wing.In 2007, in an attempt to save time and reach a deal, the Senate bypassed the Judiciary Committee and brought the legislation straight to the floor. At the time, the senators who drafted the bill tried to band together to vote down any amendments that changed the substance of their compromise, an agreement that broke down. Several controversial amendments, including one that then-Senator Obama supported, ultimately led to the bill's collapse."What we're doing now is we're going to put it through committee," Mr. Schumer said. "When the bill gets through committee, it will be battle-tested and we will be prepared for the floor in a better way."The group is also considering again trying to maintain a large voting bloc, to squash any amendments they believe could kill their bill."I think we have to unless there's something that we both agree to," Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, said when asked about such a possibility at an immigration panel on Wednesday. "It's going to be fragile, as these kinds of things are, and so we will have to take some tough votes in order to keep it intact."Finally, even business and labor interests — who historically come down on opposite sides of how to handle the future flow of legal immigrants — are currently working among themselves and with the Senate in an attempt to reach a compromise."We have had discussions with both labor — the A.F.L.-C.I.O., the S.E.I.U. — and business," including with Thomas J. Donohue, president of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, and leaders of other groups, Mr. Schumer said Monday."And in fact while we've been negotiating these principles, they've been sitting talking to one another," he added. "They are making really good progress, much better than in 2009."Mr. Lott said that the collapse of an immigration overhaul in 2007 was "one of the most embarrassing moments that I experienced in the Senate," and that the memories were still vivid — the way conservative talk radio turned on him, the angry phone calls flooding his office from around the country every morning, the handful of death threats.Watching the immigration debate take shape now, he said, he is heartened to watch Mr. Rubio and others aggressively make their case in the press — something he wishes he had done better six years ago."I'd been in the Congress 34 years by then — I should have known better," Mr. Lott said. "I was just trying to help move this thing along, but I should have paid better attention to the message part of it."
The group met, on and off, in almost complete secrecy for nearly four years. It lost members to political disagreements, and to re-election battles. After the November elections, it regrouped and redoubled its efforts.Soon, the bipartisan group of about eight House members hopes to unveil its own immigration legislation, adding a voice to a growing swell of politicians — a bipartisan group in the Senate, as well as President Obama — who say they are serious about overhauling the nation's immigration system by the end of the year."For the last six or seven years, there had been no one to partner with, but since Nov. 6 there's been a lot of new dance partners, and that's good," said Representative Luis V. Gutierrez, Democrat of Illinois and a member of the group. "The table is filling up with people, and people are talking and they're having conversations."Aides and members would not confirm on the record the group's exact composition, but they said it had an equal number of Democrats and Republicans. In addition to Mr. Gutierrez, the chairman of the Congressional Hispanic Caucus's immigration task force, those involved in the discussions, aides said, include Representatives Xavier Becerra and Zoe Lofgren, both California Democrats; John Yarmuth, Democrat of Kentucky; Representatives John Carter and Sam Johnson, both Texas Republicans; Mario Diaz-Balart, Republican of Florida; and Raúl R. Labrador, Republican of Idaho.On Tuesday, the House Judiciary Committee is scheduled to hold its first hearing on the immigration issue. The bipartisan group of House members hopes to release legislation of its own, perhaps accompanied by its own set of principles, by Feb. 12, the day Mr. Obama delivers the State of the Union address.In a town where leaks are the currency of doing business, those with knowledge of the group said the legislators' tight-lipped discipline was remarkable — and necessary.Immigration is a politically fraught issue, especially in the House, and many of the members wanted the safety of being able to present controversial ideas or walk away without details appearing in the news media. House Republicans involved with the group did not want to be associated with a topic they saw as potentially toxic, particularly with members of their party's more conservative wing.The group has received far less attention than its Senate counterpart — in part by design, and in part because most lawmakers believe that the Senate will need to take the lead on immigration. Getting to 60 votes there, aides and advocates say, will probably be easier than reaching the 218 votes necessary in the House, where the legislation could face strong opposition from the far right.But rumors and names of group members began popping up in recent weeks, and Speaker John A. Boehner, Republican of Ohio, confirmed the group's existence last month at a private luncheon, first reported by The Hill newspaper. (During a House recess last week, the group held a conference call to remind its members not to speak to the news media until it was ready to present its proposed legislation.)"I think there's a bipartisan group of members that have been meeting now for three or four years," Mr. Boehner said at the lunch. "Frankly, I think they basically have an agreement. I've not seen the agreement. I don't know all the pitfalls in it. But it's, in my view, the right group of members."The group is in many ways a cross-section of the House. On one extreme is Mr. Labrador, a second-term member with Tea Party support; on the other is Mr. Gutierrez, an outspoken proponent of immigration reform who has been critical of Mr. Obama, saying he was moving too slowly. (One Republican aide joked that Mr. Gutierrez was "kind of the Raúl Labrador of the left.")"You've got folks in this room who are truly, as conservative Republicans would call them, far-left liberals, and you've got some folks in the room who the liberals would call far-right conservatives," said John Stone, a spokesman for Mr. Carter.Since the election, the group has met at least once a week, for at least an hour, when the House is in session. Those close to the group said its members largely agreed with the broad principles that were released by their Senate counterparts last Monday."The goal is to fix what's broken, and it's pretty clear that a lot is broken," Mr. Diaz-Balart said. "Do we recognize that we have a problem with the borders? Yes. Do we recognize that we have a problem with our visa system, where people don't leave the country? Yes. Do we recognize that we have kids who were brought here by their parents and that's an issue we have to deal with? Yes. Do we recognize the need for agricultural workers? Yes."He added, "The devil is in the details, but I am hopeful that members of Congress who truly want to reach a solution will be able to."The House and Senate working groups have been in touch. Mr. Gutierrez said he had a productive meeting in December with Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, and has talked with Senator Robert Menendez, Democrat of New Jersey."We are in touch with our counterparts in the House," Senator Charles E. Schumer, a New York Democrat and member of the bipartisan Senate group on immigration, confirmed at a news conference on Thursday.The House group is working on a timetable similar to the Senate's. After it introduces its legislation, it plans to take it through the committee process and have a vote before the August recess."The goal is a bill," Mr. Stone said. "Let's dot the i's and cross the t's, and that's basically where it is, and let's move forward. The goal is as soon as possible."
WASHINGTON — The chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, Representative Robert W. Goodlatte of Virginia, said on Monday that a series of hearings he will schedule in the coming months would examine different pieces of a possible overhaul of the immigration system, including proposals for a pathway to citizenship for 11 million illegal immigrants in the country.On Tuesday the committee will hold the first of those hearings, formally opening what Mr. Goodlatte, a Republican, called a "momentous debate on immigration" in Congress. While attention has been focused on the immigration proposals unveiled last week by President Obama and a bipartisan group of senators, Mr. Goodlatte is moving quickly to stake out a position for the Republican-controlled House on the issue. In an interview, Mr. Goodlatte said he expected that the hearings would result in one or more bills that reflect the House position on the overhaul.Mr. Goodlatte, 60, has established a solid record of opposition to any measures he regarded as amnesty for illegal immigrants. But he said the Judiciary hearings would include scrutiny of proposals to offer legal status to most of the immigrants living illegally in the country.Calling legalization of those immigrants "the most difficult side" of the immigration issue, Mr. Goodlatte said the committee would consider options to give "some kind of legal status to bring people out of the shadows," offering them a chance at "being a fuller part of our society." He said the committee would examine proposals that would allow most of the 11 million illegal immigrants to become citizens relatively quickly, as well as plans that would only offer limited legal status to far fewer people."We don't want to prejudge anything," he said.Mr. Goodlatte's plans for the hearings were a new sign of how far the center of gravity on immigration has shifted since the November elections, when Mr. Obama's support for a pathway to citizenship for illegal immigrants helped secure his re-election. Many Republican leaders have been calling for the party to find a new approach that plays down strident rhetoric against illegal immigrants and instead offers solutions to Latinos, high-tech businesses, farmers and many other groups frustrated with the system's failures.Mr. Goodlatte's game plan for the hearings contrasts with his predecessor as House judiciary chairman, Lamar Smith, Republican of Texas. Mr. Smith, who, like Mr. Goodlatte, has special expertise on immigration issues, has been resolutely opposed to most measures offering illegal immigrants a path to citizenship. Hearings held by Mr. Smith often focused on what he saw as serious and sometimes dangerous lapses in the Obama administration's enforcement of immigration laws.Mr. Goodlatte, who practiced immigration law for a number of years before he was elected to Congress in 1992, said the hearings would educate House lawmakers on the complexities of the issue, and air thorny subjects so that they could find out what voters at home are thinking. Even though the mood in Washington has changed since November, resistance to those measures remains strong in many conservative Republican districts.Mr. Goodlatte said that assessing the status of the Obama administration's enforcement efforts would be a critical part of the hearings, which will be held in the full committee and in a subcommittee led by Representative Trey Gowdy of South Carolina, also a Republican conservative.Referring to an amnesty in 1986, which was followed by a renewed wave of illegal immigration, Mr. Goodlatte said, "What assurances will we have that the federal government is going to enforce the law this time?"A bipartisan group of House lawmakers has also been meeting, but they have made few public comments about their proposals. Those lawmakers and immigration advocates on both sides of the debate are looking to Tuesday's hearing as an early glimpse of how an immigration overhaul could play out in the House. The tone the members take in their questioning — particularly the Republicans — will likely offer a sense of where they stand on the issue going forward. Proponents of an overhaul are watching Mr. Goodlatte with cautious optimism, viewing him as less of a hard-liner than Mr. Smith.Similarly, the witness list posted on the committee's Web site has come under intense scrutiny, as much for who is listed as who is not. The emphasis now, advocates said, seems to be on high-skilled workers and enforcement, two themes popular with Republicans. The list also includes Julian Castro, the mayor of San Antonio, a Democrat who had a star turn at his party's national convention last summer.White House officials said Mr. Obama would press the issue this week, meeting on Tuesday with immigrant advocates, labor leaders and business leaders from industries that have been clamoring for easier access to foreign workers.
WASHINGTON — House Republicans on Tuesday staked out what they cast as a middle-ground option in the debate over immigration , pushing an approach that could include legal residency but not a path to citizenship — as their Democratic counterparts favor — for the 11 million illegal immigrants already in the country.Republicans also signaled that they are open to the idea of breaking immigration legislation into several smaller bills, which would allow them to deal with the question of highly skilled workers, as well as a farmworker program, without addressing what Democrats and immigration advocates say is the larger issue of potential citizenship. Immigration advocates favor a comprehensive measure to enable them to use elements that have bipartisan backing to build support for broader legislation.At a House Judiciary Committee hearing exploring an overhaul of the immigration system — the first of several such hearings expected in the House — Representative Robert W. Goodlatte, Republican of Virginia and chairman of the committee, tried to frame what he called the question of the day: "Are there options that we should consider between the extremes of mass deportation and a pathway to citizenship for those not lawfully present in the United States?"It was a question later echoed by Representative Lamar Smith, Republican of Texas and the former chairman of the committee, when questioning Mayor Julián Castro of San Antonio. "Do you see any compromise area between the current status quo and a path to citizenship for virtually all the 11 million who are illegal immigrants in the country today?" he asked.Mr. Castro, whose twin brother, Representative Joaquín Castro, is a newly elected Democrat from Texas, said he saw the compromise as "a recognition that a path to citizenship will be earned citizenship," meaning that illegal immigrants would be forced to learn English, and pay fines and back taxes before they could become citizens.Representative Spencer Bachus, Republican of Alabama, turned to the question of how to approach an overhaul of the system when he said he thought the panelists could all agree that "it's going to be a much easier lift to solve the problem of highly skilled workers.""When you take comprehensive, then we're dealing with certain issues like full citizenship," Mr. Bachus said. "And whatever else we disagree on, I think we would agree on that that's a more toxic and contentious issue, granting full amnesty."But Representative Cedric L. Richmond, Democrat of Louisiana, countered that the only way to tackle immigration is through comprehensive legislation. "Why don't we just get the skilled labor part done first?" Mr. Richmond asked. "Well, politically, and just being very practical about it, if we got the skilled labor part done first, do you think we would ever come behind it and finish the job? I think it has to be a comprehensive approach or we'll never get to the hard part."Immigration advocates, who had been eagerly awaiting the hearing for an early hint of the tenor of the debate on immigration as it unfolds in the House, said the use of the word "amnesty" would most likely be a bad sign for those in favor of a comprehensive overhaul.Representative John Conyers Jr., Democrat of Michigan, tried to set the tone early — "I hope no one uses the term 'illegal immigrants' here today," he said in his opening remarks. But the a-word, as immigration advocates have called "amnesty," came up twice. In addition to Mr. Bachus, Representative Trey Gowdy, Republican of South Carolina, also used the phrase: "This is not our country's first foray into amnesty." He expressed concern for "respect for the rule of law."Meanwhile, Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the No. 2 House Republican, used a speech on his legislative priorities beyond the fights over deficit reduction to try to soften his party's position on immigration. Speaking at a research group downtown, he explicitly embraced offering illegal immigrants brought to the United States as children a pathway to legal residency and citizenship, a position he had opposed. And he endorsed in broad terms a comprehensive overhaul of the nation's immigration laws."I'm pleased these discussions make border security, employment verification and creating a workable guest worker program an immediate priority. It's the right thing to do for our families, for our security, and for our economy," Mr. Cantor said. But he warned, "There are some who would rather avoid fixing the problem in order to save this as a political issue."Representative Raúl R. Labrador, Republican of Idaho, also challenged immigration advocates on the question of a political versus policy victory."If we want a political solution, you guys are going to insist on a pathway to citizenship," he said. "You're going to beat Republicans over the head on this issue. But if we want a policy solution, I think there's good will here in the House of Representatives for us to come together, actually pass a pragmatic solution to the current problem that we have, and solve and modernize the immigration system for years to come."In a flurry of immigration legislation offered in recent days in the House, a bipartisan group of lawmakers, led by Representative Jerrold Nadler, Democrat of New York, introduced a bill on Tuesday that would allow American citizens with foreign-born same-sex spouses or partners to obtain permanent resident visas, known as green cards, for them. Mr. Nadler's proposal would allow a well-established same-sex couple to apply for a green card, avoiding any direct challenge to a federal law that bans recognition of gay marriage.
MISSOULA, Mont. — This funky college town, nestled along two rivers where five mountain ranges converge, has long been a liberal pocket, an isolated speck of blue in a deeply red state. Now Montana is electing more politicians who lean that way, thanks to a different-minded generation of young voters animated by the recession and social issues.Sam Thompson, a 22-year-old environmental studies major at the University of Montana here, considers himself "fiscally conservative" but opposes cuts to Medicare; he expects to need health coverage when he grows old. Aaron Curtis, 27, a graduate student, admired Jon Huntsman, a moderate Republican, but could not stomach Mitt Romney's opposition to same-sex marriage.Billie Loewen and Heather Jurva, editors at the student newspaper, speak of a Depression-era mentality that is pushing their generation to back Democrats. Saddled with student debt, they worry about health care and are terrified that they will not find good jobs; Ms. Jurva has worked 40 hours a week waiting on tables to put herself through school. "You might be just one accident away from losing everything," said Ms. Loewen.It is no secret that young voters tilt left on social issues like immigration and gay rights. But these students, and dozens of other young people interviewed here last week, give voice to a trend that is surprising pollsters and jangling the nerves of Republicans. On a central philosophical question of the day — the size and scope of the federal government — a clear majority of young people embraces President Obama's notion that it can be a constructive force, a point he intends to make in his State of the Union address on Tuesday."Young people absolutely believe that there's a role for government," said Matt Singer, a founder of Forward Montana, a left-leaning though officially nonpartisan group that seeks to engage young people in politics. "At the same time, this is not a generation of socialists. They are highly entrepreneurial, and know that some of what it takes to create an environment where they can do their own exciting, creative things is having basic systems that work."Here in Montana, a state that backed John McCain in 2008 and Mr. Romney last year, voters under 30 have helped elect two Democratic senators and a new Democratic governor. Nationally, young voters have since 2004 been casting their ballots for Democrats by far wider margins than previous young generations — a shift that could reshape American politics for decades.Under-30 voters are "the only age group in which a majority said the government should do more to fix problems," the nonpartisan Pew Research Center reported in November. In a Pew survey a year earlier, more than 8 in 10 said they believed that Social Security and Medicare had been good for the country, and they were especially supportive of seeing the programs overhauled so they would be intact when they retire. (Young people were also more open than their elders to privatizing the programs.)And while Washington fights about how to cut the federal deficit, young voters believe that it is more important to create jobs, have affordable access to health care and develop "a world-class education system," according to the Institute of Politics at Harvard.Those sentiments were borne out in interviews here. When Forward Montana convened a focus group at a Missoula cafe to develop a "youth agenda" last week, the deficit did not register a mention. One attendee, Michael Graef, an 18-year-old who started a fitness business rather than attend college, said he rarely thought about the deficit."Education is top on my list," he said. "If everybody is better educated, most of the other issues can work themselves out."Steve Bullock, the new Democratic governor, won after campaigning on a promise to freeze college tuition. Young voters also helped Senator Jon Tester, another Democrat, who narrowly ousted a Republican incumbent in 2006 and won re-election last year. Both times, polls stayed open hours past their official closing time to accommodate huge lines of students. Both times, Forward Montana ran huge voter registration drives — an effort that may "pay really big dividends" for Democrats in the future, said Christopher Muste, a political scientist here.The victories rattled Republican state lawmakers, who are now trying to undo a Montana law that permits voters to register on Election Day. Republicans say last-minute registration creates long lines and confusion.On campus here last week, dozens of students crowded into a stuffy conference room to hear Jorge Quintana, a Democrat and chief counsel to the Montana secretary of state, warn that their "voting rights are under attack."Nationally, voters under 30 accounted for 19 percent of the electorate last year, up from 18 percent in 2008. These millennials are by far the most ethnically and racially diverse voter cohort; whites account for just 58 percent of them, according to the Pew center, while 76 percent of older voters are white.That diversity is partly why young voters skew liberal, said Scott Keeter, the center's director of survey research. As more young people come of age, the electorate will grow more diverse. Unless Republicans break the bonds between Democrats and minorities, Mr. Keeter said, "this alignment is going to be baked into the younger generation."Kristen Soltis Anderson, who studies young voters for the Winston Group, which advises House Republicans, said her party ignores young voters at its peril. She sees "a real risk" that Republicans could lose millennials in the coming years.
WASHINGTON — President Obama 's nonconfrontational tone on an immigration overhaul in his State of the Union address on Tuesday night probably did more to advance the issue, lawmakers said, than if had he offered a fierce rallying cry, as he did about gun restrictions.As senators gathered Wednesday for the first hearing on the proposed sweeping changes in immigration law, they said the president's decision to give members of both parties room to maneuver on the delicate politics of immigration was a strategic choice that could pay off as negotiations continued."He's walking a tightrope here, trying to allow Congress on a bipartisan basis to come up with a comprehensive immigration reform bill in the Senate," said Senator Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, the No. 2 Senate Democrat. "He encouraged us, told us he doesn't want this to drag on forever, and if we can't get it done he'll play more forceful role."Mr. Durbin, a member of a bipartisan group of eight senators working on an immigration bill, added, "The reason he's on this tightrope is the Republicans don't want to make it appear that they are bending to the president on this issue."Influential Republicans praised Mr. Obama as well. Representative Paul D. Ryan of Wisconsin, the party's vice-presidential nominee last year, said the president's tone on immigration was measured and constructive."I thought on immigration he used the right words and the right tone, which tells me he actually doesn't want to politicize this, which is conducive to getting something done," Mr. Ryan said.Given their losses in the Congressional elections in November, Republicans in both the House and Senate have demonstrated a new openness to immigration changes that could lead to legal residency for millions who have entered the country illegally. At the same time, polls have shown that the president's involvement in the debate decreases Republican support.White House officials said the president was just as aggressive on immigration as he was on firearms, though his appeal for changes in gun laws was one of the emotional peaks of the night.Cecilia Muñoz, director of the White House Domestic Policy Council, said immigration was "an issue on which we expect an outcome and we expect it soon."The president, who most recently laid out his own immigration principles in a January speech in Las Vegas, told Congress on Tuesday night that "the time has come to pass comprehensive immigration reform." It was a refrain he repeated several times to applause.Mr. Obama proceeded to highlight what he believed are the three goals of any immigration deal — ensuring that the borders are secure, creating a meaningful path to citizenship, and overhauling the system to deal with legal immigration. But when talking about immigration, he seemed to lack the emotional resonance, not to mention the forceful call to action, that he exhibited when discussing gun control, where he exhorted the country to remember that all victims of gun violence "deserve a vote."Which may have been exactly the point.Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, began his remarks at Wednesday's hearing by thanking the president for his State of the Union comments on immigration."His remarks last night on immigration were just right," Mr. Schumer said. "He importuned us to act, he stated how important it was to get this done for the future of America, but at the same time he did not make it a wedge issue. He made it clear that we had to act in a bipartisan way and gave us, in our little group, the space to come up with a bipartisan proposal, which we know is really our only hope."Senator Jeff Flake, Republican of Arizona, and a member of the bipartisan group, said he had "no complaints — actually I thought it was good for the process.""If he were to be seen as leading the effort, it likely wouldn't be that helpful," Mr. Flake said. "But to say that he'll sign the bill we put on his desk, that's helpful."The hearing focused largely on border security and enforcement, with an entire panel devoted to just one witness — Secretary Janet Napolitano of the Department of Homeland Security. Ms. Napolitano said that border security was often used as an excuse to prevent meaningful changes.But in a glimpse of the debate to come, Ms. Napolitano met resistance from key Republicans — including Senator Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa, the committee's ranking member, and Senator John Cornyn, Republican of Texas — over enforcement. "I do not believe that the border is secure," Mr. Cornyn said. "And I still believe we have a long, long way to go."The four Democratic senators in the bipartisan group — Senators Michael Bennet of Colorado and Robert Menendez of New Jersey, as well as Mr. Durbin and Mr. Schumer — were to meet with Mr. Obama at the White House on Wednesday evening to discuss the group's progress. They hope to introduce their legislation in March.
WASHINGTON — The White House is working on early drafts of a comprehensive bill that would offer 11 million illegal immigrants a pathway to citizenship along the lines of the principles that the president laid out in Las Vegas several weeks ago, administration officials said.President Obama revealed last month that his administration had already drafted immigration legislation. But he said he preferred to let a bipartisan coalition of lawmakers work out their own bill that could also tighten border security and provide employers with a way to verify the citizenship status of workers.White House aides said that Mr. Obama remained pleased with the progress being made on Capitol Hill toward a complete overhaul of the nation's immigration system. But they said he would be prepared to submit legislation if the effort among lawmakers stalls."The president has made clear the principles upon which he believes any common-sense immigration reform effort should be based," Clark Stevens, a White House spokesman, said in a statement. "We continue to work in support of a bipartisan effort, and while the president has made clear he will move forward if Congress fails to act, progress continues to be made and the administration has not prepared a final bill to submit."On Saturday, USA Today reported that it had obtained portions of the president's draft legislation. The newspaper said the bill would allow illegal immigrants to become permanent residents within eight years and in the meantime apply for a "Lawful Prospective Immigrant" visa. Mr. Stevens and other White House officials declined to comment on specific details of the report.Those details are similar to the statement of principles that the White House provided to reporters after Mr. Obama's Las Vegas speech. A fact sheet said the president wanted to strengthen border security, provide "earned citizenship," streamline legal immigration and crack down on employers who knowingly hire illegal immigrants."Immigrants living here illegally must be held responsible for their actions by passing national security and criminal background checks, paying taxes and a penalty, going to the back of the line, and learning English before they can earn their citizenship," the fact sheet said. "There will be no uncertainty about their ability to become U.S. citizens if they meet these eligibility criteria."In a statement late Saturday night, Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, criticized Mr. Obama, saying that the details reported in the USA Today article represented legislation that "is half-baked and seriously flawed.""It would actually make our immigration problems worse," he said. Mr. Rubio, who has been among the leading Republicans pushing for a comprehensive overhaul of immigration, predicted that a bill like the one reported would be "dead on arrival in Congress."But Demetrios G. Papademetriou, president of the Migration Policy Institute, an independent nonpartisan research center in Washington, said the eight-year temporary status for illegal immigrants in the document obtained by USA Today was "essentially the same as the probationary status" envisioned in a proposal developed by a bipartisan group of eight senators. During that probationary period, Mr. Papademetriou said, immigrants would have temporary visas with full work authorization.The bipartisan Senate proposal calls for additional border security and more effective enforcement to curb illegal immigration. And it would require that "enforcement measures be complete before any immigrant on probationary status can earn a green card." It was not immediately clear whether the White House would support such linkage.Mr. Obama's administration has been working on immigration legislation for years. But the issue shot to the top of the president's second-term agenda after his re-election in November, when Hispanic voters backed him in large numbers. White House officials are betting that Republicans will be eager to embrace immigration changes as a way of repairing their image with an important voting bloc.But getting legislation passed remains tricky, especially in the Republican-controlled House, and Mr. Obama has made it clear he will take a back seat to lawmakers if it will help. Negotiations are taking place among a bipartisan group of senators, a separate group in the House, and labor leaders and the U.S. Chamber of Commerce.Representative Paul D. Ryan, Republican of Wisconsin, praised Mr. Obama's tone on the issue last week, saying the president "actually doesn't want to politicize this, which is conducive to getting something done."On Wednesday, the White House said Mr. Obama met with Democratic senators at the White House to get a status report on the pace of progress on the legislation. In a statement after the meeting, White House officials said the president reiterated his pledge to become more involved if necessary.The statement said Mr. Obama told them "he expects the process to continue to move forward and stands ready to introduce his own legislation if Congress fails to act."It remains unclear how long the president is willing to wait. In interviews with Spanish-language television stations after his speech last month, Mr. Obama suggested that he wanted to see real progress by March, when lawmakers had said they hoped to have reached an agreement."If they can get a piece of legislation debated on the floor by March I think that's a good timeline. And I think that can be accomplished," he said on Univision last month. "I'm not going to lay down a particular date because I want to give them a little bit of room to debate. If it slips a week, that's one thing. If it starts slipping three months, that's a problem."
LOS ANGELES — A generation ago, California voters approved a ballot initiative that was seen as the most anti-immigrant law in the nation. Immigrants who had come to the country illegally would be ineligible to receive prenatal care, and their children would be barred from public schools.But the law, which was later declared unconstitutional by the federal courts, never achieved the goal of its backers: to turn back the tide of immigrants pouring into the state. Instead, since the law was approved in 1994, the political and social reality has changed drastically across the state. Now, more California residents than ever before say that immigrants are a benefit to the state, according to public opinion polls from the Public Policy Institute of California.As Congress begins debating an overhaul of the immigration system, many in California sense that the country is just now beginning to go through the same evolution the state experienced over the last two decades. For a generation of Republicans, Gov. Pete Wilson's barrages on the impact of immigration in the 1990s spoke to their uneasiness with the way the state was changing. Now many California Republicans point to that as the beginning of their downfall.Today, party leaders from both sides, and from all over the state, are calling for a softer approach and a wholesale change in federal policies.The state's changing attitudes are driven, in large part, by demographics. In 1990, Latinos made up 30 percent of the state's population; they will make up 40 percent — more than any other ethnic group — by the end of this year, and 48 percent by 2050, according to projections made by the state this month. This year, for the first time, Latinos were the largest ethnic group applying to the University of California system.Towns that just a decade ago were largely white now have Latino majorities. Latinos make up an important power base not only in urban centers like Los Angeles, but also in places that were once hostile to outsiders. There are dozens of city councils with a majority of Latino members, a Mexican-American is the mayor of Los Angeles and another is the leader of the State Assembly. Nearly all of the 15 California Republicans in Congress represent districts where at least a quarter of the residents are Latino."The political calculus has changed dramatically," said Manuel Pastor, a demographer and professor of American studies at the University of Southern California. "Immigrants are an accepted part of public life here. And California is America fast-forward. What happened to our demographics between 1980 and 2000 is almost exactly what will happen to the rest of the country over the next 30 years."Proposition 187, the 1994 ballot initiative, prompted thousands of immigrants to register to vote and ignited a generation of activists, including dozens who now hold public office or run immigrant rights organizations that lobby for change in federal laws."The fact that the Republican Party got identified with anti-immigration has made things very difficult for them," said Mark Baldassare, the president of the Public Policy Institute of California, which closely monitors shifts in the state. "It is what is going on nationally now, but California started much earlier."He continued: "Today, you would really be hard pressed to even think of a group that would come out in favor of putting that on the ballot, let alone something that would gain traction or be endorsed by a major party. It seems voters have moved on to looking for solutions to something they recognize as an ongoing situation here."Most political observers say California is nowhere near the end of its political transformation. The share of white voters, who tend to be older, is expected to continue to decrease, while Latinos and Asians will make up more of the electorate."The question for the party is, Where are you going to get your new voters from?" Mr. Baldassare said of Republicans.Even in Orange County, widely seen as the most reliably conservative bastion in the state, Republican officials are changing their tone. Scott Baugh, the chairman of the county party, said that if the language did not change, his party would be relegated to permanent minority status.
Not long ago, Brandon Perlberg had a growing law practice and a Manhattan apartment he shared with his partner, who is British. They hosted themed dinner parties and wine tastings for a wide circle of friends.But Mr. Perlberg, an American who is gay, now lives in London. Early last year he reluctantly left his law firm, rented out his apartment and said goodbye to friends. After nearly seven years in the United States on legal but temporary visas, his partner had not been able to obtain a visa as a permanent resident. The two were facing the possibility of permanent separation.Americans with a foreign-born spouse of the opposite sex are able to get them resident visas, or green cards, with relative ease. But federal law does not allow Americans to petition for green cards for same-sex spouses or partners. Eventually, they face a choice of remaining in the country with the immigrant here illegally or leaving the United States."Ultimately, we resolved that staying together was the most important thing for us," Mr. Perlberg said. "And the only way to guarantee that we got to stay together was by making this move."Mr. Perlberg is part of a diaspora of gay Americans who have found they had to uproot and leave the country to continue to live with foreign partners. And this year, binational gay couples like his are a new — and controversial — focus of the debate in Washington on an ambitious overhaul of immigration laws. In a blueprint that President Obama presented last month, he pledged to give citizens, and also immigrants who are legal residents, the ability to petition for a green card for a same-sex foreign partner, if they can show they have "a permanent relationship."The Supreme Court will also take up same-sex issues this year, with hearings in March on two cases that challenge the definition of marriage as being a union between only a man and a woman. One case deals directly with a 1996 statute, the Defense of Marriage Act, that prohibits the federal government from recognizing same-sex marriage and governs the exclusion of gay couples from visas and other immigration benefits.The politics of same-sex marriage are rapidly shifting, with polls showing Americans viewing it increasingly favorably but still divided. Many Republican voters strongly oppose it. Leading Republican lawmakers have questioned whether Congress should include such a hotly disputed issue in the debate when it will also wrangle with giving legal status to 11 million illegal immigrants."There are so many other, bigger issues the Congress has to resolve in immigration reform before we would even get to a point where we would be discussing a change to a longstanding policy like this," said Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, the highest-ranking Republican on the Senate Judiciary Committee, which is working to prepare immigration legislation.The restrictions in the marriage act, known as DOMA, have a direct impact on Americans with foreign-born spouses or partners who want to live in the United States."A straight couple living in the U.S. can apply for a green card based on their spousal relationship," said Rachel B. Tiven, the executive director of Immigration Equality, a legal advocacy group focusing on gay men and lesbians. "Gay couples simply can't do that."For the first time, in Mr. Obama's blueprint, same-sex couples have been included in a comprehensive framework for immigration legislation.The president "has long believed that Americans with same-sex partners from other countries should not be faced with the painful choice between staying with the person they love or staying in the country they love," the White House spokesman, Jay Carney, said when Mr. Obama announced his plan in Las Vegas on Jan. 29.The president's proposal was echoed in a bill introduced last week in the Senate by Patrick J. Leahy of Vermont, a Democrat who is the Judiciary Committee chairman, and Susan Collins of Maine, a Republican. A similar bill was introduced in the House of Representatives this month.Mr. Perlberg, 34, has been following the debate in Washington from the apartment in London where he landed with his partner, Benn Robert Storey, 31. In a telephone interview, they recalled that Mr. Storey had never felt like an exile during the years they lived together in New York. A graphic designer, Mr. Storey already had a job and a work visa lined up when he moved to the United States."I did not feel like a British person in New York, I felt like a New Yorker," Mr. Storey said. "And during that time, my relationship with Brandon grew stronger and stronger."
WASHINGTON — A plan by President Obama for an overhaul of the immigration system would put illegal immigrants on a path to citizenship that could begin after about eight years and would require them to go to the back of the line behind legal applicants, according to a draft of the legislation that the White House has circulated in the administration.The draft plan says none of the 11 million illegal immigrants currently in the country would be granted permanent resident status and given a document known as a green card until the earlier of two dates: either eight years after the bill is enacted or 30 days after visas have been given to everyone who applied legally.The plan includes a shortened path to citizenship for young illegal immigrants who came to the United States as children, said an administration official who agreed to discuss the details only on the condition of anonymity. In many cases, those young people could apply for green cards as soon as two years after the law was passed.The disclosure of the document's existence, by USA Today on Saturday, set off a series of political recriminations and questions on Sunday about Mr. Obama's promise to allow bipartisan Congressional talks to take precedence. The furor also offered new evidence that Republicans could use the president's direct involvement as a reason to reject a potential compromise.The White House on Wednesday sent copies of the draft to officials in government agencies that deal with immigration and border security, the administration official said. In the face of the sharp Republican criticism, the administration insisted this weekend that no decision had been made and that nothing had changed. White House aides reached out to lawmakers in both parties on Saturday night to reassure them, officials said.Denis McDonough, the president's top White House aide, said on Sunday that Mr. Obama remained committed to staying on the sidelines while a group of Republican and Democratic senators tries to reach an immigration agreement by the spring. In his first appearances on Sunday talk shows as chief of staff, Mr. McDonough said the administration was preparing draft legislation only as a backup."We've not proposed anything to Capitol Hill yet," he said on the ABC program "This Week." "We're going to be ready. We have developed each of these proposals so we have them in a position so that we can succeed."His comments came after Republicans quickly condemned the reports of a new administration plan, calling it "dead on arrival" and "very counterproductive."Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, issued a statement late Saturday calling the president's reported legislation "half-baked and seriously flawed." He said its approval "would actually make our immigration problems worse." Mr. Rubio has been among the leading Republicans pushing for a comprehensive overhaul of the immigration process.On Sunday, Representative Paul D. Ryan of Wisconsin, another Republican calling for immigration changes, said on "This Week" that the president's efforts to develop his own legislation would undermine efforts on Capitol Hill and were taking "things in the wrong direction."Aides to Mr. Obama have been working on immigration legislation for years in anticipation of a renewed push. Mr. McDonough did not confirm which specific proposals would be in the president's bill if he presented one to Congress, but said that if lawmakers could not reach an agreement, everyone would find out.Mr. Rubio "says it's dead on arrival if proposed," Mr. McDonough said. "Well, let's make sure that it doesn't have to be proposed. Let's make sure that that group up there, the gang of eight, makes some good progress on these efforts, as much as they say they want to, and that's exactly what we intend to do, to work with them."The back-and-forth was a blunt reminder that Mr. Obama remains a polarizing figure as the two parties seek common ground on an emotional issue that has defied resolution for more than two decades.According to the White House draft, which elaborates on principles that Mr. Obama unveiled several weeks ago, illegal immigrants would have to wait at least eight years before they could apply for green cards, the first step on the path to citizenship, unless the backlogs were cleared earlier. After receiving a green card, immigrants are generally eligible to become naturalized citizens after five years.
Immigration Debate Hits Home: Ashley Parker reports on John McCain's push for an immigration overhaul in Washington while facing strong resistance at home in Arizona.WASHINGTON — The political risks of supporting an immigration overhaul have long been apparent to Senator John McCain , as evidenced by his evolving position on the topic over the years. This week offered another sharp reminder of what getting out in front of the issue can mean when crowds at back-to-back town-hall-style meetings in Arizona turned hostile toward Mr. McCain's plan to introduce legislation that could lead to legal residency for some who broke the law in entering the country."Everybody in this audience, you're taking away from Social Security to give it to a dependent class of people," shouted one man, who Mr. McCain eventually called "a jerk."The senator, the 2008 Republican presidential nominee, said he was undergoing "an Orwellian experience" as his constituents shouted that he needed to build the "dang fence" that he had once promised in a notable campaign ad. Attendees also suggested that guns were the only way to stop the influx of immigrants from coming across the border.Like it or not, Mr. McCain is now back at the center of the immigration debate, sharing the spotlight with Arizona's other senator, Jeff Flake, also a Republican, as the two men help fight to overhaul the nation's immigration system. Longtime followers of the immigration debate could be forgiven for having déjà vu.After all, the sight of the two Arizonans taking the lead on the divisive issue feels a lot like 2007, when Mr. McCain and Mr. Flake, then a member of the House, were each co-sponsors of their own immigration proposal. Mr. McCain that year pressed his broad plan with Senator Edward M. Kennedy, Democrat of Massachusetts, and Mr. Flake joined with Representative Luis V. Gutierrez, Democrat of Illinois, to introduce a plan to tighten border security while giving illegal immigrants a chance for legal residency.Then Mr. Flake and Mr. McCain did something of an Arizona shuffle, trading in their calls for a broad overhaul that could lead to legal residency to focus more on border security. During a 2008 Republican presidential primary debate, Mr. McCain disavowed his own 2006 immigration proposal, and Mr. Flake, facing a challenge from the right during his Senate bid last year, called his previous broad approach to immigration reform "a dead end" until the border was secure.Now the two senators are back as Republican point men on the issue. Though their hope of overhauling the nation's immigration system in 2007 died on the Senate floor, the two have returned to the negotiating table, with the goal of finishing what they started."If you're from Arizona and you're not involved in trying to fix the immigration problem, then it's tough to say you're representing your state," said Mr. Flake in an interview. "You ought to be involved. I understand that some people don't agree with the direction I want to go, but you've got to be involved."Mr. Flake and Mr. McCain are part of a bipartisan group of eight senators working to produce legislation by the end of March. The two other senators making up the group's Republican half are Lindsey Graham of South Carolina and Marco Rubio of Florida.But the Arizona senators' journey has involved fits and starts. Facing a primary challenge in 2010 from J. D. Hayworth, a conservative and former talk-radio host, Mr. McCain switched his focus from a comprehensive approach to border security, running an ad that ended with him walking along the state's border and declaring, "Complete the dang fence."During Mr. Flake's Senate race two years later, he similarly doubled down on border security."Those of us who have been pushing this for a decade, we ran into a brick wall, again and again," Mr. Flake said, explaining his 2012 stance. "And I think all of us recognized the political reality, that unless we addressed the border situation, then we don't have the political oomph to get it across the line."Critics say the men acted out of political expediency and gave in to pressure from the right, reneging on calls for an immigration overhaul in favor of the more politically safe option of simply securing the border."Until this year, you simply could not run for office here without taking a hard right stand on immigration and have any hope of winning a primary," said Clint Bolick, who has written a book on immigration with former Gov. Jeb Bush of Florida that is being published next month. "The instinct is not to leave any room on your right on immigration, and certainly McCain and Flake did that, notwithstanding their previous positions."Mr. Flake and Mr. McCain, however, said their constituents would never have accepted a full-scale immigration bill until they first believed the border was secure. Now, they explain, not only is the border safer, but any plan they endorse will have border security "triggers" that must be met before any pathway to citizenship — a key component for most Democrats — can begin."I said we've got to secure the border, and I'm saying that now," Mr. McCain said. "I think border security has improved considerably, and I think that's caused a change in attitude."Immigration advocates are eager to welcome Mr. McCain and Mr. Flake back to the fold."McCain and Flake have not only an enlightened view of how to solve this problem, but they also have the most practical view of how to solve this problem," said Frank Sharry, president of America's Voice, which supports giving legal status to illegal immigrants. "So I think they decided, 'Yes, we tacked to the right when the G.O.P. in Arizona went a little crazy, but now is the time to craft a solution that voters will understand once they see that it works.' "Mr. Sharry, who remembers the two senators' past immigration efforts as "what you imagined in high school civics class," said that Mr. Flake and Mr. McCain seemed to have come full circle on their promise of an immigration overhaul."If these guys hadn't come back, I don't think we'd been having this conversation today," Mr. Sharry said.Mr. Flake said for him, the issue was personal. "I grew up on a ranch, on a farm, in Northern Arizona, and I worked alongside mostly Mexican labor," he said. "And since that time, since I was a kid, I've never been able to lump all those who come across the border in the same class, in the criminal class."Mr. Flake, who moved to the Senate last month, says he is still in touch with his former House colleagues and plans to be active in urging them to get behind broad immigration legislation.Referring to Republican losses in November, Mr. Flake said: "There's nothing like a bad election to focus the mind. We've been involved in this because we thought it was the best policy, but now if people aren't willing to do it for the policy, they may be willing to do it for the politics."
WASHINGTON — In an effort to avert the bitter and public feuding between business and labor organizations that helped kill a broad immigration overhaul in 2007, representatives of the two groups released a statement on Thursday outlining shared goals designed to show that at least for now, they could reach a basic level of compromise.In the statement, signed by Thomas J. Donohue, president of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, and Richard L. Trumka, president of the A.F.L.-C.I.O., the groups called for a visa system that would let businesses meet their demand for lower-skilled workers, while offering protections for American workers.The statement called for the creation of a government bureau that would use "real-world data about labor markets and demographics" to fashion a guest worker program — an idea that the Chamber had until recently opposed. The statement also described "a new kind of worker visa program that does not keep all workers in a permanent temporary status" — language that seems to imply, at least generally, the possibility of a pathway to legalization or even  citizenship for some guest workers.The groups articulated three general goals: the assurance that American workers would have "a first crack at available jobs"; a new visa program for lower-skilled workers that would be adjusted to reflect the changing needs of businesses as the economy shrinks and expands; and greater transparency in determining the market need for temporary workers.Traditionally, labor unions have rejected the idea of a guest worker program for lower-skilled workers, which they fear could take jobs away from American workers and depress wages. Business leaders have lobbied for a guest worker program, arguing that they need low-skilled labor for jobs — in agriculture, for instance — that American workers cannot or will not do. (A leaked draft of the president's immigration proposal said nothing about a guest worker program, perhaps a tacit acknowledgment that the White House was looking to labor and business leaders to forge their own agreement on the issue.)The principles outlined on Thursday — the product of months of negotiations between the groups — required compromise from both sides. Labor unions, acknowledging that "there are instances — even during tough economic times — when employers are not able to fill job openings with American workers," agreed that there may be a need for a new type of guest worker program. In return, the unions insisted that American workers get a first shot at open jobs, and they secured an agreement that the number of incoming lower-skilled workers would be set based on need.But even as there appears to be a growing consensus on some issues, a full-scale immigration overhaul remains a far-off prospect. This week, Representative Robert W. Goodlatte, Republican of Virginia and the chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, came out against a pathway to citizenship for illegal immigrants — a crucial component for Democrats for any immigration plan."People have a pathway to citizenship right now: It's to abide by the immigration laws, and if they have a family relationship, if they have a job skill that allows them to do that, they can obtain citizenship," Mr. Goodlatte told NPR. "But simply someone who broke the law, came here, say, 'I'll give you citizenship now,' that I don't think is going to happen."
WASHINGTON — As President Obama intensifies his campaign for a broad overhaul of the nation's immigration system, advocates for America's 11 million illegal immigrants are stepping up demands that he stop what has become one of the most aggressive and efficient efforts in decades to round up and deport people who are in the United States unlawfully.In four years, Mr. Obama's administration has deported as many illegal immigrants as the administration of George W. Bush did in his two terms, largely by embracing, expanding and refining Bush-era programs to find people and send them home. By the end of this year, deportations under Mr. Obama are on track to reach two million, or nearly the same number of deportations in the United States from 1892 to 1997.That effort has helped Mr. Obama lay claim to being tough on illegal immigration, giving him some added credibility with conservatives as he calls for an overhaul of the system by the summer. But it has also left him caught between powerful and impassioned political forces at a critical moment in the immigration debate.Although critics have long cited lax enforcement as a reason to oppose giving illegal immigrants a way to become legal residents, activists say the deportation policy has become an unfair and indiscriminate dragnet that is forcing people out of the country at exactly the wrong moment — when the promise of eventual United States citizenship could be around the corner."Enforcing a broken system aggressively right before we're about to change it is not just not compassionate, it's cruel," said Jim Wallis, the chief executive of Sojourners, a Christian social action group. "If you are breaking up families because of politics, we're going to speak out against you."Administration officials insist that the government has worked hard over the last four years to make deporting criminals the top priority, while allowing law enforcement officers more discretion on deciding whom to send home. They say the perception of a huge crackdown is erroneous and misleading."We focused on smart, effective enforcement that prioritizes the removal of criminal aliens, recent border crossers and egregious immigration law violators," said Matthew Chandler, a spokesman for the Department of Homeland Security.But those claims are disputed by immigrant activists, who say that many of those being deported have done nothing wrong except to enter the country illegally. Since 2010, the government has deported more than 200,000 parents of children who are United States citizens, according to a recent report."Our communities are being torn apart for minor offenses," said Lorella Praeli, the director of advocacy and policy at United We Dream, the largest network of young immigrants here illegally. She pointed to a case last month in Arizona, where the mother of a young immigration activist was detained and put on a bus for deportation before an outcry on social media got her case turned around. "We expect more leadership from the president on this issue."For Mr. Obama, the rising anger about deportations is an echo of what happened last summer, when activists focused on the plight of illegal immigrants who had come to the United States as young children. Fighting for re-election, the president deferred the removal of the young people from the country.Now, the same activists are pressing the president and his top advisers to expand the deferrals to a much broader cross-section of illegal immigrants. Representatives of several groups pushed the idea in an online chat with Mr. Obama's top domestic policy adviser this month. And the president was confronted directly in two recent interviews with Spanish-language television networks and during another online chat."In the spirit of your push for immigration reform, would you consider a moratorium on deportations of noncriminals?" María Elena Salinas of Univision asked Mr. Obama last month.The president said he could not, reflecting a belief among top White House aides and their allies in Washington that a large reduction in deportations would enrage Republicans in Congress and doom any hope for a bipartisan immigration overhaul this year.Senator John McCain of Arizona said recently that there had been "real improvements" in immigration enforcement efforts, including more security at the border, and that "it helps a lot" in the fight for immigration legislation this year. Administration officials said that kind of praise might evaporate if deportations suddenly stopped.In a White House meeting with immigration activists this month, Mr. Obama said a moratorium on deportations would go beyond what he could legally do and would undermine the legislative efforts, according to several of those present. Angela Maria Kelley, the vice president for immigration policy at the Center for American Progress, said some of the activists were being unrealistic.
SANTA FE, N.M. — If there is one trait of Gov. Susana Martinez, a Republican, that irks lawmakers on the opposite side of the aisle, it is her reluctance to negotiate. Ms. Martinez handles the Legislature in much the same way that she made a name for herself as a county prosecutor — a tough-as-nails approach that helped carry her all the way to the state's highest government post.On one of the defining issues of her tenure, the fight to repeal the state's law allowing illegal immigrants to get a driver's license, her persistence — or intransigence, depending on whom you ask — may have paid off. She immediately embraced a bipartisan bill introduced on Feb. 13 that would do just that; though to hear her tell it, she also gave in by supporting an alternate driver's license for young immigrants benefiting from deferred deportation.Ms. Martinez's spokesman called it a "very reasonable compromise." It comes at a perfect time for the governor, who is about to travel the country as an envoy of the Republican Party, recruiting Latinos to run for office or, at the very least, to give the party a second chance. (Gov. Brian Sandoval of Nevada has also been drafted for the same role.)Ms. Martinez, 53, is by many measures the ideal ambassador: accomplished, charming and not afraid to speak her mind. She took office in 2011 as the nation's first Latina governor, a distinction that alone qualifies her as a role model. In New Mexico, though, she has faced steady and increasingly vociferous criticism over the disconnect between the tone of her pronouncements and the substance of her policies.While Ms. Martinez deplored Mitt Romney's suggestion of "self-deportation" as a solution to illegal immigration, she also directed police officers in New Mexico to inquire about the immigration status of those arrested, a move described by one immigrants' advocate as "our mini S.B. 1070," a reference to Arizona's restrictive immigration law.While she has promoted economic recovery as one of her major goals, Ms. Martinez has almost single-handedly fought for repealing the driver's license law. And all along she has refused to entertain any deals."The governor is very good at staying on message, but she doesn't have a diverse message," said State Senator John Arthur Smith, a conservative Democrat from southern New Mexico and a sponsor of the driver's license bill endorsed by Ms. Martinez. "The risk for her is that people can get tired of it."Ms. Martinez said she keeps a list of the promises she made during her election campaign and puts check marks next to those she has fulfilled."I don't waver from them," she said during an interview in her office here, and then went on to recite her foremost accomplishments: raising the state's dismal high school graduation rate by 7 points, to 70 percent; eliminating a locomotive fuel tax, which was decisive in luring the Union Pacific Railroad from El Paso to southeastern New Mexico, where it is building a $400 million hub; and promoting a program that has made it easier for trucks from Mexico to unload their cargo in New Mexico, resulting in record-setting traffic at two of the state's border-crossing ports.Ms. Martinez has shepherded legislation creating a letter-grading system for the state's schools, and last week she scored a victory when the New Mexico House approved a budget that includes a merit-pay system for teachers, another element of her sweeping overhaul efforts. Still, New Mexico has lingered in the bottom five states in student achievement, even though it ranks 18th in the country in per-pupil spending.Despite her efforts to diversify the economy, the state registered year-over-year job losses every month since June — the worst record in the nation, according to estimates from the federal Bureau of Labor Statistics.Ms. Martinez is promoting a $65 million package that includes tax credits for small businesses for each worker hired and retained, and a business tax cut of almost three percentage points so New Mexico's rate would match that of neighboring Arizona. But leaders in the Legislature's Democratic majority say the proposal does not go far enough.There is a lot of bad blood circulating in the Legislature this year after a combative campaign season, fueled in large part by stinging ads focused on incumbents who stood in the way of legislation the governor supported.The effort to repeal the driver's license law drove a wedge in a body that is usually collegial. Last year, Ms. Martinez's political action committee, Susana PAC, attacked two top Democrats, Timothy Jennings, the Senate president pro tem, and Michael Sanchez, the Senate majority leader, for supporting the 2003 law that allowed illegal immigrants to obtain a driver's license.Mr. Jennings lost his bid for re-election. Mr. Sanchez won. Harvey E. Yates Jr., who was the state Republican chairman when Ms. Martinez was elected and is known for calling things as he sees them, told New Mexico In Depth, an online journalism organization, that her administration had been "a divisive force rather than a uniting force" in the way it handled the Legislature.State Representative Antonio Maestas, an Albuquerque Democrat and the House majority whip, said in an interview that the candidates the governor opposed but who won nonetheless had arrived at the Roundhouse, the state's circular Capitol, "emboldened."
RALEIGH, N.C. — In a move some are calling a modern-day scarlet letter and others say is the best way to manage changing federal immigration policy, North Carolina this month will begin giving some young immigrants driver's licenses marked with a bold pink stripe and the words "no lawful status" printed in red.The licenses were developed as a way for the state to cope with a quirk in the Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals program, which the Obama administration began last year to deal with the as many as 1.7 million young immigrants across the country who were brought to the United States by their parents and have been living here illegally since.Under the program, young people who qualify receive deferrals from deportation for two years. They are no longer illegal, but they do not become fully legal either.While the program allows them work permits, many still need to drive to their jobs. So in January, the federal agency that administers the program determined that immigrants with deferrals were just legal enough to qualify for driver's licenses.Although a majority of states are issuing the licenses, each is choosing a different path. Ohio officials leave it up to individual motor vehicle offices, although two state senators this week introduced a bill to make the licenses mandatory.Michigan officials announced last month that they would hand out licenses after first refusing, a move that had brought a lawsuit from the American Civil Liberties Union and the National Immigration Law Center.The governors of Arizona and Nebraska still will not issue driver's licenses. In February, national legal rights and immigration groups filed a federal class-action lawsuit challenging Arizona's position on constitutional grounds.At first, North Carolina balked, too. When the state's attorney general ruled in January that the licenses were legal, the state Transportation Department devised what officials believed was a way to thread the needle between opposing factions.Gov. Pat McCrory, the newly elected Republican, has called the pink-trimmed licenses "a pragmatic compromise."But for some of the nearly 15,000 people who have applied for status under the deferred action program in North Carolina, the pink-tinged licenses are humiliating. They say the licenses could set them up for more harassment in a state that, like many, is struggling to cope with changing demographics."More than anything, it's that we are already targeted," said Jose Rico, 23, whose parents arrived in the United States from Mexico on a tourist visa when he was 13 and have never left.Mr. Rico is studying engineering at a Durham community college and is part of the N. C. Dream Team, a grass-roots organization of illegal immigrant youth.He worries that with a pink-striped license he will get harassed at bars, banks and airports — the places where people regularly present a driver's license without a second thought."It says right there you have no lawful status, which is true, but you are giving that to people who do not need to know your status," he said. "It only opens us up for more harassment."On Monday, a group of Democratic legislators introduced a bill to make sure that all driver's licenses issued by the state were indistinguishable."It is offensive to me that the governor would put a stigma upon young people who are legal," said State Representative Paul Luebke, Democrat of Durham, one of the bill's sponsors. He is particularly concerned about how the licenses might affect the holder's job prospects."Why should someone who has gone through the process and gotten their papers have to go through hoops to explain to a potential employer exactly who they are because they have a driver's license with a pink stripe on it?" Mr. Luebke said.Some Republican lawmakers opposed to issuing any licenses at all to the young immigrants have introduced their own bills, asking that the licenses not be issued until June, by which time they hope to determine if the governor has stretched his constitutional powers.Members of religious groups in North Carolina have also criticized the state's decision to issue the licenses.When Rabbi John Friedman told members of Judea Reform Congregation in Durham about the new licenses at services Friday, he said he heard an audible gasp. He and other clergy members are encouraging their followers to stick a piece of pink tape on their licenses in solidarity and protest."It's punitive," said the Rev. Richard Edens of the United Church of Chapel Hill. "It just continues a sense of shame and humiliation."North Carolina also plans to issue a new generation of driver's licenses for the entire state by the end of the year. There will be distinguishing marks for other noncitizens, including permanent residents and other visa holders, but it is unclear whether the pink stripes will continue, said Greer Beaty, a spokeswoman for the Transportation Department.
After watching from the sidelines since before President Obama was first elected, Mr. Bush, a former Republican governor of Florida, injected himself into the debate over revamping the nation's immigration system this week — and in the process opened the door just a crack to a 2016 run for the White House.The vehicle for Mr. Bush's return to the national conversation was, as it often is for politicians these days, the publication of a new book. In Mr. Bush's case, the book argues for an overhaul of the nation's immigration system and legal status for illegal immigrants, but not a path to citizenship.Mr. Bush quickly found himself backpedaling from that position on Tuesday. In fact, he told a series of interviewers that he could easily support granting citizenship in the context of a comprehensive approach to immigration."I have supported both — both a path to legalization or a path to citizenship — with the underlying principle being that there should be no incentive for people to come illegally at the expense of coming legally," Mr. Bush said on CNN.His immigration back-and-forth drew scorn from Democrats, who took pleasure in comparing him with another Florida Republican, Senator Marco Rubio, who is at the center of a bipartisan effort to devise an immigration overhaul and who counts Mr. Bush as a mentor."Frankly, on this issue, I don't think Jeb Bush is the Florida leader, I think Marco Rubio is," said Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader. Mr. Reid, who is seldom accused of understatement, said that Mr. Bush had "made a fool of himself" in the last 24 hours."His opinion on immigration is not evolving, it's devolving," Mr. Reid said. "He keeps going backwards."Mr. Bush, who for years was seen as one of the few Republicans who might appeal to Hispanic voters in a presidential campaign, now finds his position overtaken by a party desperate to ingratiate itself with a growing minority. As Mr. Rubio has shown, Mr. Bush is no longer the only Florida politician with a moderate position on immigration, a national profile and presidential ambitions.Jaryn Emhof, Mr. Bush's communications director, said: "Gov. Bush has repeatedly stated his position for a path towards legal status for illegal immigrants. He has said he can support a system that provides a path to citizenship for illegal immigrants, as long as those who have been waiting patiently to enter the country legally receive priority."Ms. Emhof said the book "outlines a set of recommendations designed to bring Republicans to the table and generate bipartisan support for a comprehensive immigration policy."In a series of interviews to promote his book, "Immigration Wars," written with Clint Bolick, Mr. Bush acknowledged that opinion within his party had shifted more quickly than he had expected on the issue of immigration, leaving him to catch up to Mr. Rubio and other Republicans."Remember," Mr. Bush said on NBC, "this is a proposal that we attempted to put out prior to the election, to create a consensus for conservatives to actually get in the game."A quarter-century after his father won the presidency and 13 years after his brother followed suit, Mr. Bush appears ready to at least consider starting a national campaign himself.In most public appearances since leaving the governor's mansion in 2007, Mr. Bush said emphatically that he was not interested in following the family trail to 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue. He declined to run in 2008 and stayed out again in 2012.But now his language has softened."I'm not saying yes, I'm just not saying no," Mr. Bush said on MSNBC. "I've accomplished some things in my life that allow me now to — to have that kind of discretion, to be able to think about it."For some Republicans, Mr. Bush would be the prohibitive favorite if he chose to run for president in four years. And with a political and financial base in Florida, Mr. Bush would probably make it hard — if not impossible — for Mr. Rubio to run at the same time. (The two men heap praise on each other, suggesting that they would not run at the same time.)If Mr. Bush were to run, and win, the Republican nomination, it is possible that he could face Hillary Rodham Clinton as the Democratic nominee. That would set up a second Bush-Clinton race two decades after his father lost re-election to the presidency to Bill Clinton."We're going to face a very formidable opponent on the other side if it's Secretary Clinton," said John Weaver, a Republican consultant who supports moderate candidates. "We have to put our 'A team' out there, and that begins with Jeb Bush."
PORTLAND, Me. — Charlene Masengu left the Democratic Republic of Congo late last year, hoping to get asylum status in the United States after a wave of political violence made life at home unbearably dangerous. She made it to this coastal city last month, just before it was covered in more than 30 inches of snow, and she wondered, briefly, whether she had made a mistake."Deadly!" Ms. Masengu, 29, said in French, shaking her head as she remembered the snowstorm. "I didn't feel good at all. I wanted to leave."Ms. Masengu was squeezed, notebook in hand, into a plain conference room at the city's center for refugee services. She and dozens of others were here to be schooled in a central piece of Portland's cultural curriculum for its growing population of new arrivals, many of whom are asylum-seekers from Central Africa: the art of handling a Maine winter.The instructor, Simeon Alloding, a human services counselor here, sat at the front of the room, ticking off winter's many perils as clip art images of a penguin and an elephant decked out for cold weather hovered in a PowerPoint presentation behind him. "Everyone here has fallen, right?" Mr. Alloding asked as he began a discussion on how to navigate the city's icy sidewalks. "You don't walk too fast, you don't take long steps. You take shorter steps," he said, dispensing advice that even the most seasoned New Englander would do well to remember.The workshop is part of a series of courses that new arrivals here seeking general assistance are required to take. On this slushy morning, there were more attendees than could possibly find seating, and late arrivals clustered around the entrances to the room, many still wrapped in winter coats and hats despite the stifling heat of the room.Northern New England would seem an unlikely destination for immigrants from Central Africa, but many new arrivals — who include a steady number of refugees and a rapidly growing number of asylum seekers, who say they are refugees but whose claims have not yet been evaluated — are drawn here by referrals from family and friends, as well as the relatively low crime rates of this region's small and manageable cities. "Big cities are more challenging, and more terrible to people who have nothing, including language," said Mr. Alloding, who came to Portland himself after leaving Sudan in 1995.Still, for this growing population, winter — especially during stretches like the last several weeks, when heavy snowfalls have come one after another — compounds the difficulties of life as a new arrival. Amel Joudha, an Iraqi refugee who arrived here in mid-February, said she initially stayed in a shelter that provided her with space only in the evening, leaving her to navigate cold streets during the day. "I was sick," Ms. Joudha said, in Arabic. "The streets were icy." She said another Iraqi saw her on the street and took her in; she has since found an apartment.Mr. Alloding asks his students to list the clothing they need to stay warm in frigid conditions."Socks," says Abraham Conde, who is from Nigeria, with some conviction, before Mr. Alloding explained the merits of scarves and the absolute necessity of boots. He showed the class his long johns, peeking out from beneath his sleeves, and reminded his students to send their children into the snow with an extra pair of gloves in their pockets."Children are forgetful — they get warm and they throw everything away," he warned.More than anything, he says, his students have to learn how to bring the weather into their daily calculus. "The weather forecast — you have to plan ahead. The best way to do that is wake up in the morning, put the TV on and look at the cancellations," Mr. Alloding said.Miguel Chimukeno, from Angola, rose to ask a question in Portuguese, which another student translated to French, which the French interpreter, Eric Ndayizi, posed to Mr. Alloding."He's low income — zero income — and you said they should watch TV and know some information. How does he get TV?" Mr. Ndayizi asked."There's nobody that's going to issue out TV's," Mr. Alloding said. "My only suggestion is that you talk to your neighbors."One of the biggest winter-related issues refugees face, Mr. Alloding said, is dealing with the heat in their apartments. "Some landlords have evicted some of my clients," he told the class. "There is a complaint that a certain population will open the heat at 90 and keep it on. They are under law to provide you with a temperature of no more than 67."Wrapping up class, Mr. Alloding mildly suggested that his students try to enjoy the winter."I know most of you don't have fun in the snow — maybe children, I don't know," Mr. Alloding said. "The snow looks beautiful during Christmas. It's white, there are no insects flying around, that's the fun of it."
SAN ANTONIO — On a wall in his sun-drenched, art-filled Tudor home, Henry R. Muñoz III displays a memento of his childhood: a framed protest sign proclaiming, "Texas needs $1.25 an hour minimum wage." He carried it when he was 6 years old while riding a burro during a farm workers' march alongside his father, a labor organizer, and the Mexican-American activist Cesar Chavez.Today, as the chief executive of a design firm here, Mr. Muñoz is a wealthy San Antonio businessman, civic leader and patron of the arts. After helping to raise millions to re-elect President Obama, he recently acquired another title: finance chairman of the Democratic National Committee, the first Latino to hold the job.Mr. Muñoz's journey from son of a sharp-elbowed union leader to Democratic power broker is a microcosm of a larger coming-of-age story about American Hispanics, who are making their presence felt in politics as never before.For decades, Latino activists like Mr. Muñoz's father, a man so wily he was known here as "The Fox," harnessed their political clout through grass-roots networks and neighborhood campaigns. Now a new generation of Latino leaders — highly educated, sophisticated and rich — is exerting power in a different way, by tapping into Hispanics as a fund-raising pool to influence elections and public policy.On the frontier of this movement is a trio of Obama donors: Mr. Muñoz, as controversial in San Antonio as he is prominent; Andrés W. López, a Puerto Rican lawyer with two Harvard degrees; and Eva Longoria, the actress of "Desperate Housewives" fame.Together, they founded the Futuro Fund, an arm of the Obama campaign that raised $32 million, they say, by soliciting fellow Latinos. After the president won 71 percent of the Latino vote, the Futuro founders celebrated the inauguration by joining more established Latino groups in a glittering gala at the Kennedy Center, an event that exposed the nation to elite Latino culture.Now, as the immigration debate unfolds in Washington, these donors have what Cal Jillson, a political scientist at Southern Methodist University, calls "a seat at the table," and they intend to use it. In interviews, they vowed to give voice to Hispanics on issues like health care, education and jobs — as well as immigration — and to remind politicians that they are not a constituency to be courted just at election time."It seemed to me like every four years, people say, 'Oh, the sleeping giant woke up,' " said Mr. Muñoz, over lunch served by his personal assistant, in a house with so many rooms that his cat, a Persian named Barbra (as in Streisand), has her own. "I think that's not true. We never went back to sleep."Hispanic activists have watched the Futuro Fund closely. "This has been the real missing link in our political strategy as a community," said Arturo Vargas, the executive director of the nonpartisan National Association of Latino Elected and Appointed Officials. Janet Murguía, the president of NCLR, the Hispanic rights group also known as the National Council of La Raza, called it "a real sign that our community is evolving."But some analysts say the show of wealth could backfire."There's a danger in Futuro's approach," said Mr. Jillson, the political scientist. "Most Hispanics are working very hard, long hours to feed their families, so the idea that they are holding glitzy parties in Washington may not please the Hispanic base."Perhaps, but the three leaders say they have already had an impact. During the presidential campaign last March, they held a $40,000-a-person fund-raiser and policy session at Washington's W Hotel, where 19 mostly Hispanic donors met with White House officials like Valerie Jarrett, a senior adviser, and Jacob J. Lew, then the chief of staff, and privately with Mr. Obama.Many Latinos were angered that the president had not worked harder to pass the Dream Act, a bill to help young immigrants avoid deportation, and the donors told Mr. Obama so. They also pressed the president to name a Latino to give the Democratic National Convention keynote address.The president delivered. He picked Mayor Julián Castro of San Antonio, a rising Democratic star who is close to Mr. Muñoz, as keynote speaker. And he used his executive powers to help "the dreamers," as Mr. Muñoz calls them, work and study legally. Jim Messina, Mr. Obama's campaign manager, called Mr. Muñoz after that decision."I hope you are proud of us today," both men remember Mr. Messina saying.Republicans, who lack a counterpart to the Futuro Fund, are seeking to engage Hispanics in their own way. Here in Texas, George P. Bush, the heir apparent to the Bush political dynasty, has co-founded a political action committee to help elect Hispanic Republicans. In Washington, Carlos M. Gutierrez, a commerce secretary under President George W. Bush, has created a "super PAC," Republicans for Immigration Reform, but conceded, "It's going to take a while to get immigrants' confidence and trust."
WASHINGTON — Stoking speculation about his presidential ambitions, Jeb Bush, the Republican former governor of Florida, performed a rare Washington feat on Sunday, appearing on all the morning talk shows as part of a blitz that has become equal parts book promotion and damage control.Mr. Bush has assumed a higher profile than at any time since he left office six years ago as he talks up his new book, "Immigration Wars: Forging an American Solution." But on Sunday he continued to struggle against criticism that the book reflects a reversal of his longtime position on immigration.Even Republicans, including those working in Congress on a bipartisan overhaul of immigration law, have complained that Mr. Bush has shifted from supporting a path to citizenship for 11 million people who are here illegally to instead calling for some legal status short of citizenship. The critics say that only a measure that provides steps toward full citizenship can become law.Mr. Bush said Sunday that he had spoken with one Republican critic, Senator Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, who favors a path to citizenship and is part of a bipartisan group working on a deal to overhaul the immigration system, and that he had given him the book and reassured him."I told him that I support his efforts, and I applaud what he's doing," Mr. Bush said on the ABC News program "This Week," referring to Mr. Graham. "And he concluded, after he heard what the thesis of the book is, that we're in sync."But, he added, "The basic premise needs to be that coming to the country legally should be easier, with less cost, than coming to the country illegally."On the CBS News program "Face the Nation," Mr. Bush said that his views on immigration "absolutely" coincided with those of Senator Marco Rubio, his former protégé in Florida. Mr. Rubio is also a member of the group involved in immigration talks, and he supports a path to citizenship. He is also considered to be a potential candidate for the Republican presidential nomination in 2016.Asked on the CNN program "State of the Union" about President Obama's recent outreach to Congressional Republicans, Mr. Bush was generally complimentary. "I'm not a cynic about this," he said. "And I think Republicans appreciate it.Yet on "Face the Nation," Mr. Bush both praised the president's 2012 campaign for its success despite a weak economy and accused him of "dividing the country" with "a campaign of them and us" because Mr. Obama has said that wealthy people were not paying their fair share of taxes.Mr. Bush did not hesitate, however, when asked whether he would encourage Republicans to accept higher revenue to get a deficit-reduction deal with Mr. Obama. "I wouldn't say, 'No, heck no, and that's it.' "By contrast, in an appearance on "Fox News Sunday," Representative Paul D. Ryan of Wisconsin, the Republican who chairs the House Budget Committee and is considered another potential candidate for the party's presidential nomination, reiterated his opposition to raising revenue."There is an impasse here," Mr. Ryan said.This week, Mr. Ryan plans to start House action on his plan to balance the budget within a decade, largely by reducing spending on Medicare, Medicaid and federal pensions.Mr. Ryan and Mr. Bush also differed in fielding questions about their respective presidential aspirations.Mr. Ryan, the 2012 Republican nominee for vice president, seemed to welcome the idea. "I enjoyed the experience," he said.Mr. Bush, a younger brother of President George W. Bush and son of President George Bush, was more coy. "I'm not thinking about it," he said on "Face the Nation." "We just had an election."
WASHINGTON — On her trip to Washington to push for an overhaul of immigration laws, Cindy Garcia on Wednesday went straight to the office of Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, to tell him about how the looming deportation of her husband had affected her family.Ms. Garcia, 40, is an autoworker from Detroit and an American citizen. She said she and her husband, a Mexican who has been living in the United States illegally for decades, since he was 10, had spent more than $50,000 over eight years on lawyers' fees trying to fix his immigration status, to no avail.Speaking emotionally in the senator's office during a brief protest, Ms. Garcia said her two children, also American citizens, live on edge, fearing they could be separated from their father at any time. She and other advocates chose to focus on Mr. Rubio because he has been a leader in talks among a bipartisan group of senators who are working to craft immigration legislation.As the debate gathers steam here over how to fix the immigration system, Ms. Garcia is one of the new faces on the side of those favoring comprehensive legislation that would include a quick and direct path to citizenship for 11 million people living in the country illegally.In 2007, when Congress last tried — and failed — to pass a similarly broad overhaul, much of the action by groups that supported that effort came during pitched battles over policy positions, fought largely behind closed doors. The populist momentum came from Americans who angrily opposed that proposal, which they said would give a break to immigrants they saw as lawbreakers.This year, the forces favoring comprehensive legislation are showing new levels of confidence and organization, and, in a change from six years ago, illegal immigrants and their American citizen family members, like Ms. Garcia, are stepping forward to speak for themselves."My husband has earned a path to citizenship," she said on Wednesday. "They need to stop living in the shadows, and they should have the right to vote so they can vote on issues that affect our families."Immigrant groups, having learned from the bruising they took in 2007, and in immigration fights since then in Alabama, Arizona, Georgia and other states, this time are staying clear of the policy weeds in Washington, instead working their way toward this city from the outside. Ms. Garcia arrived in Washington after participating in a bus tour organized by immigrant rights groups in Michigan. The bus convoy, conceived with the freedom riders of the civil rights era in mind, went through Wisconsin and ended in Ohio with a small rally at Andy's Cafe, the tavern near Cincinnati that was once run by the father of Representative John A. Boehner, the speaker of the House.Organizers for the Fair Immigration Reform Movement, the coalition that organized the tours, said similar bus rides, many of them carrying immigrants who were revealing their illegal status for the first time, had taken place since mid-February in 19 states, including California, Colorado, Florida and Texas.In each state, bus riders visited the offices of federal lawmakers, focusing on possible swing voters in the House, delivering letters that pressed them for legislation that would provide an unobstructed path to citizenship, which would also help to unify families facing separation by deportation.The advocates are calling on the senators who are writing legislation — including Mr. Rubio; Senators John McCain of Arizona and Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, both Republicans; and Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York — to present a bill by next Thursday. The senators have said that they hope to unveil legislation by the end of the month.Cristina McNeil, a Mexican-born American citizen from Boise, Idaho, who came this week to Washington, said she and other advocates had met in her home state with Representative Raúl R. Labrador, a Republican who has expressed skepticism about a direct path to citizenship for illegal immigrants, but who favors programs allowing immigrants to work legally.
NOGALES, Ariz. — Flying low along the Mexican line in a Black Hawk helicopter, the United States Border Patrol officer saw surveillance towers rising above the cactus. He saw his agents' white and green trucks moving among the mesquite, scouting for illegal crossers.Far overhead, a remotely guided drone beamed images of the terrain to an intelligence center in Tucson. Pilots cruised in reconnaissance planes carrying radars and infrared cameras that could distinguish a migrant with a backpack from a wild animal from many miles away.Sabri Dikman, the patrol's executive officer for this region, liked what he saw — and what he did not see. If any illegal migrants were trying to make their way into the United States, he said, the chances were very good that agents would find and detain them."We know what we're dealing with and where we are dealing with it," Mr. Dikman said. "In some manner we have the capacity to observe every part of the border of Arizona."As Congress debates a broad overhaul of the immigration laws, including a pathway to citizenship for 11 million illegal immigrants in the country, skeptical lawmakers are asking if the Southwest border is secure enough to withstand any new wave of illegal crossings that might be spurred by a legalization program, or by new growth in the American economy.Officers who guard the line say the border is more secure in most places than they have ever known it. They say they are in a strong position to hold off an illegal surge, and to show why they point to Arizona, once the busiest and most contentious border battlefront. To the east, in Texas, agents are still struggling to stop persistent migrants in hundreds of miles of varying and penetrable terrain. But in Arizona, every available measure shows steep declines in the number of people making it across, figures that border agents say demonstrate what they can accomplish.In Congress, many Republicans recall that an amnesty in 1986, which was supposed to solve illegal migration, was followed by an even larger unauthorized influx. A bipartisan group in the Senate is working on a proposal that would require measurable gains in border security before immigrants would be allowed to proceed onto a path to full citizenship.But to border officials here, Congress seems to be behind the times, failing to notice that they have already made many of the enforcement advances that lawmakers are seeking. Since 2005, the number of patrol agents in the Southwest has nearly doubled, to more than 18,000. Customs and Border Protection, the parent agency of the Border Patrol, has built its air wing to more than 260 aircraft. It acquired an array of technology, including ground sensors and aerial detection devices developed by the Defense Department in Iraq and Afghanistan, and created a military-style command structure with expanded intelligence operations to coordinate agents on the ground.While tightening the border, officials also created a system of penalties for those who get past it, making it far more likely that migrants who were caught would be jailed, prosecuted as criminals, or expelled from the country far from the place where they tried to enter.Border officers, once a beleaguered force overwhelmed by illegal flows, have acquired a bit of swagger."It's all of these things coming together that have really given us the capability to bring the border to a level of security that is, in my opinion, unprecedented," said David V. Aguilar, the agency's commissioner, who will retire this month after 34 years on the borders. "We haven't seen this lack of activity in 25, 30 years," he said.In Arizona in 2005, more than 577,000 apprehensions were made of migrants crossing illegally, a surge that sparked a political furor in the state. Border officials declared that they would make a "last stand" here.Last year in Arizona, the apprehensions (an imperfect but still useful indicator of unauthorized flows) dropped to 126,500, a 78 percent decline from 2005, a sharper decrease than seen elsewhere along the border. The recession in this country and drug-trafficking violence in Mexico also contributed to the falloff, here and along the length of the border. But in 2005, about half of all apprehensions in the Southwest were made in Arizona. Today, it is closer to one-third, with the largest share now shifted to Texas.Mr. Dikman remembers the bad old days, when the agents' rule of thumb was to open a formal deportation only after an illegal crosser had been caught and expelled to Mexico 18 times.Now, Customs and Border Protection is adjusting its strategies to the reality of greatly reduced numbers, but more troublesome adversaries.
WASHINGTON — The nation's 11 million illegal immigrants would have to wait a full decade for a green card but could earn citizenship just three years after that, under a provision being finalized by a bipartisan group of eight senators working to devise an overhaul of immigration law, several people with knowledge of the negotiations said.Taken together, the two waiting periods would provide the nation's illegal immigrants with a path to United States citizenship in 13 years, matching the draft of a plan by President Obama to offer full participation in American democracy to millions who are living in fear of deportation.The arrangement would shrink the amount of time it takes to become a naturalized citizen, to three years from five years. But in an appeal to Republicans, it would also extend to 10 years, from 8, the amount of time that illegal immigrants must wait before receiving permission to work in the United States permanently.Such a compromise might give both sides something to crow about: Republicans could argue that they pushed for a longer waiting period before a person could get a green card, which allows its holder to remain and work in the United States indefinitely. Democrats could say that illegal immigrants would become citizens faster."It is an unusual construction, but it gets them to citizenship in the same time as the administration plan," said Kevin Appleby, the director of migration policy at the United States Conference of Catholic Bishops. "Most importantly, it eliminates the prospect of a permanent underclass by ensuring that, in time, all will have the opportunity to become Americans."Negotiations among the senators have intensified significantly in recent days as they push toward a goal of announcing comprehensive immigration legislation in early April. Senators from both parties and their staffs met for hours on Thursday as they struggled to overcome obstacles that several people familiar with the negotiations said could hinder a deal in the weeks ahead.Among those obstacles is a continuing concern among Republicans that a three-year naturalization process for illegal immigrants could give them a faster path to citizenship than people who enter legally. One possible solution, officials said, would be to reduce the wait for citizenship to three years for everyone. But they said the agreement could still unravel."We can't create a system where it's faster for illegal immigrants than for legal immigrants," said one Republican familiar with the internal debate who spoke on the condition of anonymity. "Republicans are clear that they are not going to create a special pathway to citizenship."The senators also remain at odds over a series of other major issues, including the establishment of a guest-worker program for low-skilled immigrants; a better system for companies to verify the immigration status of job applicants; determining who has the final authority to declare the borders secure; and modifying rules that prioritize the family members who can immigrate to the United States legally.One big sticking point has become the visa program for low-skilled, year-round, temporary workers. In February, the U.S. Chamber of Commerce and the A.F.L.-C.I.O. reached a compromise that acknowledged the need for a system that would allow businesses to meet their demand for lower-skilled labor, while still protecting American workers.But the two groups remain divided on the number of visas the new program should offer, said Randel K. Johnson, the chamber's lead negotiator on immigration. The chamber, he said, wants 400,000 visas, while the A.F.L.-C.I.O. prefers a number in the "very, very low five figures." Ana Avendaño, the director of immigration for the A.F.L.-C.I.O., refused to discuss a specific number, but said "the whole notion is to create a system that responds to the needs of the economy."The bipartisan group of eight senators is also still debating how to improve E-Verify, the system that employers use to check the immigration status of their workers. A high-tech, biometric identification card was deemed too costly; instead, the group is considering an enhanced E-Verify system that would allow employers to use photographs to identify job applicants and would let workers provide answers to security questions to help prove their legal work status.But despite the remaining differences, the eight senators who are in negotiations are continuing to make steady progress toward an overall deal, according to people familiar with the talks. Mr. Obama, who has threatened to push forward with his own legislation if Senate efforts stall, is satisfied with the current pace of talks, White House officials said.
WASHINGTON — The Senate Judiciary Committee heard testimony Monday afternoon arguing that the H-1B visa program, which covers highly skilled temporary foreign workers, often in high-tech fields, discriminates against women.The hearing, which was devoted to issues women face in the immigration process, also focused on family reunification, and ways to help families — and women specifically — integrate into the legal immigration system."I don't think we should be setting up an either-or proposition — even the most highly skilled immigrants, they have families, too," said Senator Mazie Hirono, Democrat of Hawaii, referring to what she described as a false, "either-or" choice between family-based immigration and high-skilled immigration. "This is all about doing the kind of immigration reform that really supports the values we have in this country, and one of the values we have in this country is that family is important."Karen Panetta, the vice president for communications and public awareness for the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers in the United States of America, testified in her prepared remarks that "the vast majority of H-1B workers are men."Ms. Panetta's prepared testimony pointed to "a serious gender imbalance in science, technology, engineering and math," as part of the reason that these H-1B visas in high-tech fields skew disproportionately toward men. But she noted: "If a major immigration program effectively discriminated based on race or national origin, would that be O.K.?""The I.E.E.E.-U.S.A. represents more American high-tech workers than anybody else, so we have sources," Ms. Panetta said Monday afternoon. "One from inside the industry, looking at the offshoring companies that dominate the H-1B program, is that their global hiring is 70 percent men." But in the United States, where outsourcing companies get more than half of the limited number of H-1B visas, she added, "the ratio is more like 85 percent men."Ms. Panetta, whose organization has filed a Freedom of Information Act request with the Department of Homeland Security to get data on the gender breakdown of H-1B visas, accused the government in her written testimony of "stonewalling" on their request."How many women get H-1B visas?" she said Monday.A spokesman for the Department of Homeland Security said that there is not a gender-based cap for H-1B visas and that gender is not taken into account when deciding who qualifies for the program, so the department does not have this data readily available.Ai-jen Poo, the director of the National Domestic Workers Alliance, emphasized the need for domestic care workers who are illegal immigrants — "a growing workforce of mainly immigrant women who take care of our children, our aging loved ones and our homes," as she described them — to be allowed some flexibility in proving that they have been living and working in the United States.A nanny who is an illegal immigrant, Ms. Poo said, most likely does not have pay stubs or tax forms to prove she worked for her employer because she largely exists in "a paperless world." She called on the senators to accept "proofs of presence as opposed to proof of employment" when it comes to providing a work history for domestic care workers — many of whom are female.Another issue of concern is that immigration legislation that is likely to emerge from the Senate might eliminate the ability for United States citizens to sponsor their married adult children, as well as their siblings, on an immigrant visa. Currently, these two groups represent the third and fourth preference categories when it comes to family immigration, but there is some discussion that they might be reshuffled and ultimately cut during the coming immigration overhaul."Our family is what permits us to be able to set root and really begin to build a life in this country," said Mee Moua, the president of the Asian American Justice Center. "If those two categories were eliminated, unless some alternative version was put on the table, I think that it would just unfortunately affect women and their families."Ms. Moua argued that large, extended families can be critical to helping immigrants become a productive and integrated part of American society.
Under fierce questioning from Republicans at a hearing in the House of Representatives, the top Obama administration official in charge of immigration enforcement insisted Tuesday that the release of more than 2,200 immigrants from detention in February was solely a budgetary savings measure, and he disputed accusations that they had included many dangerous criminals.But the official, John T. Morton, the director of Immigration and Customs Enforcement, acknowledged to the House Judiciary Committee that about two dozen of the immigrants had since been returned to detention.The release of 2,228 immigrants over three weeks last month has been sharply criticized by Republicans, who said the Obama administration was freeing foreign criminals to dramatize its opposition to the automatic federal spending cuts that went into effect on March 1.Mr. Morton said the decision to release the immigrants was made by officials within his agency, with his approval. He said there was no prior consultation with Homeland Security Secretary Janet Napolitano or with White House officials.This week, the politics of immigration have been shifting rapidly among Republicans. A strategy report from the Republican National Committee urged the party to embrace legalization measures for illegal immigrants in the country. On Tuesday, Senator Rand Paul of Kentucky, a favorite of the Tea Party, also called for a path to legal status for those immigrants, saying they should be treated with "understanding and compassion."But House Republicans used the hearing to press their view that the Obama administration had been grossly lax on enforcement, and they said the releases of detainees had added new strains to the debate about an overhaul of immigration laws.Representative Trey Gowdy, a Republican from South Carolina who is chairman of the House Judiciary subcommittee on immigration, assailed Mr. Morton for what he called "a public relations stunt gone wrong" that had created safety risks for Americans. He said Mr. Morton could have found other ways to make savings."You could easily have done that," Mr. Gowdy told Mr. Morton, raising his voice. "Don't act like you could not have."Mr. Morton said his agency deported 409,849 people in the 2012 fiscal year, the most under the Obama administration. He said the agency had detained an average of 34,000 foreigners a day, based on financing by Congress. But late last year, he said, the numbers were up to 36,000 on some days.The agency has financing only through the end of March, he said, and the automatic cuts would force reductions this year of 5 percent, or $300 million."There were no mass releases of criminals," Mr. Morton said, "just efforts to live within our budget."Of the immigrants released, 629 had past criminal convictions, he said. But most had been determined by officials not to pose security risks and were released on bond, with monitoring bracelets or with other measures to prevent them from fleeing.A review by Mr. Morton of the releases, prompted by the criticism, determined that eight immigrants had committed serious offenses, and four of those were rearrested by immigration agents. He said two dozen other immigrants with less serious offenses had also been returned to detention.
WASHINGTON — Republican opposition to legalizing the status of millions of illegal immigrants is crumbling in the nation's capital as leading lawmakers in the party scramble to halt eroding support among Hispanic voters — a shift that is providing strong momentum for an overhaul of immigration laws.Senator Rand Paul of Kentucky, a Tea Party Republican, on Tuesday became the latest to embrace a more welcoming approach, declaring to the nation's 11 million illegal immigrants that if they want to work in America, "then we will find a place for you."While he never uttered the word "citizenship" and said a secure border must come first, Mr. Paul strongly implied that citizenship would eventually be available to them.Republican sentiment for a more liberal immigration policy has been building in the aftermath of last year's election. But Mr. Paul's comments provided strong new evidence that the rising generation of conservative leaders is turning against the Republican argument that those who enter the country illegally should be denied the chance to become permanent residents."Prudence, compassion and thrift all point us toward the same goal: bringing these workers out of the shadows and into becoming and being taxpaying members of society," Mr. Paul said in a speech before the United States Hispanic Chamber of Commerce.The remarks are a departure for Mr. Paul, who as a Senate candidate in 2010 called for an electronic fence and helicopter stations to help secure the border with Mexico. His new message follows the publication on Monday of a blistering report from the Republican National Committee that urged the party's members to champion an immigration overhaul that Hispanics can embrace or risk seeing the party shrinking "to its core constituencies only."The report left vague, however, just what that "comprehensive" overhaul would include.Mr. Paul joins Senator Marco Rubio of Florida in a growing list of leading conservatives to urge a new approach on immigration. Mr. Rubio is part of a bipartisan group of eight senators who are working to create an immigration overhaul that can earn support from both parties.Some Republicans, including Mr. Paul, remain wary of any plan that would move illegal immigrants ahead of those who are in the country legally when it comes to getting full citizenship.That view is particularly strong in the House, where Speaker John A. Boehner on Tuesday dodged the question of whether a separate, bipartisan group in his chamber working on immigration legislation would back a path to citizenship. But the House plan is expected to include some way for illegal immigrants to gain legal status.Senator Jeff Sessions, Republican of Alabama, released a letter on Tuesday urging the Senate Judiciary Committee to move slowly, explaining to a group of reporters that there is no "moral or legal responsibility to reward somebody who entered the country illegally."But the new political landscape in Washington contrasts sharply with just a few years ago, when most Republicans derided the idea of legalized status for illegal immigrants as a form of amnesty that would simply encourage more people to cross the border illegally.The overall shift in sentiment means that four months after Mitt Romney, the 2012 Republican presidential nominee, made "self-deportation" the party's official position on immigration — and lost decisively to President Obama, especially among Hispanic voters — top party strategists and lawmakers of all ideological stripes are racing to change course."Now, you have the standard-bearer of the Tea Party saying that we should welcome undocumented immigrants as Americans," said Frank Sharry, executive director of America's Voice, a pro-immigration group. "It's one of the fastest turnarounds I've seen on any issue. It's mind-blowing."Bob Dane, a spokesman for the Federation for American Immigration Reform, which opposes a path to citizenship for illegal immigrants, conceded Tuesday that "it certainly appears to be settled if one assumes that the inside Republican elite strategists represent the core of the Republican Party."But it remains to be seen how Republican voters and conservative activists across the country will respond to proposals that allow illegal immigrants to live in America and compete legally for jobs. Mr. Dane's group is meeting with 52 talk radio hosts in Washington next month for a two-day session intended to bolster opposition to the idea."Amnesty is that which rewards lawbreaking," Mr. Dane said. "An amnesty bill is going to split the party. Workers are going to go crazy."
More than two years after Homeland Security officials told Congress that they would produce new, more accurate standards to assess security at the nation's borders, senior officials from the department acknowledged this week that they had not completed the new measurements and were not likely to in coming months, as the debate proceeds about overhauling the immigration system.Both Democratic and Republican lawmakers were taken aback at a hearing on Wednesday in the House of Representatives when Mark Borkowski, a senior Homeland Security official, said he had no progress to report on a broad measure of border conditions the department had been working on since 2010. The lawmakers warned that failure by the Obama administration to devise a reliable method of border evaluation could imperil passage of immigration legislation."We do not want the Department of Homeland Security to be the stumbling block to comprehensive immigration reform for this country," said Representative Candice Miller, a Republican from Michigan who is the chairwoman of the House Homeland Security subcommittee on border security. She told Mr. Borkowski that the lack of security measurements from the administration "could be a component of our failure to pass something I think is very important for our country."Representative Sheila Jackson Lee of Texas, a Democrat and strong a supporter of President Obama's immigration proposals, was more blunt. "I would say to the department, you've got to get in the game," she said.Amid contentious discussions in Congress over immigration, one point of wide agreement is that an evaluation of border security will be a central piece of any comprehensive bill. A bipartisan group in the Senate is working to write legislation that includes a "trigger," which would make the path to citizenship for more than 11 million illegal immigrants in the country contingent on measurable advances in security at the borders.Lawmakers have been pressing Homeland Security Secretary Janet Napolitano to devise a measure they can use to judge if the Obama administration's claims of significant progress in border enforcement are justified. Republican senators in the bipartisan group have said a border standard is pivotal to their efforts."We need to have a measurement," Senator John McCain of Arizona insisted at a hearing in the Senate last week."We need to assure the American people that we have effective control of the border and we have made advances to achieve that," he said. "I need to have something to assure people they are not going to live in fear."Obama administration officials said on Thursday that they had resisted producing a single measure to assess the border because the president did not want any hurdles placed on the pathway to eventual citizenship for immigrants in the country illegally.They also said security conditions could change very rapidly along the border depending on where smugglers tried to bring people and narcotics across, and where border agents were concentrating their technology and other resources."While border security is complex and cannot be measured in a single metric," said Peter Boogaard, a spokesman for the Homeland Security Department, "in every metric available to measure progress, we're heading in the right direction, including decreased apprehensions and increased seizures."Ms. Miller and Representative Michael McCaul of Texas, the Republican chairman of the House Homeland Security Committee, have said they are preparing legislation that would compel administration officials to produce border measurements if they do not come forward with them in coming weeks.For several years before 2010, border officials used a measure known as operational control to describe the level of security along the southwest line. But in 2010, Ms. Napolitano said the department would drop that standard, arguing it did not reflect a substantial buildup of agents and detection technology in recent years, and it was insufficiently flexible to account for the varying terrain and fast-changing conditions along the nearly 2,000-mile southwest border, where most illegal crossings occur.In a recent interview, David V. Aguilar, the commissioner of Customs and Border Protection, said he had first proposed the concept of operational control years ago when he was the chief of the Border Patrol. He said it was meant to describe immediate conditions in limited patrol sectors, and he lamented that it had become the broadest measure of security advances across the entire border."It was never meant to be applied that way," Mr. Aguilar said.
Nearly two-thirds of Americans favor giving illegal immigrants in the country an opportunity for legal status with a path to citizenship, according to a poll published Thursday by the Public Religion Research Institute and the Brookings Institution . Support for an earned path to citizenship for those immigrants came from 71 percent of Democrats and also a majority, 53 percent, of Republicans, the poll found.The option that drew the least support in the poll was legal residency for illegal immigrants with no path to citizenship: only 14 percent of Americans favored that approach. A larger minority, about 21 percent, said illegal immigrants should be identified by the authorities and deported.As Republicans have been searching with fresh intensity in recent weeks for a new approach to the divisive issue of immigration, the poll provides potentially heartening information to lawmakers who have urged the party to support overhaul legislation that would eventually allow illegal immigrants to become citizens.The poll is notable because of the large size of its sample. The results are based on bilingual landline and cellphone interviews between Jan. 28 and Feb. 24 with 4,465 adults in the continental United States. (The margin of error is plus or minus two percentage points.) The Public Religion Research Institute is a nonpartisan research organization that focuses on religion and politics. The Brookings Institution, which is also nonpartisan, conducts research on public policy issues.Majorities of all religious groups in the poll supported giving earned citizenship to immigrants in the country illegally, but support was especially strong among Hispanics, with 74 percent of Hispanic Catholics and 71 percent of Hispanic Protestants favoring that proposal.Support for the citizenship option was also strong among black Protestants, 71 percent, and Jewish Americans, with 67 percent. A majority, 56 percent, of white evangelical Protestants, the most conservative group in the poll, also favored offering citizenship to illegal immigrants after they met certain requirements.Nearly half of Americans, 45 percent, said the Republican Party had been hurt in recent elections by its positions on immigration, while only 7 percent of Americans thought the party had been helped by its views. In the presidential race last year, the Republican candidate, Mitt Romney, supported a strategy of "self-deportation," which would have made life so difficult in the United States for illegal immigrants that they would feel forced to leave on their own.According to the poll, 64 percent of Americans disagreed with this strategy, while about one-third, or 34 percent, agreed.But Republicans' stance on immigration in the 2012 elections does not appear to have hurt the party as badly among Hispanics as the voting results would suggest, after President Obama won 71 percent of the Hispanic vote.According to the poll, 39 percent of Hispanic Americans said the Republican Party's immigration positions hurt it in the elections, while 41 percent of that group said immigration did not make a difference.However, the poll reveals persistent risks for Republicans among Hispanics. Only 19 percent of Hispanic Americans polled said they trusted Republicans more than Democrats to handle immigration issues. Nearly half of Hispanic Americans say that immigration legislation should be the top priority for Mr. Obama and for Congress.The president has outlined a proposal that would require immigrants who had been in the country illegally to wait at least 13 years before they could apply to become full citizens. A bipartisan group in the Senate is working on legislation that also includes a path to earned citizenship. Under both proposals, illegal immigrants would have to pass criminal background checks, pay fines and back taxes, learn English and civics and perhaps meet other requirements before they could apply to naturalize.Republican lawmakers have been testing different approaches to legalization. Senator Marco Rubio of Florida, who is part of the bipartisan Senate group, has said he would offer eventual citizenship but no special or direct path to it for immigrants who have been in the country illegally. Former Gov. Jeb Bush of Florida wrote in a book published this month that he would offer legal residency for illegal immigrants, but no path to citizenship. But in recent comments, Mr. Bush said he would support a citizenship option if Republican lawmakers embraced it.The poll shows that Americans are divided over whether immigration benefits the country. A slim majority of 54 percent believes that new immigrants help strengthen the economy. But a large minority, 40 percent, said foreign newcomers are a threat to American traditions and culture.Immigration is increasingly shaping the experience of many Americans. Of those polled, 50 percent said they often came in contact with immigrants who spoke little or no English, while 61 percent said they had close friends who were born outside the United States.Younger generations of Americans are significantly more ethnically mixed than older ones, the poll found, in ways that the political parties will have to take into account. In the poll, nearly one quarter of Americans age 18 to 29 identified as Hispanic, while only a slim majority of 52 percent identified as white.
PHOENIX — At a hearing on Friday on a lawsuit challenging the constitutionality of an order that would keep some young immigrants from getting driver's licenses, Gov. Jan Brewer of Arizona again found herself trying to prove that her policies are not discriminatory.Ms. Brewer is remembered for signing legislation empowering the police to ask certain people about their immigration status, which put Arizona on the forefront of the nation's contentious immigration debate. And now she is leading the charge again, standing firm against a federal program that would give young immigrants temporary reprieves from deportation.Ms. Brewer was not in court on Friday, but Douglas C. Northrup — a lawyer representing her and officials at the Arizona Department of Transportation, the other defendants — insisted that her position was not discriminatory. Instead, he said, it was meant to set limits on President Obama's sweeping exercise of executive authority in carrying out the program after Congress failed to give legal status to the same class of immigrants."This case is about what is the law, particularly federal law," Mr. Northrup told Judge David G. Campbell, who is presiding over the case in United States District Court in Phoenix. The program, he said, "is not the law."From the courtroom's benches, young immigrants listened in, including some of the five plaintiffs named in the lawsuit, which was filed also on behalf of the Arizona Dream Act Coalition, one of many organizations formed to pressure Congress and foster public support for their cause.At the same time, two floors below, dozens of immigrants were being sworn is as new citizens.The complaint charges that Ms. Brewer's order denying driver's licenses to the young immigrants in the Obama program is unconstitutional. It says the order violates the federal government's supremacy and discriminates against a certain group of people who would have been allowed to apply for licenses if the state had not changed its rules.Jennifer Chang Newell, a lawyer for the American Civil Liberties Union, one of the organizations representing the plaintiffs, told the judge that Arizona was "rejecting the federal government's controlling determination" that immigrants protected from deportation under the program are legally allowed to stay in the United States.Judge Campbell asked her, "What about the Department of Health and Human Services," which determined that they are not eligible for benefits provided under the health care law or Medicaid?Later, the judge asked Mr. Northrup if it was not true that the state had been granting driver's licenses to other deferred-action recipients, including illegal immigrants who are witnesses in cases against drug or human smugglers but who, like the young immigrants benefiting from the Obama administration's program, were not on a path to citizenship.Ms. Brewer unveiled her executive order on Aug. 15, the first day the federal government began receiving applications for the program, called Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals. The state's Motor Vehicle Department then revised its rules on documents accepted for driver's license applications, excluding the type of employment authorization granted to the young immigrants.All other kinds of employment authorizations continue to be accepted.Other states, like Michigan and Iowa, had considered the question of whether the young immigrants should get driver's licenses, but decided against a ban after the federal government said in a memorandum in January that they were "lawfully present in the United States."The position did not sway Ms. Brewer. In Nebraska, Gov. Dave Heineman, also a Republican, also barred such immigrants from getting driver's licenses.To receive temporary reprieve from deportation, which is valid for two years, the immigrants must prove they were brought to the country as children, submit a high school diploma and clear a criminal background check. According to the Migration Policy Institute, a Washington research group, roughly 1.7 million young immigrants are eligible for the program. About 80,000 of them live in Arizona; by December, 13,000 had applied, according to statistics released by the Department of Homeland Security.After the hearing, some of the plaintiffs spoke of the hardships they have faced in getting to work — public transportation in and around Phoenix is patchy, at best — and how they are sometimes deprived of basic privileges, like exchanging merchandise at a store, because they do not have driver's licenses for identification.Their lawyers asked Judge Campbell for an injunction to compel the state to start issuing them driver's licenses. The judge told both sides to expect a decision in a few weeks.
WASHINGTON — On any given day, about 300 immigrants are held in solitary confinement at the 50 largest detention facilities that make up the sprawling patchwork of holding centers nationwide overseen by Immigration and Customs Enforcement officials, according to new federal data.Nearly half are isolated for 15 days or more, the point at which psychiatric experts say they are at risk for severe mental harm, with about 35 detainees kept for more than 75 days.While the records do not indicate why immigrants were put in solitary, an adviser who helped the immigration agency review the numbers estimated that two-thirds of the cases involved disciplinary infractions like breaking rules, talking back to guards or getting into fights. Immigrants were also regularly isolated because they were viewed as a threat to other detainees or personnel or for protective purposes when the immigrant was gay or mentally ill.The United States has come under sharp criticism at home and abroad for relying on solitary confinement in its prisons more than any other democratic nation in the world. While Immigration and Customs Enforcement places only about 1 percent of its jailed immigrants in solitary, this practice is nonetheless startling because those detainees are being held on civil, not criminal, charges. As such, they are not supposed to be punished; they are simply confined to ensure that they appear for administrative hearings.After federal immigration authorities caught up with him, Rashed BinRashed, an illegal arrival from Yemen, was sent to a detention center in Juneau, Wis. He was put in solitary confinement, he says, after declining to go to the jail's eating area and refusing meals because he wanted to fast during Ramadan.Federal officials confined Delfino Quiroz, a gay immigrant from Mexico, in solitary for four months in 2010, saying it was for his own protection, he recalls. He sank into a deep depression as he overheard three inmates attempt suicide. "Please, God," he remembers praying, "don't let me be the same."As lawmakers in Washington consider an overhaul of the immigration system, Congress faces thorny questions not just about what status to grant immigrants already in the country, but also about how best to increase enforcement efforts and what rights to ensure illegal immigrants during their detention.The new federal data highlights how punitive and costly immigration policy has become, since solitary is one of the most expensive forms of detention."I.C.E. is clearly using excessive force, since these are civil detentions," said Dr. Terry Kupers, a psychiatrist who studies solitary confinement at the Wright Institute, a graduate school in psychology based in Berkeley, Calif. "And that makes this a human rights abuse."Ernestine Fobbs, an agency spokeswoman, said that aside from immigrants who are separated from the general population for disciplinary reasons, detainees are isolated only "as a final resort, when other options are not available to address the specifics of the situation.""I.C.E. takes the mental health care of individuals in the agency's custody very seriously," she added. The agency declined to talk about particular cases, citing privacy concerns.Another agency official, who was not authorized to speak publicly, emphasized that some detainees who are put in "segregation units" have criminal records, gang affiliations or histories of violence."It's an extreme situation," the official said. "We want to make sure not to overuse it."While the conditions of confinement vary, detainees in solitary are routinely kept alone for 22 to 23 hours per day, sometimes in windowless 6-foot-by-13-foot cells, according to interviews with current and former detainees and a review of case records involving more than three dozen immigrants since 2010.Access to phones and lawyers is far more restricted in solitary; occasionally such communications were permitted only in the middle of the night when it was unlikely anyone would be available. Immigrants are typically given an hour or so of recreation each day, detainees said. In some facilities, that is limited to pacing in what detainees call "the cage," a sparse indoor enclosure with concrete floors and fencing on all sides, similar to an indoor dog kennel.
WASHINGTON — Organizing for Action, the political group that grew out of President Obama's successful re-election campaign machinery, will jump into the immigration debate this week with an aggressive online effort to highlight the personal stories of immigrants.The group has collected 7,000 stories from supporters, some of whom entered the country illegally or were brought as young children by their parents. Organizers say they will distribute the stories using Twitter, Facebook and blogs beginning this week.The idea, officials with the group said, is to demonstrate support for efforts in Congress to overhaul immigration laws in ways that would provide 11 million illegal immigrants with a path to citizenship.That legislative effort, which Mr. Obama backs, is nearing a key moment. Early next month, a bipartisan group of eight senators is expected to unveil a bill in the hope that it will win support from members of both parties in the House and the Senate."It is clear that America's immigration system is broken, with so many employers that game the system by hiring undocumented workers and 11 million people living in the shadows," said Jon Carson, the executive director of Organizing for Action and a former director of the White House Office of Public Engagement. "Neither is good for the economy or the country."Opponents of an immigration overhaul say they are counting on conservative activists to rise up in anger once the Senate legislation is unveiled. One group has said it will hold a two-day conference for conservative radio talk show hosts next month to encourage opposition to the legislation.In 2007, the last time Congress considered an immigration overhaul, conservatives hammered lawmakers at town-hall-style meetings and on talk radio. Proponents of the 2007 legislation eventually gave up.The goal of Organizing for Action's initiative is to counter any opposition by conservatives to the current legislative effort with support from around the country."Our supporters know it is time to fix the system that requires responsibility from everyone — both from the workers here that are undocumented and those who hire them — a system that guarantees that everyone is playing by the same rules," Mr. Carson said.The stories distributed by Organizing for Action were collected after an e-mail request to Mr. Obama's supporters. Organizers said they would begin sending more e-mails to the list this week, asking for additional personal statements. Some of the people will be videotaped telling their stories for distribution via YouTube and Twitter.One supporter describes his father's illegal entry into the United States from Mexico. The father received legal status in 1986, the last time that Congress passed legislation to address undocumented workers."Almost 30 years ago, he came into this country with hardly anything to his name," the supporter, Victor Hugo, says in one of the stories on the group's Web site. "Now my father is part of family that is driven and committed to making the most of the opportunities given to them by this country."Starting early next month, Organizing for Action will move beyond the online effort to organize its supporters at events around the country. They will include phone banks for supporters to call members of Congress, press events, community rallies and letter-writing parties, officials said. The events will run from April 1 to April 7, a week ahead of the unveiling of the Senate immigration plan.Officials at Organizing for Action said they would also continue to hold weekly conference calls with people who are interested in getting more information about how to support the immigration effort. A conference call on immigration last week drew 2,229 participants, organizers said.
Homeland Security Secretary Janet Napolitano said Tuesday that she had asked federal immigration officials to provide her with more information about immigrants being held in solitary confinement at federal facilities."I think solitary confinement should be the exception, not the rule," she said, adding that detainees are held in solitary for "a variety of reasons," sometimes because they are considered disruptive and sometimes for their own protection.Ms. Napolitano, who spoke at a breakfast event in Washington hosted by The Christian Science Monitor, said she intended to review policies pertaining to the use of solitary confinement.Her request came in response to an article in The New York Times on Sunday about new federal data indicating that on any given day roughly 300 immigrants are held in isolation, many of them for 23 hours a day.The data indicated that in more than half of the cases where this form of detention was used, detainees were isolated for 15 days or more, the point at which psychiatric experts say they are at risk of severe mental harm. More than 10 percent in solitary confinement are held there for 75 days or more.Senator Charles E. Schumer, the New York Democrat who is chairman of the Senate Judiciary subcommittee on immigration, reacted to the data by sending a letter on Tuesday to John Morton, director of Immigration and Customs Enforcement, urging the agency to change its practices."This report suggests an overreliance by ICE on the harshest forms of incarceration," Mr. Schumer wrote, adding that if the agency did not ban the use of solitary confinement for periods longer than two weeks, except under extreme circumstances, he would address the matter in legislation.Immigration advocacy groups also seized on the new data to argue for better treatment for immigrants held by federal authorities. The National Immigrant Justice Center, for example, used it to promote a petition highlighting the harm done to people left in solitary for long periods and calling on Ms. Napolitano to end solitary confinement in immigration detention.The new data, which federal authorities began reviewing a year ago at the request of immigration lawyers, looked at 50 detention centers over a five-month period that hold about 85 percent of the agency's average daily population of 34,000 detainees.Barbara Gonzalez, press secretary for the immigration agency, said that since 2009 it had greatly improved the way detainees are handled, including a new process for assessing risk to determine custody, policies that keep them closer to relatives and lawyers, and the construction of new facilities for low-risk detainees."ICE takes the health, safety and welfare of those in our care very seriously," she said, adding that detainees are segregated from the general population only after a careful review of the case shows that no other option will ensure their safety or the security of the facility.
WASHINGTON — The nation's top business and labor groups were near agreement Friday on a guest worker program for low-skilled immigrants, closing in on a deal that would eliminate one of the last significant obstacles to a new proposal for a broad overhaul of immigration laws, officials involved in the talks said.The progress in the talks, which stalled late last week, had members of a bipartisan group of eight senators that has been working on an immigration bill increasingly optimistic that they would be able to introduce comprehensive legislation in the Senate when Congress returns the second week of April."We are very close, closer than we've ever been," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and a member of the Senate group. "We are very optimistic, but there are a few issues remaining."The intense talks, and the willingness of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce and the A.F.L.-C.I.O. — two groups that have often found themselves deeply divided over the immigration debate — to try to hammer out an agreement, was an indication of how much the climate has changed on overhauling the nation's immigration laws.When President George W. Bush pushed to revamp immigration laws in 2007, the inability of business and labor to agree on a plan for temporary guest workers was among the main reasons that effort failed. But now the two groups have weathered leaks to the news media and other setbacks in a sign of how serious both Democrats and Republicans are about getting a bill on President Obama's desk by the end of the year.Some involved in the negotiations remained hopeful that a deal would be reached by the weekend, but the Congressional recess, along with the Good Friday observance, made it difficult to lock all the moving pieces in place, those close to the talks said. And, while the members of the bipartisan group were optimistic, aides cautioned that no deal would be final until all the senators had signed off on every piece of the legislation.The Chamber of Commerce and the A.F.L.-C.I.O., the nation's main federation of labor unions, have been in discussions parallel to those of the Senate group, and have already reached a tentative agreement about the size and scope of a temporary guest worker program, which would grant up to 200,000 new visas annually for low-skilled workers. The labor-business talks came close to breaking down last Friday, on the eve of a two-week Congressional recess, over the issue of what the pay levels should be for low-skilled immigrants — often employed at restaurants and hotels or on construction projects — who could be brought in when employers said they faced labor shortages.One of the last sticking points in the business-labor negotiations has been the specific type of jobs that would be excluded from the program. The nation's construction unions, officials in the talks said, have persuaded the negotiators to exclude certain higher-skilled jobs, including crane operators and electricians, from the guest worker program.Eliseo Medina, the secretary-treasurer of the Service Employees International Union and one of labor's most influential voices on immigration issues, said, "We may be very close to a point where the senators will have an announcement soon."The tentative agreement seems to satisfy both groups: The business community is likely to see a number of visas that it considers adequate, while the agreement on wages is likely to please labor because it is not expected to affect the labor market adversely."The labor movement has been united in making sure aspiring Americans get a road map to citizenship and that any future flow program doesn't reduce wages for any local workers," said Tom Snyder, manager of the A.F.L.-C.I.O.'s Citizenship Now campaign. "And we will succeed on both fronts because politicians have heard immigrant communities loud and clear: citizenship now."Still, Randy Johnson, the senior vice president for labor, immigration, and employee benefits at the Chamber of Commerce, cautioned that any official agreement would come from the bipartisan Senate group."We advise senators on the Hill how to write the bill, and they decide on what bill would make sound legislation," he said.According to participants in the conversations, after the business-labor talks came close to breaking down last week, some union officials pressed the labor negotiators to show more flexibility to avoid losing momentum over the guest worker issue. At the same time, some business leaders and Republican lawmakers pressed the Chamber to be more flexible on the guest worker issue so as not to derail the overall immigration overhaul.Business and labor reached agreement in recent days on the contentious issue of how many guest workers would be admitted each year, several officials said. They said the number would start at 20,000 visas a year and could grow to a maximum of 200,000 annually."There is a formula that will allow it to grow and shrink according to economic needs," said Tamar Jacoby, the president of ImmigrationWorks, a group that represents small businesses on immigration matters.She said the formula agreed to was not flexible enough to meet the needs of specific industries in specific places.The number of guest workers allowed in would increase as the nation's unemployment rate fell and the number of job openings increased. A federal commission would also assess the need for guest workers, with an eye to shortages in specific industries and communities.In the negotiations, business vigorously objected to labor's push to have employers pay guest workers more than they pay local workers — an idea labor pushed to encourage employers to increase wages and to discourage them from bringing in guest workers.To settle that dispute, officials said, the two sides agreed that guest workers would be paid the prevailing industry wage previously used in the guest worker program. These officials said that employers who faced a labor shortage even after the national guest worker quota was filled could request a "safety valve" exemption to bring in workers, but with additional administrative hurdles and at a higher wage rate than the prevailing wage."Business and labor leaders both agree that we need a system that responds to the needs of our economy, and we are now in a position where they're both coming together around key reforms that will fix the broken immigration system and move our economy forward," said John Feinblatt, the chief policy adviser to Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York and the chairman of the Partnership for a New American Economy.
WASHINGTON — The nation's top business and labor groups have reached an agreement on a guest worker program for low-skilled immigrants, a person with knowledge of the negotiations said on Saturday. The deal clears the path for broad immigration legislation to be introduced when Congress returns from its two-week recess in mid-April.Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, convened a conference call on Friday night with Thomas J. Donohue, the president of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, and Richard L. Trumka, the president of the A.F.L.-C.I.O., the nation's main federation of labor unions, in which they agreed in principle on a guest worker program for low-skilled, year-round temporary workers. Mr. Schumer is one of eight senators from both parties who have been negotiating an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws.Pay for guest workers was the last major sticking point on a broad immigration package, and one that had stalled the eight senators just before the break. The eight senators still need to sign off on the agreement between the business and labor groups, the person with knowledge of the talks said."This issue has always been the deal breaker on immigration reform, but not this time," Mr. Schumer said.The accord between the influential business and labor groups all but assured that the bipartisan group of senators would introduce their broad immigration legislation in the next few weeks. Their bill, which they have been meeting about several times a week since the November election, would provide a path to citizenship for the 11 million illegal immigrants already in the country. It would also take steps to secure the nation's borders.A similar bipartisan group in the House has been meeting on and off for nearly four years, and hopes to unveil its own immigration legislation shortly.The agreement resolved what the pay level should be for low-skilled immigrants — often employed at hotels and restaurants or on construction projects — who could be brought in during labor shortages.Labor groups wanted to ensure that guest workers would not be paid less than the median wage in their respective industries, and the two sides compromised by agreeing that guest workers would be paid the higher of the prevailing industry wage as determined by the Labor Department or the actual employer wage.Under the deal, guest workers would be allowed to pursue a path to citizenship and to change jobs after they arrived in the United States.Another sticking point, involving the specific type of jobs that would be included in the guest worker program, was also resolved. Though low-skilled construction workers will be included in the visa program, construction unions persuaded the negotiators to exclude certain types of more skilled jobs — like crane operators and electricians — from the program, officials involved in the talks said.According to officials with the A.F.L.-C.I.O., the program would start at 20,000 visas, rising to 35,000 visas in the second year, 55,000 in the third and 75,000 in the fourth. In the fifth year, the program would expand or shrink based on the unemployment rate, the ratio of job openings to unemployed workers and various other factors. The agreement calls for a maximum of 200,000 guest visas granted each year.One third of all visas available in any given year would go to businesses with fewer than 25 employees. No more than 15,000 visas per year would go to construction occupations.Business groups, which had long been pushing to allow in 400,000 such guest workers each year, will get what they regard as an adequate number to meet the needs of employers.Mr. Schumer also spoke on Saturday with Denis McDonough, the White House chief of staff, to update him on the agreement. President Obama is eager for an overhaul of the immigration system and has threatened to step in with his own plan if Congress does not move quickly with legislation of its own."The president continues to be encouraged by progress being made by the bipartisan group of senators," said Clark Stevens, a White House spokesman. "We look forward to seeing language once it is introduced, and expect legislation to move forward as soon as possible."But Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida and a member of the bipartisan group, sent a letter Saturday to Senator Patrick Leahy, Democrat of Vermont and the chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee, urging against "excessive haste" in considering the soon-to-be-introduced legislation. The support of voters will be crucial for passing any immigration law, Mr. Rubio said in the letter, and "that support can only be earned through full and careful consideration of legislative language and an open process of amendments."Shortly before the conference call on Friday night between Mr. Schumer, Mr. Donohue and Mr. Trumka ended, one of the men suggested that the three of them get together soon for dinner; it had been, they all agreed, a long few weeks.
HAZLETON, Pa. — Before Arizona's crackdown on illegal immigrants, before "self-deportation" became the Republican presidential platform in 2012, there was Hazleton.This working-class city in the Poconos passed the country's first law aimed at making life so difficult for illegal immigrants that they would pack up and leave.Hazleton has faded from the national attention it drew with its Illegal Immigration Relief Act in 2006. But as Republicans in Congress advance plans to provide a path to citizenship for the 11 million illegal immigrants in the country, the city presents a test case of whether the party risks leaving behind a critical part of its core constituency: white working-class voters for whom illegal immigration stirs visceral reactions.A city of 25,000 on a mountain plateau, a former center of coal and rail, Hazleton evokes the white, ethnic Pennsylvania stronghold in "The Deer Hunter," the 1978 Robert De Niro movie. Local officials and many non-Hispanic residents said last week that they did not accept the reasoning of Republican leaders in Washington, including some 2016 presidential hopefuls, that giving legal status to illegal immigrants was overdue and a political imperative if Republicans are to win more Hispanic voters."I'm totally against it," said Jim Murphy, a lifelong resident who was sharing a pitcher of beer with a friend at Senape's Tavern Pitza, under a McCain-Palin bumper sticker from 2008. "Illegal is illegal. Chase them all out. They don't belong here."Joanne Ustynoski, who owns a small automotive business with her husband, Mickey, echoed many native residents who said that illegal immigrants in Hazleton received government benefits and were not as committed to hard work as their own forebears from Italy, Poland and Ukraine."They've got so much now," Ms. Ustynoski said. "I am so disgusted. Mickey and I work so hard."The city's crackdown in 2006 was led by Lou Barletta, then the mayor and now a congressman. On Wednesday, he wrote to a bipartisan group of eight House members working on an immigration overhaul bill to criticize them for heading "down the path of proposing some form of amnesty."Mr. Barletta, a Republican, said he expected the group to present a bill shortly after the Easter recess, a counterpart to a Senate effort to allow millions of illegal immigrants to work legally and to begin a path to citizenship without having to return home first.In an interview at his district office in Hazleton, Mr. Barletta said Republican leaders in Washington want to "get immigration off the table" because it had been so costly in November, when President Obama won re-election with a landslide of Hispanic votes."Why are we even talking about a pathway to citizenship when our borders aren't even close to being secure?" said Mr. Barletta, vowing to fight a plan that would allow millions of illegal immigrants to compete legally for jobs."Let's not take on any more water on this sinking ship," he said. "Let's patch the holes. Then we'll decide what do we do with all this water that's here."The law Hazleton passed in 2006 penalized employers for hiring illegal immigrants and landlords for renting to them. In 2010, a federal appeals court declared the law unconstitutional. But the next year, the United States Supreme Court upheld a similar Arizona law, and it ordered the Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit, in Philadelphia, to review Hazleton's ordinance.Despite Hazleton's reputation as one of America's toughest cities toward illegal immigrants, the Hispanic population there has surged. The 2010 census showed Hispanic residents totaling 37 percent of the population, up from 5 percent in 2000.They are attracted by jobs at warehouses and at a meatpacking plant, by good schools and cheap housing, Mayor Joseph Yannuzzi said. "We really enjoy having the Hispanic community come here and revitalize a portion of our town."He and others insisted that the city is welcoming to legal immigrants and has an undeserved reputation. Still, he contrasted illegal immigrants with older waves of European newcomers in terms many Hispanics find insensitive."My parents were taught, you're here to be Americans, speak English," he said. "If you come over the fence, do you want to be an American, or do you just want to be in the country?"
WASHINGTON — As several of the eight senators taking part in a bipartisan effort to overhaul to the nation's immigration laws appeared on television Sunday to voice optimism about the negotiations, Senator Marco Rubio , a member of the group, issued a strongly worded message of caution."No Final Agreement on Immigration Legislation Yet" was the headline, all in capital letters, of a statement released by his office on Sunday.An aide to Mr. Rubio, Republican of Florida, said his comments were not intended to suggest that a deal was unlikely. Instead, his aim was to keep expectations in check until the details of the legislation are complete, and to urge the group to take the bill through "regular order," which he says is necessary to garner public support. That process involves public hearings and amendments from other senators both in committee and on the Senate floor.As the group of eight senators, split evenly between Democrats and Republicans, inches closer to a bill that would provide a path to citizenship for the 11 million illegal immigrants already in the country, Mr. Rubio seems determined to keep his conservative credentials intact.Mr. Rubio was elected in 2010 as part of a Tea Party wave and is considered an early contender for the Republican presidential nomination in 2016. Although that race is still far away, any Oval Office ambitions that Mr. Rubio has are likely to hinge, in part, on his success at selling an immigration overhaul to his party's conservative base, which has resisted a path to citizenship for illegal immigrants.Despite Mr. Rubio's remarks, Congressional aides and several of the eight senators say the group is still on track to introduce comprehensive immigration legislation when Congress returns from its break."It will be rolled out next week," Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina and a member of the group, said on the CNN program "State of the Union" on Sunday.In his statement, Mr. Rubio did not say the group was not proceeding apace; he simply counseled restraint."I'm encouraged by reports of an agreement between business groups and unions on the issue of guest workers," he said. "However, reports that the bipartisan group of eight senators have agreed on a legislative proposal are premature."Mr. Rubio was referring to news reports on Saturday that the nation's leading business and labor groups had agreed on a guest worker program for low-skilled workers, one of the final sticking points in the negotiations among the eight senators."We have made substantial progress, and I believe we will be able to agree on a legislative proposal that modernizes our legal immigration system, improves border security and enforcement and allows those here illegally to earn the chance to one day apply for permanent residency contingent upon certain triggers being met," Mr. Rubio said. "However, that legislation will only be a starting point."On Saturday, as news broke of the deal between business and labor, Mr. Rubio sounded a similar note of caution, sending a letter to Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont and chairman of the Judiciary Committee, warning him not to take up an immigration overhaul with "excessive haste."At the outset of the bipartisan group's talks, Mr. Rubio went on something of a one-man media tour, trying to sell the broad principles behind an immigration overhaul to conservative hosts on television and radio. Recently he has been saying he believes an immigration bill needs to be the result of a deeply deliberate process.His news release on Sunday seemed another attempt to make sure that the immigration legislation does not get out ahead of him — and that he remains integral to every step of the process.On the NBC program "Meet the Press," two other senators in the bipartisan group — Jeff Flake, Republican of Arizona, and Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York — were asked about a possible disagreement with Mr. Rubio. Both men played down Mr. Rubio's statements and offered him words of praise."It's semantics," Mr. Schumer said, brushing away the possibility of any tension within the group. "And he's correctly pointing out that that language hasn't been fully drafted. There'll be little kerfuffles. But I don't think any of us expect there to be problems."Mr. Schumer added: "He's been an active and strong participant. He's had a lot of input into the bill."Similarly, Mr. Flake called Mr. Rubio "extremely important to this effort," and he said he agreed with Mr. Rubio that any immigration legislation should go through the process of public hearings and amendments.Mr. Flake and Mr. Schumer said they remained confident that a deal was forthcoming. "I expect that we're going to have agreement among the eight," Mr. Schumer said.On CNN, Mr. Graham said he was confident that a bill would be introduced imminently. "I think we've got a deal," he said. "We've got to write the legislation, but 2013, I hope, will be the year that we pass bipartisan immigration reform."
WASHINGTON — In the shadow of a bipartisan Senate group preparing to roll out broad immigration legislation next week, shortly after Congress returns from its holiday break, a bipartisan group of eight House members is readying its own bill.In contrast to the Senate plan — which would provide one clear, if difficult, path to citizenship for the 11 million illegal immigrants already in the country — the House legislation will most likely offer three distinct paths to legal status.Young immigrants in the country without legal papers, who often call themselves "Dreamers," and low-skilled agricultural workers would qualify for an expedited road to legal status, people familiar with the negotiations said. The Dreamers should not be punished for being brought illegally to the country by their parents, House aides said, and the members agreed that the agricultural workers perform crucial work for the economy.In an opinion article in The Los Angeles Times on Sunday, Representative Raúl R. Labrador, a Republican member of the group from Idaho, more explicitly laid out the path for Dreamers: "Those who entered the U.S. as children, through no fault of their own, will be allowed to have a pathway to citizenship."The second group to receive a path to legal permanent residence would be immigrants who have either a family or an employment relationship that would allow them to apply for legal status, except that they have already entered the country illegally. Currently, most of those immigrants would have to return to their home country for either 3 or 10 years before they would be eligible to reapply.The House bill would most likely relax or waive those barriers. Immigrants would then have to return to their home country to apply for legal status, aides said, but could do so only after completing a series of hurdles including paying fines and back taxes and learning English, aides said.The remaining illegal immigrants could apply for "provisional legal status" if they came forward and admitted breaking the law, paid fines and back taxes, and learned English, much as they could under the Senate plan, aides said. This status would allow them to live, work and travel in the country legally, and they could then apply through regular channels for a green card after 10 years and citizenship 5 years after that.This comprise seems to mollify both sides: Republicans could reassure their base that illegal immigrants would not receive a special path to citizenship, while Democrats are satisfied because the plan would allow for the option of citizenship down the road.A Democrat in the House group, Representative Luis V. Gutierrez of Illinois, wrote last month in The Orange County Register: "It seems that the Republican bottom line when it comes to how to legalize undocumented immigrants in the U.S. is that we do not create a 'new special path to citizenship' for only undocumented immigrants outside the paths we make available to all immigrants.""On the Democratic side," he added, "we want to make sure we do not preclude anyone from citizenship who would be legalized under immigration reform."The House group is still debating what benefits, if any, immigrants would receive during their provisional legal status, though a Republican with knowledge of the talks said the group had agreed that no government-subsidized benefits would be included. The group is also discussing what border security standards would need to be met before any path to legal permanent residence could begin.Another sticking point is a guest worker program. Though the U.S. Chamber of Commerce and the A.F.L.-C.I.O., the nation's largest federation of unions, have reached an agreement that the Senate group is adopting, Republicans in the House group remain wary of the deal.Aides to the House group have been meeting during the recess, and the members hope to release their bill before the senators officially announce theirs. Though some senators have promised to unveil their bill next week, staff members on the House side remained skeptical."If they do, I will be shocked," one said. "If they do, I will buy them all dinner."
A path to citizenship for the 11 million immigrants living in the country illegally has become central to the debate on overhauling the immigration system, but recent polls have indicated that many Americans are still making up their minds on the issue, with doubts persisting about what such a path would mean in practice.The debate could move into high gear next week when a bipartisan group in the Senate is expected to introduce a broad bill, including proposals to allow immigrants here illegally to gain legal status and eventually become citizens. A bipartisan group in the House is also in the final stages of preparing a comprehensive bill.In six nationwide nonpartisan polls released since January, at least 70 percent of Americans said they supported options allowing those immigrants to remain in the country with some form of legal status. Generally only about one-quarter of those polled said the immigrants should not be allowed to stay.But results vary widely when Americans are asked whether legal status should include the possibility of citizenship. In a large national poll released on March 21 by the Public Religion Research Institute and the Brookings Institution, 63 percent of Americans said immigrants here illegally should be allowed to become citizens if they met certain requirements.In a poll published a week later by the Pew Research Center, which asked about citizenship in a slightly different way, only 43 percent said they would give citizenship to the immigrants, while 24 percent said the immigrants should be allowed to stay as permanent residents but not citizens. The 20-point gap points to a difficulty facing lawmakers as they sell their proposals to revamp the immigration system: its procedures are unfamiliar and puzzling to many Americans.The most important overhaul proposals in play would all modify or expand on a core progression in existing law. Currently, certain immigrants who have family ties or employment prospects here can become legal permanent residents with a green card. That is the first step on the path to citizenship, because permanent residents can apply to naturalize after five years, or three years if they are married to citizens.Lawmakers are wrangling about if and when immigrants who are here illegally should be allowed to apply for green cards, and whether to create a new class of residents who would not be permitted to apply for citizenship.Some polling questions imply that illegal immigrants would move quickly to citizenship. In fact, the proposals emerging in both houses of Congress would offer naturalization for most illegal immigrants after no less than 13 years, and in some cases far longer. According to staff members, the bipartisan Senate group known as the Gang of Eight is considering a plan to make immigrants wait 10 years in a probationary status before they could apply for green cards, but would then allow them to apply for citizenship after only three years.House lawmakers are weighing proposals that would also allow immigrants to apply for green cards after 10 years, with naturalization possible five years after that. President Obama has prepared a plan, which he has not publicized, in which the five-year path to citizenship would begin after eight years of provisional status.All proposals place significant hurdles along the way, including requirements to pay fines and back taxes, pass criminal background checks, and learn English and American civics."There is broad recognition that these folks will have to go through a process of atonement," said Benjamin E. Johnson, executive director of the American Immigration Council, a group in Washington that works to build support for immigration. "But ultimately at the end of the process they would become full-fledged members of our society through American citizenship."None of the citizenship paths under consideration will be complete, however, without measures to reduce huge backlogs in the legal immigration system — an issue that has had little public discussion. One point of agreement between lawmakers from both parties who are working on legislation, as well as Mr. Obama, is that immigrants who have been here illegally have to go to the back of the line behind applicants who followed the rules.Because of numerical caps on visas for foreigners seeking residency, more than four million people who have been approved for green cards are waiting in those lines for visas, according to official figures. They include about 1.3 million Mexicans, but only 47,250 visas are available for Mexicans each year, according to the State Department. Some Mexican-born children of American citizens must wait 20 years for visas.A political fight is coming on this issue. Democrats hope to raise or eliminate the caps, at least temporarily, to allow these applicants to move through rapidly, and they want to make new green cards available for immigrants who finish their provisional term.Two leading Republicans in the negotiations, Senator Marco Rubio of Florida and Representative Raúl R. Labrador of Idaho, reject any separate path to citizenship, insisting that formerly illegal immigrants should be able to apply for green cards only through the existing system, a plan that could add many years before naturalization if current backlogs are not sharply reduced. Republicans, whose voters, recent polls show, are more skeptical about the value of immigration, are reluctant to increase visa numbers. They have proposed freeing up visas by eliminating some relatives of immigrants from eligibility.Lawmakers on all sides are facing intense pressure from immigrants, especially Latinos, who have been pushing hard for a direct path to citizenship."Since the end of slavery we have not created a second class of Americans," said Angelica Salas, executive director of the Coalition for Humane Immigrant Rights of Los Angeles, "and we should not start now."
WASHINGTON — When Senator Marco Rubio , Republican of Florida, last appeared with a bipartisan group of senators to discuss their plans for a broad overhaul of the nation's immigration laws, he looked optimistic, apple-cheeked — and slightly nervous.Given the disdain some conservatives reserve for Republicans who consort publicly with Democrats, he had reason to be.The next time Mr. Rubio is likely to appear with his colleagues in the eight-person bipartisan group could be an even bigger moment, when its members officially introduce joint immigration legislation this month. The probable tableau seems ready-made for problems in the 2016 Republican presidential primary fight in which many expect Mr. Rubio to partake: images of Mr. Rubio, smiling and celebrating alongside Democratic senators and maverick Republicans as he claims co-authorship of an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws that many Republicans will reject.And so the question percolating on Capitol Hill has become: Will Mr. Rubio, an up-and-coming young conservative elected on a 2010 Tea Party wave, ultimately sign onto the immigration bill that he has been helping to draft ever since the November election?"We have to see if the Boy Wonder plays ball or not," said Frank Sharry, executive director of America's Voice, a pro-immigration group.For now, the answer — among members of the bipartisan group, immigration watchers and even Mr. Rubio's own staff — is a tentative yes, even with Mr. Rubio increasingly urging caution about racing ahead with any immigration measure as the unveiling draws nigh."We understand Marco is not going to be rushed into anything," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and a member of the group. "But we don't doubt his commitment to seeing this through at all."In recent days, Mr. Rubio has begun to sound nervous again when it comes to the immigration legislation. He sent a letter to Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Vermont Democrat who is chairman of the Judiciary Committee, counseling against "excessive haste" in changing immigration law. On Sunday, just moments before two of his fellow bipartisan group members were set to appear on NBC's "Meet the Press," he released a statement that warned, "No final agreement on immigration legislation yet."Mr. Rubio finds himself in an extremely delicate position as a rising conservative hero and a proponent of immigration law changes. As much as the fate of the bipartisan group's legislation hangs on Mr. Rubio, who is perhaps the only member of the group with the conservative credentials to sell the plan to skeptical voters, the fate of Mr. Rubio's ambitions for higher office are also inextricably bound up with the immigration legislation and his base's reaction to it.So far, Mr. Rubio has seen early success wooing grass-roots Republican voters. When he joined the bipartisan group late last year, after Mitt Romney lost the presidential election in part because he was overwhelmingly rejected by Hispanic voters, Mr. Rubio quickly went on a one-man blitz of conservative news media outlets, explaining his guiding immigration principles and winning plaudits from the likes of Rush Limbaugh and Sean Hannity."The argument is that it's not conservative policy to have 11 million illegal immigrants in this country," said Phil Musser, a Republican consultant and former executive director of the Republican Governors Association. "By showing up and by boldly deciding to engage people who have had their fingers in their ears on this issue, he's been able to decalcify a process that's been stuck for a long time."He and his staff have studied the mistakes of the last attempt at immigration overhaul, in 2007, and have tailored their pitch to address conservative concerns. Mr. Rubio stresses that strict goals for border security must be met before any illegal immigrants can be put on a path to citizenship. And he talks of refining the current system — from increased enforcement to a workable plan for future legal immigrants — saying he wants to ensure the country does not face another wave of illegal immigrants down the road."His emphasis on strong border security and enforcement is a big deal, and I think the Democrats are finally beginning to get that, and I think that is because of his strong leadership and communication skills," said Mel Martinez, a former Republican senator from Florida who was part of the failed 2007 attempt at an immigration overhaul.In calling for a full committee review, Mr. Rubio also hopes to prevent the dynamic that helped kill the 2007 bill — the impression the immigration proposal was written in secret, then rushed to the Senate floor.Mr. Rubio has also been active behind the scenes. In one-on-one phone calls and meetings, he has continued to regularly reach out to conservative news media outlets, grass-roots supporters and House Republicans. ("By the way, I spoke to Marco Rubio today about this off the air," enthused Mr. Limbaugh on his show Thursday. "He's insistent this thing not be ramrodded through, that there be hearings.")In January, Mr. Rubio brought Enrique Gonzalez, a well-known immigration lawyer based in Miami, onto his staff full time, and has assigned a legislative assistant to work nearly exclusively on immigration issues.Within the bipartisan group, Mr. Rubio has also taken a vocal role. He is part of a smaller group working to negotiate an expedited visa program for agricultural workers, he was the final holdout over a deal between the business and labor communities for a guest worker program, and he has sought to hold the line on border security and enforcement.At the same time, Mr. Rubio has deliberately avoided defining himself solely by the issue of immigration. He barely mentioned immigration during the official Republican response he gave to the president's State of the Union address. At a major speech at the Conservative Political Action Conference, he did not bring up the topic at all.Democrats in the bipartisan group say they understand that Mr. Rubio is in a politically tight spot, and are willing to give him more leeway to publicly question aspects of the process, because they believe he will be instrumental to the bill's success. After the bipartisan group introduces its legislation, they hope Mr. Rubio will play high-profile role in selling their overhaul to reluctant Republicans.Still, Mr. Sharry, the immigration advocate, said Mr. Rubio could raise only so many objections to an immigration overhaul before he starts to look like "the boy who cried wolf.""It's like, dude, chill," Mr. Sharry said. "Yes, you are uniquely qualified to be a conservative fighting for immigration reform that comports with conservative values."
WASHINGTON — As the U.S. baseball season begins, it seems appropriate to borrow an analogy from the sport: Will the "can't miss" young phenomenon of the political world, Senator Marco Rubio, be able to play in the big leagues? The immigration battle affords a good test.Mr. Rubio, a conservative Republican of Florida, is part of a small group of lawmakers trying to fashion a comprehensive immigration measure that would create a pathway to citizenship for most of the 11 million undocumented workers in the United States, change the criteria for new entrants and devote more resources to border security.A deal, probably with President Barack Obama's support, will be unveiled in the next 10 days. Hearings will start this month, and a bill could pass the Senate by June.Mr. Rubio, a Cuban-American, is trying to pull off a delicate balancing act: help Republicans mitigate political shortcomings with Hispanic and Asian voters while keeping watch over his right shoulder for unfriendly elements in the party.His goal is to get credit for playing a pivotal role in passing the first major immigration measure in more than a quarter-century even as he convinces the conservative base that the measure would have been far more permissive without his involvement. One source of praise he would not welcome: Mr. Obama.Then, Mr. Rubio would run for president in 2016.To date, the 42-year-old freshman senator has handled this juggling act skillfully. Part of the inner core of congressional deal makers, he so far has been persuasive in tamping down right-wing objections.Inside the Senate's so-called Gang of Eight, Mr. Rubio has been cautious, at times visibly nervous, as he has tried to slow the process with little success.Challenges lie ahead. He has little leeway to come up with new hurdles that will placate the conservatives, like denying citizenship to any undocumented immigrants re-entering the United States illegally. Whatever leverage he has is matched by the Congressional Hispanic Caucus, mainly Democrats, who will not accept a diluted bill.The legislation will be written by the Senate Judiciary Committee. Mr. Rubio is not a member of the panel. But it does contain another 42-year-old Cuban-American first-term senator who is staunchly conservative and burns with ambition: Ted Cruz of Texas. He does not have much clout in the Senate, but he could make his Florida colleague squirm by attacking the bill.Some of the political stakes are overblown. Even if Mr. Rubio bolted — unlikely, though he showed signs of having cold feet late last week — the measure could still get the 60 votes it needs in the Senate if John McCain, Lindsey Graham and Jeff Flake — also Republican members of the Gang of Eight — backed it. Passage would be a messier process, however.And while polling clearly shows strong public support for an immigration overhaul, despite opposition from most Republican voters, there is little evidence that this is a major issue in party primaries. There are few examples of Republicans who have lost primaries because of their immigration stance, and Newt Gingrich, a former speaker of the House of Representatives, won the South Carolina Republican contest last year even though he was attacked as soft on immigration.At the same time, Mr. Rubio is not the savior who will deliver to Republicans the votes of Hispanics, more than 70 percent of whom went for Mr. Obama in 2012. Health care and education matter as much as immigration to most of these voters.As a national candidate, the Florida senator radiates promise. He gave what many considered the best speech at the Republican Convention in August; it was overshadowed by the debacle involving the speech by the actor Clint Eastwood the same night. Mr. Rubio's response to Mr. Obama's recent State of the Union address was considered banal, with much attention devoted to his decision to lunge for a drink of water while speaking. He shrewdly recovered, marketing the bottled water. In retail politics, he has few peers.Still, there are some red flags. On the Senate Intelligence Committee, he failed to impress some high-ranking officials who privately described him as more show than substance. In Florida, where he became speaker of the State House, he cut corners on ethics. These transgressions and concerns about governing gravitas are why he did not make Mitt Romney's final cut for the Republican vice-presidential nomination.His palpable presidential aspirations face another possible roadblock: Jeb Bush. A former Florida governor, Mr. Bush was helpful to Mr. Rubio's 2010 Senate primary victory. But there is no real trust between these two politicians, and if Mr. Bush runs in 2016, he may clear the Florida field. The smart betting is that Mr. Bush will not run.Mr. Rubio has said that "for most of my life, I've been in a hurry." It can be fatal for a promising politician to move too fast, too soon; witness Dan Quayle.Yet one who did and succeeded is in the White House today. Fans of Mr. Rubio note that in three years, he will have more experience than Mr. Obama had in 2008: two more years in the Senate and a record as a leader, not just a member, of his state Legislature. If he helps shepherd through an immigration bill, he will have the major legislative achievement that eluded Mr. Obama.
WASHINGTON — After hitting a snag last week, negotiations in the Senate for an agricultural workers program — the last piece of a broad overhaul of the nation's immigration laws — appeared to be coming back from the brink on Monday.Representatives of farmworkers and growers inched closer to a deal on wages for workers, under pressure from a bipartisan group of senators who want to move forward soon with a broad immigration overhaul.Though the overall structure for the agricultural workers program had been set, the deal broke down last week over the issue of wages and the number of visas — known as H-2A visas — the program would provide to low-skilled farmworkers."The framework has been worked out, but the questions are wage rate and the cap, and both of those things are related to whether farmworkers are paid too much or too little," said Giev Kashkooli, a national vice president of the United Farm Workers. "Growers are currently making the claim that farmworkers make too much money, and we think they're making too little."The labor unions say they want to ensure that workers are paid a fair wage, and are concerned that the growers' demand for an unlimited number of workers will make it easier for employers to exploit agricultural workers. The growers, meanwhile, say they, too, want to pay workers a fair wage, but argue that if wages are too high, no one will use the program. If the visa cap is too low, there will not be enough workers and crops will perish."If the wage is set too high, growers will be unable to afford it and there will be no jobs because those growers are either going out of business, or they're going offshore where they can meet their labor demands," said Kristi Boswell, director of Congressional relations for the American Farm Bureau Federation.The effort — which is being spearheaded by Senators Michael Bennet, Democrat of Colorado; Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California; Orrin G. Hatch, Republican of Utah; and Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida — would offer agricultural workers an expedited path to earn a green card, which could take as little as three years. (Mr. Bennet and Mr. Rubio are part of a bipartisan group of eight senators who are working on a broad overhaul of the nation's immigration laws.)Under the program being discussed, farmworkers in the country illegally could earn a green card in three to seven years, providing a path to legal status that is considerably quicker than the 10-year path under consideration by the bipartisan group for the nonagricultural workers already in the country illegally.The timeline would depend on how many days per year a farmworker was willing to work in the agricultural industry — more days providing a quicker path to a green card.First, according to several people with knowledge of the negotiations, all workers who could prove that they had worked a total of 150 days over the prior two years would qualify for a "blue card" visa, which would let them live and work here legally, and travel across state lines. Workers would then be eligible for a green card if they worked 150 days annually in three of the next five years, or 100 days annually in five of the next seven years.Both labor and growers estimate that roughly 70 percent of agricultural workers are in the country illegally, and that farmworkers make up about one million of the 11 million illegal immigrants currently in the country. The goal of the agricultural worker program, aides said, is to give farmworkers, who are often performing tough manual labor that is critical for the nation's economy, an incentive to remain in the industry."There's broad recognition about the extraordinary work farmworkers do every day and have already done every day in feeding our country," Mr. Kashkooli said. "The best way to stabilize the agricultural industry and to not have a new program where we're bringing in new people who are making low wages is to reward the people who are currently doing the work and encourage them to stay in agriculture."Still, the questions as to the number of workers who can enter the country and what wages those workers should be paid have been sticking points. Aides with knowledge of the talks said the number of workers would most likely be determined by a formula that would be overseen by the secretaries of agriculture and labor.The senators have proposed a plan in which wages would vary by job and region. For instance, a California picker and a California equipment operator could be paid at different rates, and an equipment operator in California and one in New England could also be paid differently.The growers, however, have yet to agree to the approach, said several people with knowledge of the negotiations. The workers' unions have agreed, even though they say that such a deal will lower wages by roughly 10 percent.
WASHINGTON – Congress returns to Washington on Monday with two issues reaching critical stages – gun safety legislation in the wake of the Sandy Hook Elementary School shooting and a comprehensive overhaul of the nation's immigration system.Both issues face a hard road, and action could slip into next week. But negotiations, which for two weeks have largely been between staff members, will intensify as lawmakers return from their spring break. In both cases, breakthroughs are possible by midweek.On gun-control legislation, the focus is on efforts by Senators Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, and Patrick J. Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania, to try to find a compromise on expanding federal background checks for would-be firearms buyers.The two have been discussing a possible measure that would expand background checks to gun show purchases and online sales – a more narrow field than most Democrats want. The measure would also maintain record-keeping provisions that law enforcement officials find essential in tracking criminal gun use, but which gun rights groups find anathema."Ultimately, I think we're going to have to call the Republicans' bluff," Senator Chris Murphy, Democrat of Connecticut, said, if a breakthrough cannot be reached soon. Democrats in the Senate believe that Republicans could not withstand the pressure of a straight vote on expanded background checks, which have the support of as much as 90 percent of the public.On immigration, a bipartisan group of eight senators hopes to unveil legislation that would strengthen border security, establish a new guest-worker program for foreign workers and establish a pathway to citizenship for the estimated 11 million illegal immigrants already in the country. That, too, could slip to next week amid hard negotiations, especially over the scope of the guest-worker program.Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Vermont Democrat who is chairman of the Judiciary Committee, said the window for moving on immigration was narrowing, and if the group of eight senators could not reach agreement in the next week or two, he would have to begin a more formal legislative process in his committee."This is one where the senators are going to have to stand up and vote yes or vote no," he said.Adding to the tension and emotions of the issues, the families of children and educators killed at Sandy Hook in Connecticut will converge in Washington for private meetings with senators on Tuesday, Wednesday and Thursday. Rallies are also in the works for immigrant populations pushing for change. Such shows of force helped galvanize legislative drives on the immigration issue in 2006 and 2007, but they were not enough to get hard-fought legislation through the Senate.On the fiscal front, President Obama's budget release on Wednesday will add a third set of tax-and-spending plans to a Republican version that has passed the House and a Democratic one that passed the Senate. That should kick off talks to try to find some common ground and reach a deficit deal that would encompass changes to entitlement programs like Social Security and Medicare and an effort to overhaul and simplify the tax code.But gun legislation is the most immediate concern. The effort has been trapped between various political factions in the Senate. The fight over background checks has been about the balance between how far to expand the current checks at licensed firearms dealers and conservatives' fears over a paper trail that they insist could lead to a de facto national gun registry.Specifically, Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, was close to a deal to expand the checks almost universally, but one of his chief Republican allies, Senator Tom Coburn of Oklahoma, pulled away because he did not support record-keeping of those transactions, which is standard on gun sales.Mr. Coburn would still like to press forward. His vision is for an online gun-check "portal" that would allow rural gun buyers to get pre-clearance to make their purchases but to leave no record of the transaction. Aides say the enforcement of gun checks would come from the fear of sting operations and stiff penalties – similar to the way restaurants and stores are policed to stop the sale of alcohol to those under age 21.But Senate Democratic leadership aides say pulling back on the universality of background checks is very likely to be more preferable than jettisoning the record-keeping that law enforcement wants. One of the strengths of the current background check system is the ability it gives the police to track a gun used in a crime to the person who bought it – something that is only possible if sales records are kept. Aides say Mr. Toomey may be inclined to support that compromise.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, has indicated that he is willing to push the debate of gun legislation to next week to give the background-check negotiations more time. Without a bipartisan deal, breaking a threatened Republican filibuster would most likely be impossible."It will be a testing time for a lot of senators who know in their hearts it's the right thing to do, and know from the polls that a majority of Americans support it," said Senator Richard Blumenthal, Democrat of Connecticut.And if the gun bill falls to a filibuster, the Senate will again be confronted with Democratic unrest over the rules that now mandate 60 votes for the passage of any bill with even a modicum of controversy. Even old bulls like Mr. Leahy are growing discontented."I believe in protecting the rights of the minority in the Senate," he said, "but this has become about ego trips, not about the good of the country."
WASHINGTON – Congress returns to Washington on Monday with two issues reaching critical stages – gun safety legislation in the wake of the Sandy Hook Elementary School shooting and a comprehensive overhaul of the nation's immigration system.Both issues face a hard road, and action could slip into next week. But negotiations, which for two weeks have largely been between staff members, will intensify as lawmakers return from their spring break. In both cases, breakthroughs are possible by midweek.On gun-control legislation, the focus is on efforts by Senators Joe Manchin III, Democrat of West Virginia, and Patrick J. Toomey, Republican of Pennsylvania, to try to find a compromise on expanding federal background checks for would-be firearms buyers.The two have been discussing a possible measure that would expand background checks to gun show purchases and online sales – a more narrow field than most Democrats want. The measure would also maintain record-keeping provisions that law enforcement officials find essential in tracking criminal gun use, but which gun rights groups find anathema."Ultimately, I think we're going to have to call the Republicans' bluff," Senator Chris Murphy, Democrat of Connecticut, said, if a breakthrough cannot be reached soon. Democrats in the Senate believe that Republicans could not withstand the pressure of a straight vote on expanded background checks, which have the support of as much as 90 percent of the public.On immigration, a bipartisan group of eight senators hopes to unveil legislation that would strengthen border security, establish a new guest-worker program for foreign workers and establish a pathway to citizenship for the estimated 11 million illegal immigrants already in the country. That, too, could slip to next week amid hard negotiations, especially over the scope of the guest-worker program.Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Vermont Democrat who is chairman of the Judiciary Committee, said the window for moving on immigration was narrowing, and if the group of eight senators could not reach agreement in the next week or two, he would have to begin a more formal legislative process in his committee."This is one where the senators are going to have to stand up and vote yes or vote no," he said.Adding to the tension and emotions of the issues, the families of children and educators killed at Sandy Hook in Connecticut will converge in Washington for private meetings with senators on Tuesday, Wednesday and Thursday. Rallies are also in the works for immigrant populations pushing for change. Such shows of force helped galvanize legislative drives on the immigration issue in 2006 and 2007, but they were not enough to get hard-fought legislation through the Senate.On the fiscal front, President Obama's budget release on Wednesday will add a third set of tax-and-spending plans to a Republican version that has passed the House and a Democratic one that passed the Senate. That should kick off talks to try to find some common ground and reach a deficit deal that would encompass changes to entitlement programs like Social Security and Medicare and an effort to overhaul and simplify the tax code.But gun legislation is the most immediate concern. The effort has been trapped between various political factions in the Senate. The fight over background checks has been about the balance between how far to expand the current checks at licensed firearms dealers and conservatives' fears over a paper trail that they insist could lead to a de facto national gun registry.Specifically, Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, was close to a deal to expand the checks almost universally, but one of his chief Republican allies, Senator Tom Coburn of Oklahoma, pulled away because he did not support record-keeping of those transactions, which is standard on gun sales.Mr. Coburn would still like to press forward. His vision is for an online gun-check "portal" that would allow rural gun buyers to get pre-clearance to make their purchases but to leave no record of the transaction. Aides say the enforcement of gun checks would come from the fear of sting operations and stiff penalties – similar to the way restaurants and stores are policed to stop the sale of alcohol to those under age 21.But Senate Democratic leadership aides say pulling back on the universality of background checks is very likely to be more preferable than jettisoning the record-keeping that law enforcement wants. One of the strengths of the current background check system is the ability it gives the police to track a gun used in a crime to the person who bought it – something that is only possible if sales records are kept. Aides say Mr. Toomey may be inclined to support that compromise.Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, has indicated that he is willing to push the debate of gun legislation to next week to give the background-check negotiations more time. Without a bipartisan deal, breaking a threatened Republican filibuster would most likely be impossible."It will be a testing time for a lot of senators who know in their hearts it's the right thing to do, and know from the polls that a majority of Americans support it," said Senator Richard Blumenthal, Democrat of Connecticut.And if the gun bill falls to a filibuster, the Senate will again be confronted with Democratic unrest over the rules that now mandate 60 votes for the passage of any bill with even a modicum of controversy. Even old bulls like Mr. Leahy are growing discontented."I believe in protecting the rights of the minority in the Senate," he said, "but this has become about ego trips, not about the good of the country."
WASHINGTON — A bipartisan group of senators has largely agreed on a broad immigration bill that would require tough border measures to be in place before illegal immigrants could take the first steps to become American citizens, according to several people familiar with drafts of the legislation.But in a delicate compromise worked out over weeks of negotiations, the bill does not impose any specific measurements of border enforcement results that, if they were not met, would stop the immigrants from proceeding toward citizenship.Instead, the bill allows a period of 10 years for the Department of Homeland Security to make plans and use resources to fortify enforcement at the borders and elsewhere within the country before it sets several broader hurdles that could derail the immigrants' progress toward citizenship if they are not achieved.During the first decade after passage, the bill sets ambitious goals for border authorities — including continuous surveillance of 100 percent of the United States border and 90 percent effectiveness of enforcement in several high-risk sectors — and for other workplace and visa enforcement measures. It provides at least $3 billion for Homeland Security officials to meet those goals during the first five years, with a possibility of additional financing.The bill includes provisions, or "triggers," during that decade that allow Congress at different points to ensure the enforcement goals are being met.As the group of eight senators continued on Wednesday to iron out final details of the legislation, several tens of thousands of immigrants, Latinos, labor union members, gay rights and other advocates held a rally on the lawn below the steps of the Capitol. With many waving American flags, they called for Congress to move quickly and demanded a direct path to citizenship for all 11 million illegal immigrants."Families cannot continue to be torn apart," Gustavo Torres, executive director of CASA de Maryland, an immigrant advocacy group, told the crowd."Anything less than citizenship undermines American democracy," he insisted.Senator Robert Menendez of New Jersey, a Democrat who is one of the eight senators working to draft the legislation, told the crowd that the group was close to presenting a bill."We have to get those who are in the shadows into the light to have an opportunity to earn their citizenship and be part of the dream," said Mr. Menendez, who like many of the other speakers delivered his words in both English and Spanish.The senators' compromise allows Republican lawmakers, including Senators John McCain of Arizona and Marco Rubio of Florida, to say that they achieved border enforcement advances in the bill as a condition before any illegal immigrants can apply for permanent-resident green cards, the first step toward citizenship.But it also allows Democrats to describe the border measures as goals that can be achieved with the resources provided, so they will not become roadblocks that could stop the immigrants from reaching the final stage of citizenship.President Obama, who has been largely silent during the negotiations, is strongly opposed to any hindrances on the immigrants' path that could be the focus of political battles later on.As drafted, the legislation would provide as much as $3.5 billion for the Department of Homeland Security to set up a five-year border security plan. Officials must present the plan within six months, and no immigrants can gain any provisional legal status until the plan is in place. It would include a program to finish any border fencing that border agents deem necessary.The plan must also show how the authorities will move quickly to spread technology across the border to ensure that agents can have surveillance capability along its entire length. They will also have five years to reach 90 percent effectiveness in their operations, a measure based on calculations of what percentage of illegal crossers were caught or turned back without crossing.
WASHINGTON — The sweeping immigration bill that a bipartisan group of senators is preparing will include a major new merit-based program for foreigners to become permanent legal residents based on their work skills, including both high-skilled and blue-collar workers, according to people familiar with a draft of the legislation.Over time the program, just one piece of the bill, would open up many new opportunities for foreigners to settle in the United States based on their skills, a shift from the focus on family ties that is the main foundation of the current immigration system.But the bill will also include a host of measures to eliminate, over 10 years, a backlog of 4.7 million immigrants who have applied to come here legally and have been languishing in the system, waiting for permanent resident visas known as green cards. As a result, during the next decade, millions of immigrants who have been waiting patiently for legal documents will be united with their family members here.The bill, an intricate combination of many interlocking parts, also provides a path to citizenship for an estimated 11 million immigrants living in the country illegally. Under the plan, those immigrants would wait at least 13 years before they could apply to become citizens.The eight senators who are drafting the legislation, including Charles E. Schumer of New York, a Democrat, and Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, a Republican, said this week that they had reached broad agreement on its major pieces and hoped to present it early next week.Mr. Schumer said Thursday that all issues among the senators had been resolved. "All that's left is the drafting," he said.At the crux of the legislation is an effort to bridge the gap between Democrats, who strongly support and are seeking to protect family immigration, and Republicans, who are eager to move immigration toward a system based on work skills that foreigners bring to the United States.The senators are under pressure to move quickly to introduce the bill. Senator Patrick J. Leahy of Vermont, a Democrat who is chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee, has scheduled a hearing for next Wednesday. This week, tens of thousands of immigrants and their supporters rallied Wednesday on the lawn of the Capitol, calling for a path to citizenship for all illegal immigrants in the country and urging Congress to move swiftly.One major goal of the bill is to put immigrants who have been living in the country illegally at "the back of the line" behind immigrants who made every effort to follow the rules, so that no one here illegally would become legal residents or citizens until those already in the system have the chance to do so.Also, at the insistence of Republicans — particularly Senator Marco Rubio of Florida, another member of the bipartisan group — the bill also avoids giving illegal immigrants a separate pathway to citizenship. Under the proposal, no new green cards would be created in the future exclusively for them.Instead, in a novel compromise worked out in hard-fought negotiations, immigrants who had been here illegally would gain a provisional legal status in which they would remain for at least 10 years. They could work legally and travel, but they would not become permanent residents.During the first decade, the aim is to clear backlogs. Then, formerly illegal immigrants could apply for merit-based green cards, along with many other foreigners applying legally. After three years with a green card, the formerly illegal immigrants would be eligible to apply to become American citizens.Some Senate staff members stressed that the final draft of the bill is not complete, and that many details could change, although not the broad outlines and goals.Among proposals to reduce backlogs is a plan to accelerate green card applications of foreigners living legally in the United States who have been waiting to receive their documents for 10 years or more.Any immigrants who have been working legally in this country for 10 years would also move rapidly to receive green cards, either through the current system or later through the new merit system.The plan would also free up additional green cards by eliminating a category of foreigners who are now eligible for those visas: siblings of United States citizens.The bill would also remove annual limits on the number of green cards for a different category, spouses and minor children of legal permanent residents. The senators estimate that 800,000 immediate family members will move through the backlog and gain green cards over the next decade as a result of that change.At the end of 10 years, the bill would create a program offering 138,000 merit-based visas each year to foreigners based on their work skills, but also on other considerations including family ties. Green cards will be offered to workers in three categories: high-skilled foreigners in technology and science, employees with a middle range of white collar skills, and low-wage workers. Farmworkers are not included, as they will come under a separate program.Immigrants who will be eligible for merit green cards would include those formerly here illegally, if they have remained in good standing, learned English and passed other requirements, and remained employed for 10 years.But other migrants would be eligible for those green cards as well, including agricultural guest workers who had been legally employed in this country for 10 years, and other temporary visa holders. There would be no special, dedicated path to citizenship for immigrants who had once lived in the country illegally.
WASHINGTON — As a bipartisan group of eight senators prepared to introduce a plan early next week to overhaul the nation's immigration laws, Senate negotiators have agreed to a cutoff date that could bar hundreds of thousands of immigrants from the path to legalization provided in the legislation.Illegal immigrants who arrived in the country after Dec. 31, 2011, could be ineligible to apply for legal status — and potentially citizenship — under the new immigration bill, which will provide a 13-year path to citizenship for the 11 million illegal immigrants already living in the country.Every bill that legalizes immigrants has a cutoff date for eligibility, to discourage a surge of people who have heard about potential legislation. Immigration advocates and Democrats in the group had been pushing for the date to be as current as possible — Jan. 1, 2013 — while Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida and a member of the group, originally argued for 2008.The Dec. 31, 2011, deadline represented a compromise, as well as something of a victory for Mr. Rubio."We understand the need for a cutoff date, but it should be 2013, not 2011," said Frank Sharry, executive director of America's Voice, a pro-immigration group. "The goal of the legislation is to transform a broken immigration system into a legal one. Leaving a few hundred thousand immigrants in limbo is contrary to that goal."On Friday night, one of the final hurdles for the broad legislation was eliminated when farmworkers and growers reached a deal after several weeks of stalled talks.As the final details of the plan emerge in advance of its likely rollout on Tuesday, senators in the bipartisan group have begun their final preparations, huddling with their staff and planning to take their case to the public on the Sunday news shows.Mr. Rubio, who is often mentioned as a 2016 presidential contender and whose political future perhaps most directly hinges on the immigration legislation, plans to appear on seven Sunday programs, on ABC, CBS, CNN, Fox, NBC, Telemundo and Univision.Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona and a member of the group, will also appear on CNN's "State of the Union."All four Democratic members of the bipartisan group will also make television appearances on Sunday.Senator Michael Bennet of Colorado will appear on Telemundo; Senator Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, the No. 2 Democrat in the Senate, will appear on "Fox News Sunday"; Senator Robert Menendez of New Jersey will be on Univision; and Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York will be on ABC's "This Week."Mr. Rubio, whose support will be critical to selling the legislation to reluctant Republicans and grass-roots conservatives, has already been reaching out behind the scenes, telephoning and holding one-on-one meetings with fellow Republicans and members of the conservative news media.He has repeatedly called for a transparent process with multiple public hearings, and he is now working with the Republican Policy Committee, whose chairman is Senator John Barrasso of Wyoming, to hold hearings on the immigration legislation.Mr. Rubio previously expressed frustration that the Senate Judiciary Committee seems unlikely to hold more than one hearing — scheduled for Wednesday — on the legislation, and told a group of reporters on Thursday that he hoped to have "an open hearing type process where we can bring in experts and all the members on the Republican side can ask questions, learn more about the bill, and hear from experts on the different topics."Emily Lawrimore, Mr. Barrasso's communications director, said: "Senator Rubio brought the idea to Senator Barrasso in light of Chairman Leahy's apparent refusal to allow thorough public debate and much-needed transparency," referring to Senator Patrick J. Leahy of Vermont, who is chairman of the Judiciary Committee. "Using the Republican Policy Committee to hear from all sides is a decision for the entire Senate Republican Conference. The conference is looking forward to hearing from Senator Rubio and the other members who have been negotiating immigration reform soon."An aide to Mr. Rubio said he was also reaching out to other senators, including Democrats, to try to find a way to hold additional bipartisan hearings.Just days before the senators hope to introduce their legislation, most of the legislative language has been written. The group has agreed on a 13-year path to citizenship (10 years for a green card, and 3 more for naturalization), a series of border security requirements, a mandatory electronic employment verification program, a new merit-based program for foreign workers to become legal permanent residents and a plan to clear the backlogs of those immigrants who have applied legally for green cards.Separate but parallel deals have also been reached between the business and labor communities for a low-skilled worker program, as well as an agriculture worker program. Both farmworkers and children brought to the country illegally by their parents — a group known as Dreamers — would qualify for an expedited path to citizenship.Over time, the new legislation would also shift the emphasis from family-based immigration to a system that focuses more on skills."They will get a fight on this one," said Kevin Appleby, the director of migration policy at the United States Conference of Catholic Bishops. "The family categories are a top priority for some important constituencies, particularly the growing Asian community."Same-sex binational couples will not be able to sponsor each other under the legal immigration system — a Republican sticking point in the negotiations.
Preaching Citizenship: A changing attitude in evangelical congregations like the First Baptist Church of Orlando, Fla., could help sway lawmakers as they consider immigration reform.ORLANDO, Fla. — In the pews of the First Baptist Church of Orlando , where thousands of evangelical Christians gather on Sundays to worship and sing, a change of heart is happening on the once toxic issue of immigration .Two years ago, national evangelical leaders began to speak out in favor of legislation to give legal status to immigrants in the United States illegally. Now, as Congress is about to start a debate on overhauling the immigration system, conservative Christians, once inclined to take a hard line on immigrants they viewed as lawbreakers, are consulting their Bibles and coming around to the pastors' view."I feel I would be representative of a typical longtime Baptist, one who grew up in the Baptist Church, who was raised in an evangelical family, and I would identify myself as a conservative Republican," said Jay Crenshaw, 36, a lawyer in Orlando who attended a service at the megachurch last Sunday. "And I can tell you how much my views have changed."For Mr. Crenshaw, as for many evangelicals, the rethinking came as a result of personal encounters with immigrants in church who were trying to navigate the maze of the nation's immigration laws — in his case, a Colombian friend who turned out to be here illegally."It seems something's broken about the system," Mr. Crenshaw said.The shift among evangelical Christians could have a powerful effect on the fight in Washington, as Republican lawmakers, including many who have opposed any amnesty for illegal immigrants, look to see how much they can support measures to bring those immigrants into the legal system without alienating conservative voters.Evangelical leaders, seeing the opportunity to expand their influence on a social issue beyond abortion and same-sex marriage, have broadly united this year behind a path to citizenship for immigrants in the country illegally. They are conducting an ambitious push to sway Congress, including ad campaigns on Christian radio stations in five states, meetings with lawmakers and a challenge to churchgoers to pray every day for 40 days using Bible passages that speak of welcoming the stranger.On Wednesday, evangelical pastors will converge on Washington for a day of prayer and lobbying on Capitol Hill.Guiding the campaign is a coalition called the Evangelical Immigration Table, which includes the top pastors of more than two dozen evangelical denominations and at least 20 heads of Christian colleges and seminaries. "It is very remarkable the degree to which there is consensus," said Galen Carey, the vice president of government relations for the National Association of Evangelicals, an umbrella group for the churches. No prominent pastor has spoken out against the immigration effort, although some pastors of the largest churches have remained silent.Accord has been less broad among the faithful. In a poll released in March by the Public Religion Research Institute and the Brookings Institution, white evangelical Protestants were the least likely of the religious groups surveyed to support a path to citizenship for immigrants here illegally, with 56 percent of them favoring that approach. Among Hispanic Catholics, the group expressing the most support, 74 percent said they would allow those immigrants to become citizens. Only 41 percent of white evangelicals who identify with the Tea Party supported a path to citizenship, according to the survey.But many pastors in largely white churches have been spurred to action on immigration by preachers in Hispanic and immigrant churches, who have seen rapid growth in their congregations and have ministered to many followers who spoke of living in fear because they lacked legal papers.For the Rev. David Uth, the head pastor of First Baptist Orlando, there was no mistaking the evolution of his traditionally white congregation, as he discovered in recent years that immigrants speaking at least 32 different languages had flocked to his doors. Mr. Uth is one of the pastors going to Washington this week.His church offers ministry in seven foreign languages, with simultaneous translation of Sunday services in Spanish and Portuguese and a separate Brazilian service on Sunday evenings."The stories out there in the pews are stories of people from all over the world who have made friends and who have become close with people here," Mr. Uth said after his service last Sunday. "I think that's why there's movement in this church, there's momentum, there's an openness to try to do something to address their needs."Mr. Crenshaw said his views started to shift when his Colombian friend, a white-collar professional who had been living in Florida for years, asked for help after being arrested for driving without a license. Mr. Crenshaw said he realized that his friend, an active church member who was supporting his mother and a brother, could be deported."The tension is compassion on one hand and rule of law on the other," said Mr. Crenshaw, who went with his friend to court, where the matter was resolved without drawing the attention of any immigration authorities."Once you've walked with someone and put a face and family behind the immigration issue, it very much personalizes it," he said. "You do find yourself with a lot of compassion."
WASHINGTON — The introduction of sweeping immigration legislation on Tuesday is likely to ignite a months-long battle between those who want citizenship for the nation's 11 million illegal immigrants and opponents who view such an approach as amnesty.A bipartisan group of eight senators plans to unveil legislation, drafted largely in secret, that would provide a 13-year path to American citizenship for illegal immigrants who arrived in the country before Dec. 31, 2011, but would demand that tougher border controls be in place first. The legislation is certain to unleash a torrent of attacks from Republican opponents on the immigration overhaul, similar to the kind of criticism that killed an effort supported by President George W. Bush in 2007.The group plans to file the legislation on Tuesday, but canceled its scheduled news conference because of the Boston Marathon bombing."We all met in the middle, knowing we would not please our entire constituencies, but the imperative of doing this is so important to the country that we had to get it done," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, and a member of the bipartisan group. "Americans will be common-sense and fair to legal immigration and the 11 million who are here as long as they're convinced there won't be future waves of illegal immigration."The biggest test will come for those Republicans who support the bill and will have to convince their skeptical Senate colleagues, constituents and grass-roots conservative base — not to mention Republicans in the House — that the legislation is not a reward for people who broke the law by entering the country illegally.The bill requires that illegal immigrants wait a minimum of 10 years until they apply for legal permanent residence and an additional three years until full naturalization. It also mandates a series of rigorous enforcement measures, including at least $3 billion for the Department of Homeland Security to fortify border surveillance and apprehensions.The department will have six months to present a plan to begin securing the border and identify where more border fencing might be required. No immigrants would be allowed to apply for "registered provisional immigrant" legal status — which would allow them to live and work here legally, as well as travel outside the country — until both plans are complete.In order to apply for permanent resident visas, known as green cards, after 10 years, illegal immigrants would have to pay an approximate $2,000 penalty fee, including $500 up front. They must also demonstrate knowledge of English and civics, and have worked regularly and maintained a continuous physical presence in the country.In addition, agricultural workers and children brought to the country illegally by their parents — know as "Dreamers" — would receive an expedited path to legal status. (Both groups would be able to receive green cards in five years. The Dreamers would be eligible for citizenship immediately after they got their green cards.)The bill also creates a W-Visa program for lower-skilled workers, the outgrowth of a parallel negotiation between the country's largest business and labor groups. A Bureau of Immigration and Labor Market Research, which is to be created by the bill, would be responsible for overseeing the number of workers who could come in annually.The legislation also aims to eliminate the backlog of 4.7 million immigrants who have applied to come here legally and have been languishing waiting for green cards. It creates a merit-based program for foreigners to become legal permanent residents, which focuses on both high and low work skills.Tuesday's legislation comes after months of delicate and fraught negotiations within the bipartisan group as well as a carefully managed public relations campaign that the senators hope will blunt any criticism before the expected attacks. Opponents of an immigration overhaul have been preparing to jump on what they see as objectionable sections of the legislation."We had to make compromises," said Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, a member of the bipartisan group. "What really matters is most Americans agree with us that we need to address this issue in a comprehensive fashion. That was not true in 2007. I think that's a very big difference."
On March 31, after months of tense negotiations, a bipartisan group of eight senators hoping to overhaul the nation's strained immigration system felt as if they were finally closing in on a deal. Mr. Schumer, a New York Democrat and member of the group, was preparing to go on the NBC program "Meet the Press" to hail the progress.Instead, a half-hour before Mr. Schumer was to appear, the office of Senator Marco Rubio, a Florida Republican seen as a crucial member of the group, e-mailed a news release, its title in all capital letters: "No Final Agreement on Immigration Legislation Yet."Mr. Rubio and the others eventually reached a deal, and the resulting legislation was to be introduced this week. But the story of how the senators struck an agreement is one of intense across-the-aisle bargaining in an age when compromise is hard to reach. It was built on unlikely friendships, survived near stalemates and involved an apology in the form of a cheese pizza.Mr. Schumer said he was caught completely off guard by Mr. Rubio's missive. "I was surprised," he said. "I was blindsided."Everyone in the group seemed to respect Mr. Rubio — he came to meetings prepared and engaged, and his colleagues all believed he was operating in good faith. But suddenly, many of the members were worried that after all their hard work, Mr. Rubio might bolt.So Mr. Schumer, who by then had the cellphone numbers of his seven fellow group members memorized and on speed dial, called Mr. Rubio. The two talked for 90 minutes. By the time the call was over, Mr. Schumer knew that Mr. Rubio was in."He convinced me that he really wanted to get a bill done but he really needed some space," Mr. Schumer said.When Senator Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, the No. 2 Senate Democrat and a member of the group, first approached Mr. Rubio in the Senate gym about joining the others, Mr. Durbin said he told him, "The ticket to entry there is commitment to a path to citizenship" — a must-have for the Democratic senators.Mr. Rubio said he was open to putting citizenship on the table, but had some requirements of his own. He said strict border security requirements and other enforcement measures would have to be in place — to ensure that there was not a new wave of illegal immigration, and that no one was rewarded for breaking the law — before any illegal immigrants could attain permanent legal status.The group, which began meeting after Thanksgiving, was glad to have Mr. Rubio on board. Both Mr. Durbin and Mr. Schumer were considered fairly liberal Democrats, and Senator Lindsey Graham of South Carolina and Senator John McCain of Arizona, Republican members of the group, were viewed with skepticism by the conservative base.Senator Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the Republican leader, had told Mr. Graham and Mr. McCain that Mr. Rubio, who was elected in 2010 on the Tea Party wave, should be part of any negotiations.Relationships were forged slowly and in unlikely places. Although Mr. Durbin and Mr. Rubio were already friends as part of the 6 a.m. crowd in the Senate gym, Mr. McCain and Mr. Schumer had never had a strong relationship, despite having overlapped in the Senate for more than a decade."Getting McCain back into the game — he was a little leery about Schumer," Mr. Graham said.But the two men managed to bond. During a trip to the Arizona border with some of the group members, Mr. McCain came down with food poisoning and had to cancel immigration meetings he had scheduled later that day. Mr. Schumer filled in as he made himself at home in Mr. McCain's Phoenix office (he ate jelly beans from the jar on Mr. McCain's desk) and told groups in Arizona to trust their senator."You need to have McCain's back," Mr. Schumer said. "He is being really brave here, and doing the right thing."The border trip took place over Passover. So Mr. McCain presented Mr. Schumer, who is Jewish, with chocolate-covered matzo.Still, there were rough patches. In one heated meeting, a top Democratic immigration policy adviser yelled at another Senate aide, but Mr. McCain thought he was yelling at him. Mr. McCain exploded — and then bought the adviser a cheese pizza as an apology after he realized his mistake.At another point, after months of negotiations and just before the Easter recess, a deal for an agricultural worker program that could prove crucial in bringing reluctant Republicans senators in farm states on board came together only at the last minute. (It was negotiated by Mr. Rubio and Senator Michael Bennet, a Colorado Democrat and member of the group; and two senators who were not members, Dianne Feinstein, Democrat of California, and Orrin G. Hatch, Republican of Utah.)When the group finally agreed on the guest worker program — a crucial component of the overall bill — at the end of March, Mr. Schumer called Denis R. McDonough, the White House chief of staff, to share the news. Mr. McDonough, who had been receiving regular updates and knew how tense the negotiations had gotten, let out a "Whooo!"
WASHINGTON — Hours after a bipartisan group of eight senators introduced a sweeping overhaul of the nation's immigration system, conservative radio talk show hosts took over two floors of a Capitol Hill hotel on Wednesday and denounced the proposal on the country's drive-time airwaves as nothing more than a reward for lawbreakers.On a Florida station, WFTL, the host Joyce Kaufman called it "pure amnesty." Jim Sharpe, a talk show host on KFYI in Phoenix, promised that "Arizonans are still not taking this sitting down." On Denny Schaffer's show in New Orleans, callers demanded deportations."I see nothing wrong with putting them on a bus and shipping them back to wherever they came from," a caller named Alan told Mr. Schaffer. "The law's the law."But even some of the talk show hosts most vehemently opposed to illegal immigration said they were worried that times have changed. They said their listeners seemed less agitated by the prospect that 11 million illegal immigrants might be granted legal status and concede that proponents of the legislation — who now include some conservative radio personalities — are better at promoting their message this time around.The senators filed their 844-page bill after 2 a.m. Wednesday, officially beginning what President Obama and other supporters hope will be a six-week effort to pass it in the Senate by early June.  Hearings on the legislation, which tightens border security and offers an eventual path to citizenship, are set to begin on Friday.Opponents of the measure are eager to harness the conservative airwaves the way they did in 2007, when talk radio hosts helped whip up a fury of outrage that doomed similar legislation supported by President George W. Bush. This time there were 46 talk radio hosts sharing booths in the Phoenix Park Hotel, where they bent over their microphones and broadcast to places like Albany, Salt Lake City and Huntsville, Ala."So far this has been an inside-the-Beltway echo chamber," said Bob Dane, a spokesman for the Federation for American Immigration Reform, which organized the gathering. "What they have not had yet is a good, cold blast of air in the face from the rank-and-file conservative. We now have a bill.  This is the game-changer where the American public is now starting to weigh in."But how the public weighs in — and what they say when they call in to the shows — remains an open question.Sean Hannity, who in 2007 used his nationally syndicated radio program and perch at Fox News to rail against an immigration overhaul, now says that he has "evolved" and that it is time for Republicans to support some kind of major change in the nation's immigration system. Opposition from some Republican lawmakers has softened since the 2012 presidential election, when Mr. Obama won the vast majority of Hispanic votes. Evangelical Christians, many of whom were opposed to an overhaul in 2007, are now among the biggest supporters."There are some people who lost their will to fight this fight," said Ms. Kaufman, who remains combative but admitted in an interview during a commercial break that she was worried the legislation might pass. "They think they've lost it already and they've sort of thrown in the towel, including my fellow radio hosts."Or as Mr. Schaffer from New Orleans put it, "There is not that rage that was there."From the beginning of this year's immigration talks, senators from both parties braced for the reaction on conservative talk radio once the legislation was made public. Their memories were still fresh from six years ago, when activists at town hall meetings who had listened to talk radio harshly criticized Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, for his support of the 2007 proposed legislation.This time proponents are hoping that Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida and a member of the group of eight, will be able to mute the impact of the conservative chatter. Mr. Rubio, a Tea Party favorite, has spent much of his time in recent months talking about the proposals on conservative radio programs.That appears to have worked, at least a little. Michael Medved, one of the few conservative talk show hosts who has always supported an immigration overhaul, said he sensed a shift."What you are not hearing as much, except from a handful of people, is 'over my dead body,' " Mr. Medved said in an interview. "The level of apocalyptic hysteria is much less."There are nonetheless plenty of talk show hosts who disagree with Mr. Hannity and Mr. Medved, as was clear at the Phoenix Park Hotel, where the hosts and activists sported "Border Security Now!" buttons. Many hosts and callers derided the "gang of eight" senators who drafted the legislation as the "eight gangsters."But a few blocks away on the East Front of the Capitol, more than 300 evangelical Christian pastors gathered for what they billed as a national day of prayer to support the immigration legislation. Unlike 2007, this year evangelicals have mobilized some Christian radio hosts on behalf of immigration and are running saturation ad campaigns summoning evangelicals to obey biblical instructions that call for welcoming the stranger.In South Carolina, evangelical leaders ran radio commercials defending Senator Lindsey Graham, a Republican who is an author of the bipartisan bill, and Representative Trey Gowdy, also a Republican. The lawmakers were "inundated — very happily inundated" with calls from evangelicals, said Richard Land, president of the Southern Baptist Convention's policy arm."We've provided an example that when people like Lindsey Graham and Trey Gowdy get targeted, we've got their back," Dr. Land said, "and we can activate a counternetwork."
LOS ANGELES — In another era, Justino Mora might have been ashamed to talk about his mother coming across the border from Mexico illegally. But today, he calls her decision to immigrate more than a decade ago heroic.When Mr. Mora, a student at the University of California, Los Angeles, received authorization to live and work in the United States late last year as part of the Obama administration's plan to grant reprieves to young people who were brought to the country by their parents, he anxiously wondered whether his mother would ever receive the same benefits. Now, he said, there is a powerful sense of hope.With the bipartisan group of eight senators having introduced their sweeping immigration bill in Washington this week, immigrants across the country are paying close attention to how the legislation might change their lives. They spoke with guarded optimism at the prospect of the proposal becoming law, enabling people who have lived here for decades without authorization to travel and work legally."We've all been living in fear, every day, but now people are finally starting to realize that every family like mine is part of this society and part of the fabric," said Mr. Mora, 23. "Every family that comes here comes here with courage. We want the sense of security that comes with knowing we will not have to be separated."Since they received legal authorization last year, Mr. Mora and his younger brother have both obtained Social Security cards and driver's licenses. But his older sister's paperwork has not gone through, leaving her in a kind of legal limbo — she is worried she may lose her job as a secretary as soon as this week because she has not been able to show she is legally allowed to work."It's no way to live," Mr. Mora said. "But that is the life many people have."Many of the estimated 11 million illegal immigrants living in the United States work in low-wage jobs all over the country, making beds in hotels, cleaning tables in restaurants or laying brick at construction sites. And as the details of the bill were released Tuesday, many reacted with hopefulness that legal authorization would allow them to make more money, escaping jobs that can pay less than minimum wage.But at the same time, they worried that they would never be able to scrape together enough money to pay the taxes and fees they would need to receive legal residency.At a day-laborer site in North Phoenix on Tuesday, José Dominguez huddled under a tree with two other men, assessing their chances at legal status, wondering aloud whether they could assemble the necessary paperwork to prove they have lived in the United States long enough and paid enough taxes to qualify, even though they work in a business that deals almost entirely in cash.For Luiz Alberto Herrera, 38, who left his native northern Mexico nine years ago, money may be the greatest obstacle to becoming a citizen."You live day by day" as a day laborer, he said. "How I'm going to be able to save to straighten up my paperwork, I don't know."Mr. Herrera and Mr. Dominguez, 50, a day laborer from Michoacán, Mexico, recently spoke to a lawyer about what they might face under the new proposal to become legal residents. "Patience," Mr. Dominguez said, was the advice he received from the lawyer.Indeed, any legislation is likely to produce a legal labyrinth, and immigration lawyers are already gearing up for more business. Charles Kuck, an immigration lawyer in Atlanta, said he expected to hire more legal staff members to handle the crush of new clients he anticipates.For the last several months, Mr. Kuck has spoken to Latino groups throughout Georgia, advising them what kind of impact a new immigration law could have. He has cautioned them that the process could take months or even years, but that they should begin assembling files of tax records and marriage licenses."What they really want is the ability to be legal," he said. "What most people really want is just the ability to drive without fear, to live without fear."Like others who immigrated illegally, Maria Galvan speaks of living in the shadows, like a ghost that does not want to be seen. But in recent months Ms. Galvan, who came from Mexico City to the San Fernando Valley 13 years ago, has felt emboldened. Last week, she traveled to a large rally in Washington and made calls to members of Congress demanding a new immigration law."It used to be that we had no power, but we have worked very hard and we want the respect we deserve," said Ms. Galvan, 43. She spoke longingly of wanting to go back to Mexico to see nieces and nephews whom she has never met and are now teenagers. "We all have dreams we've been holding on to for a long time."For all the excitement, for many the promise of legalization was tinged with disappointment — both at the length of the 13-year path to full citizenship and because the legislation will leave out anyone who arrived after Dec. 30, 2011.John Acosta, a Colombian who has lived in North Miami since 1995, said that while he agreed with the proposals to tighten border security, the cutoff would create "another new problem."Santos Canelas has had a legal work permit since the 1980s, but is eager to make his status permanent. While he believes he will be able to meet any requirements for citizenship, he expects that many other immigrants will not."It's like a funnel," he said. "They're putting us all through a funnel, and those that are able to pay and persist will make it through, but others won't."
WASHINGTON — Any chance of getting immigration legislation through the House will most likely depend on representatives like Doc Hastings.While he has not been the most outspoken about immigration issues, proponents of an overhaul are counting on Mr. Hastings, a Republican, for one reason: His Congressional district, which cuts a wide path through the center of Washington State, depends heavily on agriculture, an industry with a significant stake in the outcome of the debate.Much of Washington's $46 billion agriculture sector is in Mr. Hastings's district, where farmers grow everything from apples to wheat. Local agribusinesses there rely on a work force largely composed of immigrants, thousands of whom are believed to be in the country illegally.A coalition of 11 agriculture groups has launched a major lobbying campaign in support of an immigration overhaul. Members of the effort, known as the Agricultural Workforce Coalition, see representatives from districts where thousands of jobs depend on agriculture as key to any effort to pass the legislation.Agriculture Department data shows that Republicans represent 17 of the top 20 districts where agriculture is a major industry. And farm groups are hoping that local concerns will trump national politics as the legislation moves forward in the Republican-controlled House, where it will most likely face a tough challenge from conservatives who have been hostile to previous attempts to change the system."Republicans from big agriculture districts will definitely be the deciding factor in getting any type of immigration reform through the House," said Dean Norton, a dairy farmer who is president of the New York Farm Bureau. "There is a lot of clamoring in these districts to do something about immigration."Mr. Hastings has not said if he would support the immigration legislation introduced in the Senate, but he has backed efforts to help the farm sector in the past.Neal Kirby, Mr. Hastings's spokesman, said the congressman "has long advocated for a guest worker program for agriculture that is workable and will provide central Washington farmers with the legal work force they need to fill jobs that Americans are not" willing to do."Developing a workable program as a part of immigration reform is critical to central Washington's economy," he said.The farm sector has been a core constituency of the Republican Party for many years. Campaign contribution data from the Center for Responsive Politics, a Washington research group, shows that since 1990, agriculture interests have mostly given to Republicans in Congress.Last year, farm-heavy districts voted overwhelmingly for Mitt Romney. Tom Nassif, president of the Western Growers, and Chuck Conners, president of the National Council of Farmer Cooperatives, two of the organizations pushing for immigration legislation, were advisers to Mr. Romney during the campaign.Agriculture's main focus is on changing the H-2A visa program, which allows fruit and vegetable growers, slaughterhouses and other agribusinesses to hire temporary workers for jobs that cannot be filled by Americans.The system allows foreign workers to enter the country on a visa for no longer than one year.But agriculture officials say the current system does not work because industries like dairy farming and meat production are year-round enterprises and are unable to fill their need for workers. They also say the program is overly bureaucratic.Among the changes the farm sector wants to see is the replacement of the seasonal visa program with one that would allow workers to accept a job under a three-year visa.The agriculture groups, which lobbied heavily on Capitol Hill as a group of senators worked to draft an immigration bill, say they will soon began a similar campaign in the House."We will bring the weight of growers in all 50 states to the Senate and the House in support of this legislation," said Tom Stenzel, chief executive of the United Fresh Produce Association, a trade group of fruit and vegetable growers.Despite high unemployment in Mr. Hastings's Washington district, growers and other farm interests there say they still suffer from worker shortages because of current immigration laws.Mr. Kirby, Mr. Hastings's spokesman, said the congressman had met with the farm lobbying coalition and had been in contact with growers. "This has been a longtime priority of Congressman Hastings," he said.
WASHINGTON — It was drafted by a bipartisan Senate coalition, has the strong backing of the White House and activist groups, and draws on deep public support from those who see it as helping to solve one of the nation's most difficult problems.But advocates of the Senate's new immigration proposal say it differs in many respects from the gun control legislation defeated this week, despite surface similarities that illustrate how a measure with substantial advantages and widespread backing can still founder on Capitol Hill. On Thursday, they formally began seeking support for the proposal from the public and Congressional colleagues.Reminded anew of the pitfalls that await high-profile measures, the bipartisan group of eight senators that assembled the immigration legislation is determined to avoid the mistakes and hazards that doomed the measure to expand background checks for gun buyers.As they unveiled their measure at a news conference, the senators mustered an impressive display of unity from business and labor, conservatives and liberals, and members of the various faith-based communities. They offered a bipartisan backdrop determined to say: not only is this immigration bill different from the one that failed in 2007, but it is very different from the bipartisan gun legislation.Asked why the group expected it to fare better, one member, Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, turned and pointed to what he called "one compelling reason" — the assembled crowd of nearly two dozen supporters behind him."When you look at the representatives of business, labor, the religious community, Hispanic community — across the board — this is a coalition," he said. "This is why we will succeed, because of this broad-based, dedicated support for this legislation."Mr. McCain joked, "I never thought I'd be standing with Richard Trumka," referring to the president of the A.F.L.-C.I.O., the nation's largest federation of unions.Group members and their aides insist the moment is right for overhauling the nation's strained immigration system. The 2012 election, they say, in which President Obama won with 71 percent of the Hispanic vote, has created a climate in which Republicans are willing to make concessions that could lead to a broad immigration overhaul.And instead of having a powerful interest group like the National Rifle Association lobbying lawmakers to stand firm against any new gun control bill, aides say they already have two major and often combative groups — business and labor — on board. The agreement between business and labor also represents a stark change from 2007, when the two groups could not reach an agreement, and labor groups were internally divided as well.Finally, both Democrats and Republicans insist the current bill can offer something to many: a clear path to citizenship that excites Democrats and immigration advocates, and tough border security measures that placate Republicans and allow them to reassure their conservative base that the estimated 11 million illegal immigrants already in the United States would not be rewarded for breaking the law."The border security triggers are strong but achievable," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and a member of the group. "The path to citizenship is tough, but it is accessible. Yes, our bill does secure the border first, but it treats the situation of those living in the shadows as an equally urgent priority."Still, getting the immigration bill passed in the Senate — let alone through the Republican-controlled House and onto the president's desk — will be a monumental challenge. Opposition to the legislation began almost as soon as it was filed, around 2 a.m. Wednesday, after the group's carefully choreographed rollout was derailed by the Boston Marathon bombings.The Federation for American Immigration Reform, which has called for reducing levels of illegal immigration, organized a two-day summit meeting of nearly four-dozen conservative talk radio hosts from around the country. The hosts descended on the nation's capital to broadcast their concerns to listeners back home that the new bill amounted to "amnesty." (During the 2007 effort, the organization was credited with helping crash the Congressional servers with calls from angry constituents.) Senators Jeff Sessions of Alabama and David Vitter of Louisiana, both Republicans, held a competing news conference during which they denounced the bill. And NumbersUSA, a group that seeks to reduce immigration, has begun poring over the bill to enumerate how it believes the legislation could hurt American workers."There are a lot of parallels between our type of outreach and the N.R.A.," said Rosemary Jenks, the director of government relations for NumbersUSA. "We're both grass-roots organizations with very large memberships, and the goal is always to make sure members of Congress are hearing directly from their constituents."The bipartisan group's news conference on Thursday was only the first step for the senators, who have already been pressing their case privately and will continue to do so publicly in the coming weeks. The Democratic senators briefed immigration advocates on the details of the bill on Wednesday, and they did the same with their fellow Democratic senators at a lunch on Thursday. Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida and a member of the bipartisan group, made appearances on talk radio on Thursday, and his office set up an "Immigration Reform Facts" page on its Web site to dispute false claims about the bill.On Friday, the Senate Judiciary Committee will hold a hearing on the new legislation, and it has scheduled another for Monday.In some ways, the failure of gun legislation could ultimately work in the favor of an immigration overhaul. On Thursday, Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. told gun control advocates that several senators had told him they could not vote to support both gun control and immigration: they had the political bandwidth for only one tough vote.
WASHINGTON — A senior Republican senator said Friday that the approaching political debate about an immigration overhaul should take into account the revelation that the suspects in the Boston Marathon bombing had apparently emigrated to the United States from Kyrgyzstan.Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, the most senior Republican on the Senate Judiciary Committee, opened a hearing on immigration legislation by stressing the issue's importance "particularly in light of all that's happening in Massachusetts right now and over the last week.""Given the events of this week, it's important for us to understand the gaps and loopholes in our immigration system," Mr. Grassley said in his opening statement. "While we don't yet know the immigration status of people who have terrorized the communities in Massachusetts, when we find out, it will help shed light on the weaknesses of our system."Friday's hearing was expected to offer an early glimpse into how the Senate would react to immigration legislation that a bipartisan group of senators introduced this week. Instead, it was overshadowed by developments in the Boston bombing case, which also affected the meeting directly when the homeland security secretary, Janet Napolitano, who was scheduled to testify before the committee on border security and enforcement, had to cancel her appearance to oversee her department's involvement in the investigation.According to Homeland Security officials, one suspect — Dzhokhar A. Tsarnaev, 19, who was captured Friday night — arrived in the United States in 2002, and remained as part of an asylum claim by his father. His brother, Tamerlan Tsarnaev, 26, who was killed Friday, arrived in that period but applied for asylum around 2005."How can individuals evade authorities and plan such attacks on our soil?" Mr. Grassley asked. "How can we beef up security checks on people who wish to enter the U.S.?"Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and a member of the bipartisan group behind the legislation, urged caution about linking the bombings to flaws in the country's immigration system."Before I get to the bill, I'd like to ask that all of us not jump to conclusions regarding the events in Boston, or try to conflate those events with this legislation," Mr. Schumer said. "In general, we are a safer country when law enforcement knows who was here, has their fingerprints, photos, etc., has conducted background checks and no longer needs to look at needles through haystacks."Referring to the legal immigration program that the brothers most likely used, Mr. Schumer added: "Both the refugee program and the asylum program have been significantly strengthened in the past five years, such that we are much more careful about screening people and determining who should and should not be coming into the country."The hearing formally kicked off consideration of a plan that would increase border security and would quickly legalize many of the 11 million unauthorized immigrants in the United States, eventually offering them a path to full citizenship. Opponents of the plan and conservative pundits have already cited the Boston bombings as a reason to move slowly.But Mr. Grassley received a rebuke from both sides of the aisle. Senators Lindsey Graham of South Carolina and John McCain of Arizona, both Republicans and members of the bipartisan group, released a statement Friday afternoon urging their colleagues and the public not to link the Boston bombings with an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws."Some have already suggested that the circumstances of this terrible tragedy are justification for delaying or stopping entirely the effort for comprehensive immigration reform," the joint statement read. "In fact, the opposite is true: immigration reform will strengthen our nation's security by helping us identify exactly who has entered our country and who has left — a basic function of government that our broken immigration system is incapable of accomplishing today."Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont and chairman of the Judiciary Committee, similarly said he did not think the Boston bombings should affect the legislation."If we change the policies of this country every time something happens, whether it's Oklahoma City, 9/11, this, then we're never going to do anything," he said after the hearing.The connection between the Boston attacks and the immigration debate is still tenuous. If early reports that the suspects came into the country legally prove correct, that could undermine attempts by opponents to link the bombings to political concerns about the immigration overhaul.Still, backers of the 844-page legislation — who include President Obama — were already facing a delicate task in trying to pass it in the next six weeks. To succeed, they need to navigate issues of economic fairness, border security, deportation and charges that the bill would inspire a new wave of illegal immigration.The Boston bombing not only injects a new issue into that debate but also potentially robs the president and lawmakers of some of the momentum to overhaul the nation's immigration laws.Proponents of the legislation quickly rejected Mr. Grassley's assertions, saying that no connections should be made between the Boston attacks and the immigration overhaul until more information was known."There are legitimate policy questions to ask and answer about what role our immigration system played, if any, in what happened," said Alex Conant, a spokesman for Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, a chief sponsor of the immigration bill. "Regardless of the circumstances in Boston, immigration reform that strengthens our borders and gives us a better accounting of who is in our country and why will improve our national security."Frank Sharry, the executive director of America's Voice, a group backing an immigration overhaul, criticized Mr. Grassley for bringing the Boston attacks into the debate."I think it's shameless." Mr. Sharry said. "Boston is in lockdown, the situation on the ground is fluid, and the ranking minority leader of the Senate Judiciary Committee is exploiting it to try to derail a piece of legislation."
WASHINGTON — As the Senate plowed through gun amendment after gun amendment on Wednesday evening, Senator Patrick J. Leahy , the Judiciary Committee chairman, sat at his desk on the Senate floor in increasing agitation as a potentially momentous personal achievement collapsed in a partisan morass."The committee held three hearings and four lengthy markups starting in January and concluding in March," Mr. Leahy, Vermont's senior senator and the newly anointed president pro tempore, said in bitter frustration. "No good deed goes unpunished."It was the opening act of perhaps Mr. Leahy's biggest moment after 38 years in the Senate, and it was crumbling around him. Act II began Friday, with Mr. Leahy's Judiciary Committee plunging into the first formal hearing since a sweeping overhaul of the nation's immigration laws was introduced in the Senate.He can only hope this one goes better.Over nearly four decades, Mr. Leahy has compiled an extensive résumé of workmanlike accomplishments, lauded but little known beyond the immediate beneficiaries: the Patrick Leahy War Victims Fund, the Leahy Law that controls American military assistance to governments with questionable human rights records, patent law, privacy protections, organic food labeling and agricultural conservation programs. Important achievements, he says, but not the sort carved into marble in the Capitol.Then came 2013 and two huge tasks, guiding the first major gun control legislation since 1994, then managing the broadest overhaul of American immigration law since Ronald Reagan was president. Mr. Leahy has also hinted a Supreme Court fight could come soon — a hint worth noting since he knew months before the public that the last two court vacancies were looming.It is a moment he asked for when he stunned colleagues in December by turning down the chairmanship of the powerful but troubled Senate Appropriations Committee to stay with Judiciary. And even with this week's turn of events, aides say he is still relishing it.At a private Oval Office meeting with President Obama on Feb. 4, Mr. Leahy ticked off the tasks that lay before him in the opening months of Mr. Obama's second term: the Violence Against Women Act, gun safety legislation, immigration and a possible Supreme Court confirmation fight."Anything else you want to throw my way?" Mr. Leahy said he asked the president. "He said: 'I know you get bored. I don't want you to get bored.' "Quirks and twists are part of his personal story and are informing the tasks at hand. Mr. Leahy had a small speaking part in "The Dark Knight Rises," the Batman blockbuster that was opening at a midnight screening in Aurora, Colo., when a gunman opened fire last year, killing 12 and injuring dozens. The next morning, Mr. Leahy called some of the electricians and carpenters he had befriended on the set to commiserate over the tragic opening. The school shootings in Newtown, Conn., only furthered the resolve for a senator who once vehemently opposed background checks as meaningless symbolism.Prickly and quick-tempered, Mr. Leahy has jealously guarded the jurisdiction of his committee, but he has also tolerated lengthy bipartisan negotiations on immigration. That tolerance, however, has come with a warning: "A day will come when we will vote on it in the Judiciary Committee, we will vote up or down and I will not have something come out of there that I will not vote for," he said. "I will have the final say."John D. Podesta, a former senior Leahy aide who went on to be White House chief of staff under President Bill Clinton, said Mr. Leahy does not fit neatly in with outsize Democratic figures like Edward M. Kennedy and Robert Byrd, who saw their lengthy Senate tenures as opportunities to shape society through "massive social legislation" and permanent stamps on the institution itself. The small-state product of immigrant grandparents and the son of a printer, Mr. Leahy has been more skeptical of governmental power, focusing on privacy protections and criminal justice."I think this moment, particularly immigration reform, will figure large in how he ultimately is perceived," Mr. Podesta said.With his ascension to the mainly ceremonial position of Senate president pro tempore, the most senior senator of the majority party, Mr. Leahy has something he had never sought, a position in leadership. He is also third in succession to the presidency.His interests are not typical of Washington. His office in the Senate's stately Russell Office Building — once belonging to the conservative legend Barry Goldwater — is a glimpse at history through his one good eye, peeking through his ever-present camera. A series of photos he shot depicts a closed-door confrontation between Mr. Obama and Joseph I. Lieberman, then a senator from Connecticut, during negotiations on the health care law. The president listens, leans back, folds his arms. Senator Richard J. Durbin, Democrat of Illinois, rubs his eyes. Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. rolls his.
WAYNE, Pa. — With the television in her pizzeria showing an endless loop of the Boston manhunt on Friday, Bessie Kontis glanced up at scenes of the quasi-military lockdown and shuddered."After something like that happens, they should stop all visas, for crying out loud," said Ms. Kontis, 58, who owns New Wayne Pizza with her husband, Alex. "It's insane. It just angers me."Ms. Kontis was born in Greece and immigrated to the United States as a child, but when two men of Chechen heritage were identified as the suspects in the fatal Boston Marathon bombings, her usually broad views about immigration became colored by concerns for national security."That is who's coming in," she said. "We don't know what kind of people they are. The bottom line is we have to stop being goody-goody Americans."As a national debate over major immigration reform begins in Congress, some opponents are pointing to the Boston bombings as cause for concern about expanding visa programs and offering millions of illegal immigrants a path to citizenship.On Friday, Senator Charles E. Grassley, a senior Iowa Republican on the committee debating the plan, which is proposed by a bipartisan group of eight senators, said the terrorist bombings should figure into the debate. Some conservative commentators and Congressional Republicans want to shift the focus away from economic and humanitarian concerns to border security and the potential threat from terrorists entering the country.How successful their efforts turn out to be, and whether Boston slows momentum for change, could depend on how many citizens express views like Ms. Kontis's.But judging by a sampling of voters in one politically divided region, the western suburbs of Philadelphia, the Boston bombings may be an imperfect test case for opponents of reform.In interviews Friday night, as the denouement of the manhunt played out in the hours when people gathered in taverns or strolled the streets on a pleasant evening, many mentioned that the two brothers linked to the attacks — Dzhokhar A. Tsarnaev, 19, who was captured Friday, and Tamerlan Tsarnaev, 26, who was killed earlier — had arrived in the country a decade earlier, with a father who claimed asylum because of the conflict in their homeland. They could hardly have been identified by more vigilant border control, people said."You can't stop people who came into the U.S. who 10 years later do bad things," said Andrew Factor, 26, an investment adviser who stopped outside his office on the main street here. "We're supposed to screen for terrorists when kids are 9 and 16?"Nonetheless, the details of the Tsarnaev family's odyssey may become lost in a larger debate over immigration policy, an issue that evokes visceral reactions. Two Republican senators favoring reform, Lindsey Graham of South Carolina and John McCain of Arizona, warned Friday of bringing Boston into the debate and insisted an overhaul would tighten security "by helping us identify exactly who has entered our country and who has left."But that message was not always embraced. "I'm a little more of an extremist now after what happened in Boston," said Greg Ricker, 41, a stockbroker, as he stepped outside the Flying Pig Saloon in Malvern for a cigarette. "I think we should just stop letting people in."Like nearby Wayne, Malvern is part of a suburban belt that has grown more Democratic in recent elections. Attitudes toward immigration reform seem to be changing, in part along generational lines. Frank Cunningham, a 27-year-old accountant, said that he, unlike his father, favors a path to citizenship for the estimated 11 million illegal immigrants in the country."The way I was raised, my dad says, 'If you come into the country illegally, you don't deserve to be here,' " Mr. Cunningham said. "But I'm wondering who is going to do those jobs?"Gary Burnett, 35, said he favored a path to citizenship and expanded permanent-resident visas for those waiting outside the country, because the nation is already part of a global economy.As a software engineer, he said, "I compete with the entire world already. I have to be able to do the work of at least three people in Asia to compete."He thought the potential that some immigrants might turn out to be terrorists was a red herring.Melvin Cook, 57, who was buying a pizza, went further. He accused politicians of exploiting the Boston bombing. "They're trying to put fear into us of immigrants," he said. Mr. Cook, a truck driver, said of illegal immigrants, "The jobs they're getting, nobody wants."
WASHINGTON — After months of heated negotiations, a bipartisan group of eight senators finally achieved compromise, coming together to unveil a broad overhaul of the nation's immigration laws. But at a Senate Judiciary Committee hearing on the legislation Monday, a new set of divisions began to emerge, offering an early glimpse at the partisan politics likely to be on display as the immigration bill winds its way through the Senate.At the marathon session, which featured testimony from 23 people, both lawmakers and witnesses raised charged questions. Could an immigration overhaul be done in separate pieces, without including a path to citizenship? What protections, if any, do same-sex couples deserve? How should the Boston bombings affect the immigration debate? The tempers of legislators flared, and at one point the hearing needed to be gaveled back to order.Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont and the chairman of the committee, took issue with conservative commentators and Republican lawmakers who suggested that any debate about an immigration overhaul should take into account that the two suspects in the Boston bombing emigrated to the United States from Kyrgyzstan."Last week, opponents of comprehensive immigration reform began to exploit the Boston Marathon bombing," Mr. Leahy said. "Let no one be so cruel as to try to use the heinous acts of these two young men last week to derail the dreams and futures of millions of hard-working people."At the committee's first hearing to review the new legislation on Friday, Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, the ranking Republican on the committee, said that immigration changes should be done carefully, "particularly in light of all that's happening in Massachusetts right now and over the last week."The mood quickly turned tense when Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and a member of the bipartisan group that drafted the new legislation, seemed to criticize his fellow senators, who, he said, "are pointing to what happened, the terrible tragedy in Boston, as, I would say, an excuse for not doing a bill or delaying it many months or years.""I never said that!" said Mr. Grassley, raising his voice and leaning forward in his chair to look at Mr. Schumer. "I never said that!""I don't mean you, Mr. Grassley," Mr. Schumer said, as Senator Jeff Sessions, Republican of Alabama, accused Mr. Schumer of "demeaning the witnesses," and Mr. Leahy banged his gavel to restore order in the hearing room.The two brothers suspected of perpetrating the bombings came to the United States through the existing legal immigration system, under a 2002 asylum petition by their father, who said he was worried about his safety because of his activities in Chechnya. One of the brothers had become a naturalized citizen, and the other was here legally on a visa, though his citizenship was still under review after a routine background check revealed that he had been interviewed by the F.B.I. in 2011.Senator Ted Cruz, Republican of Texas, touched on another sensitive point when he suggested that instead of passing a broad bill, the Senate should take a piecemeal approach, focusing on areas "where there is wide bipartisan agreement.""I don't think that there is any issue in this entire debate that is more divisive than a path to citizenship for those who are here illegally," he said. "In my view, any bill that insists upon that jeopardizes the likelihood of passing any immigration reform bill."Though the bipartisan group has insisted that any legislation must be comprehensive — Democrats, in particular, fear that they would not be able to secure support for a path to citizenship if lawmakers were allowed to vote on that issue separately — Mr. Cruz seemed to echo some House Republicans, who have suggested breaking the bill up into smaller parts and focusing on its less controversial components.Another touchy point — that the bill currently does not include same-sex couples for family unity consideration — came up during the testimony of Jim Kolbe, a former Republican congressman from Arizona who is gay and who endured a yearlong separation from his partner, a Panamanian immigrant, when the man's work visa expired."Families like mine are left behind as part of this proposal," Mr. Kolbe said. "Equally important, U.S. businesses and our economy suffer because of the omission of lesbian, gay, bisexual and transgender families from the bill introduced last week." Several Republican members of the bipartisan group have explicitly said that adding such protections would doom the legislation.
WASHINGTON — "The social sharing of a small amount of marijuana" by immigrants lawfully in the United States does not require their automatic deportation, the Supreme Court ruled on Tuesday."Sharing a small amount of marijuana for no remuneration, let alone possession with intent to do so, does not fit easily into the everyday understanding of trafficking, which ordinarily means some sort of commercial dealing," Justice Sonia Sotomayor wrote for a seven-justice majority, partly quoting from an earlier case.The case arose from a traffic stop in Georgia in 2007 during which Adrian Moncrieffe, a Jamaican citizen, was found with 1.3 grams of marijuana — "the equivalent," Justice Sotomayor wrote, "of about two or three marijuana cigarettes."Mr. Moncrieffe pleaded guilty to possession with intent to distribute, a felony under Georgia law, and was sentenced to five years of probation. Saying the conviction established that Mr. Moncrieffe had committed an "aggravated felony," federal authorities sought to deport him.Tuesday's decision was the third in a series of Supreme Court cases considering whether a given state drug crime amounted to an aggravated felony under the immigration laws. If it does, the government has no choice but to deport the defendant. If it does not, the attorney general has the discretion to show leniency.The question in all of the cases was how to understand state drug convictions in light of a part of the immigration laws that defines aggravated felonies to include drug offenses that would be punishable by more than a year in prison under the federal Controlled Substances Act.The act generally calls for a maximum term of five years for possessing controlled substances with an intent to distribute them. But it contains an exception for the distribution of "a small amount of marijuana for no remuneration," which judges may treat as a misdemeanor subject to no more than a year in prison.Justice Sotomayor wrote that it was not clear whether the formal elements of Mr. Moncrieffe's state conviction fit within the federal exception. The ambiguity, she said, counted in his favor, sparing him from automatic deportation.The federal government said the actual facts of the case mattered and should be determined during immigration proceedings. Justice Sotomayor rejected that approach, saying that "our nation's overburdened immigration courts" would have difficulty making such determinations based on stale or missing evidence presented by immigrants who may be in detention and have no right to a lawyer.In dissent, Justice Clarence Thomas said the majority's approach "has the effect of treating a substantial number of state felonies as federal misdemeanors, even when they would result in federal felony convictions." The only theme that unites the court's decisions in this area, Justice Thomas added, "appears to be that the government consistently loses."In a second dissent in the case, Moncrieffe v. Holder, No. 11-702, Justice Samuel A. Alito Jr. said the majority's approach was "analytically confused." It will, he said, allow people working for "some of the world's most dangerous drug cartels" to escape automatic deportation. "The court's decision," Justice Alito added, "also means that the consequences of a conviction for illegal possession with intent to distribute will vary radically depending on the state in which the case is prosecuted."Justice Alito said that Mr. Moncrieffe had had the opportunity to show immigration authorities that he would have been eligible for lenient treatment under the federal drug law. But the "petitioner, for whatever reason, availed himself only of the opportunity to show that his conviction had involved a small amount of marijuana and did not present evidence — or even contend — that his offense had not involved remuneration."
WASHINGTON — The House Judiciary Committee announced Thursday that it would introduce a series of bills beginning this week to overhaul the nation's immigration system. The move was designed to keep the committee in the middle of the debate over the issue, which is now percolating on Capitol Hill, and to press a bipartisan group in the House that has been working in private on its own broad legislation.Representative Robert W. Goodlatte, Republican of Virginia and the chairman of the committee, said the first of several proposals in the coming weeks would create a guest worker program for agriculture and require employers to use an electronic verification system to check the immigration status of employees.Mr. Goodlatte made it clear that his committee's intention was to jump-start the debate in the House. The bipartisan House group studying immigration, which has been meeting in secret on and off for about four years, has yet to offer its own proposal."We think we can help move the process forward by beginning to examine the legislative details of various ideas that members have brought forward," he said.Mr. Goodlatte's announcement is likely to create a sense of urgency among the House group, particularly its Democratic members, to introduce broad legislation. Many Republicans in the House prefer a piecemeal approach, similar to what Mr. Goodlatte is proposing, though Democrats fear that this approach would make it tough for them to win support for a path to legalization — a crucial part of any immigration overhaul, they say.The announcement came after the Senate Judiciary Committee this week held the last of three hearings on legislation that would tighten border security and offer an eventual path to citizenship for 11 million unauthorized immigrants already here.Senators John McCain, Republican of Arizona, and Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, both members of the bipartisan group of eight senators who wrote the legislation, said Thursday that they were aiming to win 70 votes in the Senate and hoped to gain the backing of a majority of senators in both parties — a prospect Mr. McCain described as "very doable."Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont and the chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee, announced on Thursday that his committee would begin its markup of the immigration bill on May 9, shortly after Congress returns from its recess. Consideration of the legislation is expected to last for most of May."There's a different mood in the Senate," Mr. Schumer said. "I hope that our immigration bill sets the model for coming bipartisan agreements.""What we have found is, ironically, it may be a little counterintuitive, that the best way to pass immigration legislation is actually a comprehensive bill, because that can achieve more balance and everybody can get much but not all of what they want," Mr. Schumer said. "And so I think the idea of doing separate bills is just not going to work."Mr. Goodlatte emphasized that his committee had not decided what should appear in the final legislation, and he did not dismiss the possibility of offering some kind of legal status. He said the committee would examine the Senate proposal and any proposal from the House group."They have been working on this process for a long, long time," he said, "and we are very hopeful that they can reach a bipartisan agreement on what will be done to address these three major aspects of immigration reform: legal immigration reform, enforcement and what to do about the legal status of the 11 million or more people who are not here lawfully."House Democrats remain hopeful that a broad immigration bill will ultimately emerge. "This group has worked long enough that it will work toward producing a good compromise on a total fix to our immigration system — not a partial fix, not a piecemeal fix, but a total fix," Representative Xavier Becerra, Democrat of California and a member of the House bipartisan group, said on Wednesday.That group hopes to introduce its legislation by the end of May, aides said. One holdup has been Republican unwillingness to accept the Senate plan for a guest worker program, which has already been endorsed by leading business and labor groups."There is reluctance that establishment Republicans like the Chamber of Commerce are cutting deals with big labor," a House aide said. "That's not where House Republicans see themselves. They think establishment Republicans are the problem."The House group's legislation will have other differences from the Senate legislation, aides said. The House bill, for instance, will probably offer a 15-year path to citizenship, rather than the 13-year path offered in the Senate plan, though both bills would allow unauthorized immigrants to earn a green card in 10 years.Mr. Goodlatte pushed back against criticism that the committee was dragging out the process by proposing changes to the system one by one."I would point out that the House group, the bipartisan group that's been negotiating this, has been negotiating it for about four years, so we want to see a product from that group," he said, "but we recognize — and I'm sure they recognize — how difficult it is to work on this issue, and therefore making sure that we take our time is an important part of this process."
The first time Carmen Gonzalez sent money back to her family in Mexico, in 1991, Western Union charged her a $12 fee to wire $100. She earned that $12 working for six hours in a clothing factory in midtown Manhattan, which paid her $2 an hour.These days Ms. Gonzalez pays $5, which she earns in less than an hour, so she sends a bit more. The family is benefiting from a financial transformation propelled by new technology and increased competition that has driven down the average cost of sending money to Mexico by nearly 80 percent since 1999.The drop in fees saved Mexican immigrants about $12 billion over the decade that ended in 2010 — five times the amount of official United States aid to Mexico during that time, according to data from the World Bank and recent Mexican government figures. The cost of sending money to other countries has also declined sharply, though not by quite as much.The benefits are far-reaching, development experts say, providing a powerful means to chip away at poverty in other countries and expanding the hard-won earnings of immigrants in the United States.The lower costs may be one reason that remittances have held steady even as fewer immigrants from Mexico have come to the United States and the recession has cut into incomes. Overall remittances to Mexico declined during the global recession but picked up again after 2009.Some experts say more money could flow to countries like Mexico if Congress approves an immigration overhaul granting a path to citizenship to millions of illegal immigrants, because studies have shown that legalization can lead to increased wages. Others argue that with legalization, many immigrants will invest more heavily in the United States, sending less of their income back to relatives.The total remittance transfers sent across the globe from the United States in recent years are almost $50 billion annually, according to the Bureau of Economic Analysis, or roughly the equivalent of the government's foreign aid budget. (Estimates by the World Bank suggest that the figure is significantly higher, close to $100 billion per year, according to Dilip Ratha, an economist who leads the World Bank's remittances program.)"Remittances may well be the best single way to foment development," said Nancy Birdsall, the president of the Center for Global Development, a nonprofit research group in Washington. "It turns out that even a modest reduction in the cost of making remittance transfers adds up to a substantial amount compared to official aid."Estefana Bautista, who left two children in her native Mexico when she immigrated to Texas in 2005, said she pays $5 less to send them money now than when she first arrived, which she called "a big help." "I send those 5 dollars to Mexico," Ms. Bautista said. "My kids know that they're getting a little more money every two weeks."Growing competition among transfer companies has been the driving force behind the steady decline in costs. A decade ago, Western Union and Money Gram dominated the market. Now they contend with dozens of international competitors like Xoom and Ria.Western Union's share of the global remittance market has dropped to about 15 percent from around 75 percent in the late 1990s, while Money Gram's market share has declined to 5 percent from 22 percent in that time, according to the companies and government figures."What we're really seeing is competition not just based on price, but also on service quality," said W. Alexander Holmes, the chief financial officer of MoneyGram. "It's a very interesting time in the market."Worldwide, costs for sending remittances to any country have come down from around 15 percent per $300 transaction in the late 1990s to below 10 percent today, Mr. Ratha said. For money sent to Mexico, costs have declined from 9.5 percent per $300 to just over 2 percent today.In addition to fees covering the processing, remittance companies make money from converting currencies. Remittance experts say these exchange rate fees have not come down nearly as much in recent years. In a meeting in 2011, finance ministers from the Group of 20 countries committed to reducing remittance costs over all from around 10 percent to 5 percent per transaction by 2014.This month, a bipartisan group in the Senate introduced proposals to allow immigrants here illegally to gain legal status and eventually become citizens.
SAN MARINO, Calif. — Beneath the palm trees that line Huntington Drive, named for the railroad magnate who founded this Southern California city , hang signs to honor families who have helped sponsor the centennial celebration here this year. There are names like Dryden, Crowley and Telleen, families that have lived here for generations. But there are newer names as well: Sun, Koo and Shi.A generation ago, whites made up roughly two-thirds of the population in this rarefied Los Angeles suburb, where most of the homes are worth well over $1 million. But Asians now make up over half of the population in San Marino, which has long attracted some of the region's wealthiest families and was once home to the John Birch Society's Western headquarters.The transformation illustrates a drastic shift in California immigration trends over the last decade, one that can easily be seen all over the area: more than twice as many immigrants to the nation's most populous state now come from Asia than from Latin America.And the change here is just one example of the ways immigration is remaking America, with the political, economic and cultural ramifications playing out in a variety of ways. The number of Latinos has more than doubled in many Southern states, including Alabama, Georgia and North Carolina, creating new tensions. Asian populations are booming in New Jersey, and Latino immigrants are reviving small towns in the Midwest.Much of the current immigration debate in Congress has focused on Hispanics, and California has for decades been viewed as the focal point of that migration. But in cities in the San Gabriel Valley — as well as in Orange County and in Silicon Valley in Northern California — Asian immigrants have become a dominant cultural force in places that were once largely white or Hispanic."We are really looking at a different era here," said Hans Johnson, a demographer at the Public Policy Institute of California who has studied census data. "There are astounding changes in working-class towns and old, established, wealthy cities. It is not confined to one place."Asians have become a majority in more than half a dozen cities in the San Gabriel Valley in the last decade, creating a region of Asian-dominated suburbs that stretches for nearly 30 miles east of Los Angeles. In the shopping centers, Chinese-language characters are on nearly every storefront, visible from the freeways that cut through the area.Monterey Park, a middle-class city that began attracting Asian immigrants more than a generation ago, is still widely seen as the area's center and retail hub. But as Asians have continued to arrive in Southern California, they have moved into some of the most exclusive cities in Los Angeles County, making up more than 60 percent of the population in San Gabriel and Walnut, along the county's eastern edge.Many of the immigrants come here from China and Taiwan, where they were part of a highly educated and affluent population. They have eagerly bought property in places like San Marino, where the median income is nearly double that of Beverly Hills and is home to one of the highest-performing school districts in the state. The local library now offers story time in Mandarin.But the wealth is not uniform, and there are pockets of poverty in several of the area's working-class suburbs, particularly in Vietnamese and Filipino communities."This is kind of ground zero for a new immigrant America," said Daniel Ichinose, a demographer at the Asian Pacific American Legal Center. "You have people speaking Mandarin and Vietnamese and Spanish all living together and facing many common challenges."The children of the immigrants who began transforming the area a generation ago are beginning to come of age, becoming cheerleaders for the region, running for political office and creating businesses that cater to a distinctly American-born audience.There are countless stores that display signs in Mandarin, sell restaurant supplies and Chinese herbs, or advertise acupuncture or brokerage services. But perhaps the most common storefront is the boba tea shop, where young patrons spend hours drinking cold milk tea with jellylike tapioca balls. Nearly every one of the region's hundreds of strip malls boasts a cafe — or even two — offering a dizzying number of variations on the sweet drink.Andrew and David Fung, who grew up in Seattle, were surprised to see the pervasiveness of Chinese and Taiwanese culture in the San Gabriel Valley.After moving to the area a couple of years ago to try to break into the entertainment industry, the Fung brothers created several hip-hop videos celebrating what they termed the "boba life," to embrace the area where, as their lyrics explain, "kids drink more milk tea than liquor." The videos became so wildly popular on the Internet that local leaders began showing them in official meetings."People here think it's normal, hanging out to drink boba all day long, but this culture doesn't exist everywhere, and we're trying to tell them to embrace it, to own it," said David Fung, 26. "We've got to teach ourselves to be proud of who we are and tell others about it."The Fung brothers have helped create a local ethnic pride that would have been unimaginable a generation ago, said Oliver Wang, a professor of sociology at California State University, Long Beach, who grew up in San Marino in the 1980s and returned to the area three years ago. The area could become central to Asian-American identity in the region in the way East Los Angeles is to Latinos or South Los Angeles is to African-Americans, he said."It wasn't cool to be Chinese or cool to be Asian," he said. "The idea that the San Gabriel Valley could be the locus of some kind of cultural movement or identity is fascinating. They are asserting cultural capital to create Asian-American identity that wasn't there before, and one that is homegrown, not imported from Taiwan or Hong Kong."But the growth has not come without some backlash. While there is rarely overt tension in the area these days, there is a history of clashes over English-only ordinances, and some people still speak in hushed tones about Chinese immigrants taking over the region.More recently, there have been renewed complaints of "maternity tourism," a cottage industry that brings Chinese women here to give birth so their children can have American citizenship. Residents, including immigrants, have complained to officials about large houses that host dozens of pregnant women at a time.Jay Chen, 35, a member of the Hacienda Heights school board in the San Gabriel Valley, recalled a 2010 controversy over a plan to create a Chinese-language class at a local middle school. Last year, when Mr. Chen challenged a longtime Republican congressman, Ed Royce, to represent a newly drawn district, he received a handful of messages using anti-Asian slurs."There's still this conservative element that said teaching Chinese meant you were teaching communism," said Mr. Chen, who lost the race. "Meanwhile, people are fighting to get into our district so their children — of whatever ethnicity — can take these classes."Food often draws outsiders to the region, which is packed with mom-and-pop restaurants where a feast can cost less than $20.Last summer, Jonny Hwang, 32, a son of Taiwanese immigrants, created the 626 Night Market. (Its name is play on the region's area code.) At the first event, with dozens of local food vendors, more than 15,000 people clogged the streets to get in. "It surprised everyone," Mr. Hwang said. "All of the sudden we had a community and something that even other people wanted."
WASHINGTON — Jim DeMint helped makeMarco Rubio a Senate star — and he could be forgiven for regretting it.Mr. DeMint, a former Republican senator from South Carolina, endorsed Mr. Rubio early on in his 2010 Senate bid, when he was still a long-shot Tea Party candidate, and Mr. Rubio has said that Mr. DeMint is his best friend, after his wife.And yet, perhaps for the first time, the two men now find themselves at odds on a major issue. In 2007, Mr. DeMint was instrumental in helping to kill legislation to overhaul the nation's immigration system, and now, six years later, Mr. Rubio, Republican of Florida, is a pivotal member of a bipartisan Senate group that has written a bill that would do just what Mr. DeMint was fighting to prevent.As Mr. Rubio's immigration push meets vocal and persistent opposition, it will be Mr. DeMint, newly ensconced as the president of the Heritage Foundation, among those leading the charge. The foundation plans to issue an updated version of its 2007 economic study that helped doom the overhaul.And Mr. DeMint has taken to the Internet, national newspapers and conservative talk radio to push against the legislation of his former protégé."I certainly wish he was on my side," Mr. Rubio said. "But he's a very principled man and he truly believes this is the wrong approach and I respect that."During his time in the Senate, Mr. DeMint, 61, earned a reputation as something of a smiling assassin — a mild-mannered legislator with a soft Southern drawl who could be a near-constant irritant to those not in line with his conservative causes and principles. Now, he has begun gearing up for the next fight.Before the legislation was even unveiled, at a session with bloggers, Mr. DeMint — whose new nongovernment salary, if it mirrors his predecessor's, is likely to be more than $1 million — warned that the bill was being "developed behind closed doors, in secret.""We've seen this movie before," he said. "We know how this game plays out."Though Mr. DeMint says he supports legal immigration, he prefers a piecemeal approach to fixing the system and views any path to citizenship for the 11 million immigrants who are in the country illegally as amnesty, forgiveness for breaking the law.His main argument is an economic one — a belief that unauthorized immigrants, who he said would ultimately take out more in federal benefits than they would pay in taxes, would be a drain on the economy. (Under the legislation proposed in the Senate, it would be at least 13 years before an illegal immigrant would qualify for any federal benefits.)In its 2007 study, the Heritage Foundation estimated that an immigration overhaul could cost taxpayers roughly $2.5 trillion, and that staggering sum is credited with helping provide a rationale to kill the legislation. Though Republican politicians and other groups have since criticized the research as flawed, the Heritage Foundation plans to release a new version of the study soon.Mr. DeMint, who in the Senate was willing to oppose his fellow Republicans, has already proved himself formidable in his new role, as his organization helped the Republican opposition to a background check compromise on gun legislation that was ultimately defeated."What Jim DeMint has done is a wonderful thing," said Larry Pratt, the executive director of Gun Owners of America. "He has shown that the best way to make change in Washington is from the outside."And when it comes to immigration, his word, especially in conservative circles, is still highly influential."We care what Senator DeMint's perspective on an issue is because we have a relationship with him, and he remains much more popular in my district than I am," said Representative Trey Gowdy, Republican of South Carolina, referring to the state's delegation. "I'd be crazy not to."Immigration watchers, meanwhile, are curious about how the relationship between Mr. DeMint and Mr. Rubio will affect the debate. "He was an early backer of Rubio and Rubio owes him a lot," said Keith Appell, a Republican political consultant.
WASHINGTON — The Supreme Court on Monday declined to consider a case concerning a tough 2011 Alabama immigration law that makes it a crime to harbor or transport immigrants not authorized to be in the United States or to induce them to enter or live in the state. The move left in place an appeals court ruling blocking the law.The justices, as is their custom, offered no reasons for turning down the appeal. Justice Antonin Scalia noted his dissent but also offered no reasoning.The question in the case, Alabama v. United States, No. 12-884, was whether the Alabama law conflicted with a similar federal law. In August, the United States Court of Appeals for the 11th Circuit blocked the state law at the request of the Obama administration, saying federal immigration law and policy "comprehensively addresses criminal penalties for these actions undertaken within the borders of the United States, and a state's attempt to intrude into this area is prohibited because Congress has adopted a calibrated framework."The Supreme Court has recently considered state efforts to address illegal immigration in connection with two Arizona laws.Last June, the court delivered a split decision on a 2010 Arizona law, upholding its most hotly debated provision but blocking others on the grounds that they interfered with the federal government's role in setting immigration policy.The court unanimously but tentatively sustained the law's centerpiece, the one critics have called its "show me your papers" provision, leaving the door open to further challenges. The provision requires state law enforcement officials to determine the immigration status of anyone they stop or arrest if they have reason to suspect that the individual might be in the country illegally.But the court blocked three other provisions in the 2010 law, including one that would have subjected people in the country illegally to criminal penalties for activities like seeking work."The national government has significant power to regulate immigration," Justice Anthony M. Kennedy wrote for the majority. "The sound exercise of national power over immigration depends on the nation's meeting its responsibility to base its laws on a political will informed by searching, thoughtful, rational civic discourse."In 2011, the court upheld a decision finding that a different Arizona law, this one imposing harsh penalties on businesses that hire illegal workers, was not pre-empted by federal law. Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr., writing for the majority, said the state law "simply seeks to enforce" a federal ban on hiring illegal workers.
This has been a good year for gay rights advocates — with public opinion shifting in their favor and same-sex marriage advancing in the states — but not when it comes to immigration .An 844-page bill introduced in the Senate in mid-April by a bipartisan group of eight lawmakers includes measures to make legal immigration easier for highly skilled immigrants, migrant farmworkers and those living here illegally. It has no provisions that would help foreigners who are same-sex partners of American citizens to become legal permanent residents.Gay advocates were sharply disappointed to find that same-sex couples were excluded from the legislation, since the Democrats who wrote it included two of their most consistent champions, Senators Charles E. Schumer of New York and Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, the second highest-ranking Senate Democrat. Senator Patrick J. Leahy of Vermont, the Democrat who is chairman of the Judiciary Committee, where the bill is under consideration, has offered, since as far back as 2003, a separate measure that would allow immigrants in long-term same-sex relationships to obtain residency with a green card.But in the lengthy closed-door negotiations that produced the overhaul proposal, the four Republicans in the bipartisan group made it clear early on that they did not want to include such a hot-button issue in a bill that would be a challenge to sell to their party even without it, according to Senate staff members. The Republicans are Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, Jeff Flake and John McCain of Arizona, and Marco Rubio of Florida.Many Republicans in both houses of Congress oppose any recognition of same-sex unions.Now, with the immigration bill scheduled to advance next week toward a vote in the Judiciary Committee, Democrats are in a quandary about whether to offer an amendment that would give green cards to same-sex partners.Republican sponsors of the overhaul warned on Tuesday that such an amendment would sink the entire measure."There's a reason this language wasn't included in the Gang of Eight's bill: It's a deal-breaker for most Republicans," Senator Flake said. "Finding consensus on immigration legislation is tough enough without opening the bill up to social issues."Under existing immigration law, it is generally a quick and straightforward process when an American citizen seeks a green card for a foreign-born spouse in a traditional marriage.But under a 1996 federal law that defines marriage as a union between a man and a woman, Americans cannot apply for green cards for foreign spouses of the same sex. In addition, the immigration code does not recognize same-sex partners.Last Wednesday, about 40 gay and lesbian families from 27 states fanned out across Capitol Hill in a lobbying blitz, hoping to show lawmakers why they cared about the issue."I was troubled to hear hesitation from Senate Democrats," said Rachel B. Tiven, executive director of Immigration Equality, a gay rights group that organized the Washington visits. "When Democrats are falling over one another to say how they support marriage equality, why are they abandoning gay families when actual legislation is on the table?"Among those knocking on doors in Washington were Ness Madeiros, 35, and her wife, Ginger, 37, who traveled from their home in Minneapolis with their 8-month-old son, Jamie, in tow."He was the most amazing tiny little lobbyist," Ness Madeiros said in an interview together with Ginger. "He did not cry for 10 hours, and we cried in every meeting."Ness, an immigrant from Bermuda, said she had lived in the United States on and off for more than a decade, always with legal, but temporary, immigration documents. She said she met Ginger, an American citizen, in 2006 when they were both working at a boarding school in Massachusetts. They were legally married there in 2008.Shortly after, an effort to obtain a permanent green card for Ness through an employer failed. Ness left for Bermuda, where she remained for two years, the couple said. In 2010 she returned here on a student visa to live with Ginger in Minnesota and study for a master's degree in psychology.Without a permanent green card, Ness cannot officially adopt Jamie or share ownership of the house where they live. Her visa is about to expire, the couple said."It's a pretty scary situation for us," Ginger said. "If something were to happen to me, what is Ness left with?"Senator Leahy's bill does not seek to legalize gay marriage. Instead, it would allow an American citizen to petition for a green card for a "permanent partner." Senator Susan Collins of Maine, a Republican, is a co-sponsor of that bill. "Our legislation would simply update our nation's immigration laws to treat binational, same-sex permanent partners fairly," she said on Tuesday.She and Senate Democrats are looking to Mr. Leahy to decide whether to attach that measure as an amendment to the larger bill. He has not yet tipped his hand.But in an interview Tuesday with the conservative radio host Hugh Hewitt, Senator Rubio was blunt in his assessment of the impact of any same-sex amendment. "This immigration bill is difficult enough as it is," he said. "If that issue is injected into this bill, this bill will fail. It will not have the support. It will not have my support."
Tens of thousands of immigrants, Latinos and other supporters of an overhaul of the immigration system turned out on Wednesday for marches, rallies and prayer vigils, hoping to show Congress that momentum is building for a path to citizenship for 11 million immigrants in the country illegally.Instead of concentrating on large May Day demonstrations, organizers said they had chosen to hold smaller actions in more than 100 cities nationwide to draw more local supporters.There were marches in Birmingham, Ala., and Milwaukee, and a rally on the steps of the state Capitol in Denver. In Bozeman, Mont., organizers gave salsa lessons to protesters before marching to the public library.Hours after a peaceful march ended in Seattle, a burst of violence led to the arrests of 17 people, The Associated Press reported. Several dozen protesters, some covering their faces with bandannas, began pelting police officers with rocks and bottles. Officers responded with pepper spray and "flash-bang" grenades — releasing smoke, a flashing light and a loud noise — to disperse the crowd, The A.P. said.In Chicago, hundreds of protesters marched through downtown streets, some dressed in stars and stripes and others waving Mexican flags, holding signs that read "Stop Deportations" and "Legalization for All." Some, like Luis Moreno, who is 29 and from Mexico, said it was their first time protesting, since they had been hesitant to come out in previous years because of a lack of legal status, but now believed that the political winds were in their favor."I think it is time that we come out of the shadows and support what we believe in," Mr. Moreno said.Others in Chicago attributed renewed hope there to the strong turnout by Latino voters in the November election, saying it sent a message to Washington and made them feel more powerful."I think many people got afraid to be noticed," said Jaime Salgado, 37, an immigrant who works as a bus boy at a city restaurant. "We didn't have papers, and we didn't want them to know."Now, Mr. Salgado said: "We noticed that they need Latin voters. They know they need us, as we need them."In mid-April a bipartisan group of eight senators introduced a sweeping immigration bill, which includes a path to citizenship for illegal immigrants as well as measures to tighten border security, clear backlogs in the legal immigration system, create new guest worker programs and expand visas for highly skilled immigrants. The measure faces an uphill battle in the Senate, its sponsors acknowledge, and even more uncertain prospects in the House, where many Republicans are reluctant to offer eventual citizenship to immigrants who broke the law.Addressing the crowd in Chicago, Senator Richard J. Durbin, Democrat of Illinois, who is an author of the immigration bill, appealed for unity."We have the best chance we've had in 25 years to pass comprehensive immigration reform this year in Washington, D.C.," he said.The May Day events did not begin to approach the size of the demonstrations when immigration legislation was before Congress in 2006 and hundreds of thousands of people turned out in Los Angeles and other cities. Since then, the failure of several immigration bills in Congress and the high rate of deportations by the Obama administration have made many people wary of public protests."The big strategy is to point the people power of the movement towards getting Congress to finish the job in 2013," said Deepak Bhargava, executive director of the Center for Community Change, one of the main organizers of Wednesday's events. Mr. Bhargava said immigration groups would focus their efforts on specific lawmakers who could influence the outcome of the vote. People who attended the events Wednesday were asked to send e-mails and make calls to lawmakers on the spot.In Richmond, Va., about 150 people held a small rally and marched to the headquarters of the Republican Party. In a speech, Jaime Contreras, vice president of a local chapter of the Service Employees International Union, or S.E.I.U., said to Republicans, "There's no honor in being on the wrong side of history as the last stronghold fighting against civil rights."
WASHINGTON — As a gun safety bill dissolved on the Senate floor last month, a group of eight senators — some who had supported the failed measure — had already moved on to a policy battle they found more promising: reinventing the nation's troubled immigration system.But despite broader Republican support for an immigration overhaul, the inability of Congress to pass modest gun legislation involving background checks is a warning for the immigration bill's journey.The warning does not mean failure, especially since most Republicans believe that immigration changes, unlike gun legislation, would help them politically. But it does indicate that the road to consensus on immigration will be far bumpier than the narrative on Capitol Hill suggests."There was a lot of Washington talk about the gun bill's possibilities, but I never saw that reflected in the people at home," said Representative Jack Kingston, Republican of Georgia, who has served since 1993. "Now there is all this buzz about the immigration reform, and that is not reflected, either."Like the gun legislation, the immigration bill, an 800-page proposal conceived among the eight lawmakers, must go through the Judiciary Committee, where the sharp partisan differences that defeated the gun bill are already on display.Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, the lead Republican on the committee, has expressed skepticism, as has Senator Ted Cruz, Republican of Texas. Last month, Mr. Grassley sparred with Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, in a hearing over Mr. Grassley's suggestion that the origins of the suspects in the Boston Marathon bombings should be part of the immigration debate.Just as the fight over the gun bill pivoted on a single policy disagreement — the question of keeping records on background checks — single divisive issues like whether or not immigrants here illegally should be given a pathway to citizenship can undermine other components to legislation on which there is broad agreement.President Obama underscored on Tuesday how disagreements over basic principles can thwart a bill. Should a proposal from House Republicans not meet what he called "basic criteria," including a pathway to citizenship for the estimated 11 million immigrants in the country illegally, "then I will not support such a bill," he said.Certain buzzwords in the gun debate became toxic to supporters of gun control. Opponents insisted, for example, that a new background-check law would result in gun registries, which the legislation explicitly would have forbidden. Similarly, proponents of strong border security will most likely be skeptical of the government's commitment to improve it, which House Republicans say is essential, and keep beating that drum."I think the opposition is counting on mistrust of government, hatred of Obama and the idea that Congress can't get anything right to combine as the pathway to no," said Frank Sharry, the executive director of America's Voice, an immigrant advocacy group.Many Congressional Republicans say they are bracing for Mr. Obama to blame them for any problems with the legislative process."I do get the sense that everything for this administration seems to be a day-to-day tactical decision, rather than a legislative strategy of how to get things passed," said Senator Roy Blunt, Republican of Missouri. "That's not the same as doing what it takes to get work done."Process could also prove an enemy. Senate leaders will need 60 votes to even start on a bill, but before then they will have to ponder numerous amendments from the left and right — all of which could injure the bill's chances in both camps. In fact, when Mr. Obama was a senator, he fought for a "poison pill" amendment in 2007 to phase out a guest-worker program favored by Republicans, an amendment that, when attached to the bill, helped sink it.Some House members have already started to go their own way with far more modest, incremental proposals. Republicans there will certainly produce a far different bill from the Senate's. Should the Senate and House end up in a conference to reconcile two bills, the final measure may well end up closer to that produced in the Senate, as has been the case with other bills that have gone to conference.If this happens, Speaker John A. Boehner, Republican of Ohio, might be presented with the excruciating choice of bringing a more liberal version of legislation to the House floor or failing to close the deal on immigration reform that many in his party believe is needed.Perhaps the most important factor in the bill's favor is its broad support among a wide variety of constituencies, including the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, the agricultural industry, labor unions and many church groups. Unlike the gun legislation, the immigration bill has no strong single opponent analogous to the National Rifle Association. Immigration legislation also has a compelling advocate in the Senate.Senator Marco Rubio, the Florida Republican who has the greatest stake in the success of the measure, has made broad efforts to get in front of critics, something that the gun-control lobby — more like the immigration advocacy movement in 2007 — did not really do."Here's my encouragement to my colleagues who don't agree with the bill that we've crafted," Mr. Rubio said on the Senate floor last week. "Change it. Let's work on changing it. If you believe that what we have today is broken, if you believe that the status quo on immigration is chaos and a disaster, if that's what you believe, as I do, then let's solve it."The gun measure, for all the advocacy it got from the families of Newtown, Conn., and other victims of gun violence, did not have a supporter with the ambitions of Mr. Rubio behind it. This could prove to be the bill's best hope, or Mr. Rubio's greatest risk."The political imperative on immigration compared to guns is that if you take down Rubio, you take down the Republican Party," Mr. Sharry said. "But we understand trying to get something in a divided Congress with a bill that the president supports is a tough call. We have a real roller coaster ride ahead."
WASHINGTON — The television advertisement that hit the airwaves in Florida last month featured the Republican Party's rising star, Senator Marco Rubio, boasting about his get-tough plan for border security.But most who watched the commercial, sponsored by a new group that calls itself Americans for a Conservative Direction, may be surprised to learn who bankrolled it: senior executives from Silicon Valley, like Mark Zuckerberg of Facebook and Reid Hoffman of LinkedIn, who run companies where the top employees donate mostly to Democrats.The advertising blitz reflects the sophisticated lobbying campaign being waged by technology companies and their executives.They have managed to secure much of what they want in the landmark immigration bill now pending in Congress, provisions that would allow them to fill thousands of vacant jobs with foreign engineers. At the same time, they have openly encouraged lawmakers to make it harder for consulting companies in India and elsewhere to provide foreign workers temporarily to this country.Those deals were worked out through what Senate negotiators acknowledged was extraordinary access by American technology companies to staff members who drafted the bill. The companies often learned about detailed provisions even before all the members of the so-called Gang of Eight senators who worked out the package were informed."We are very pleased with the progress and happy with what's in the bill," said Peter J. Muller, a former House aide who now works as the director of government relations at Intel. "It addresses many of the issues we've been advocating for years."Now, along with other industry heavyweights, including the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, the technology companies are trying to make sure the law gets passed — which explains the political-style television advertising campaign, sponsored by a group that has revealed no details about how much money it gets from its individual supporters.The industry also hopes to get more from the deal by working to remove some regulatory restrictions in the proposal, including on hiring foreign workers and firing Americans.Silicon Valley was once politically aloof before realizing in recent years that its future profits depended in part on battles here in Washington. Its effort to influence immigration legislation is one of its most sophisticated.The technology industry "understands there's probably not a tremendous amount of resistance to their part of the bill," Mr. Rubio said in an interview last week, saying he welcomed the industry support. "But their future and getting the reform passed is tied to the overall bill."The bill has a good chance of winning passage in the Senate. The hardest sell will come in the House, where many conservative Republicans see the deal as too generous to immigrants who came to this nation illegally.Rob Jesmer, a former top Republican Senate strategist who helps run the new Zuckerberg-backed nonprofit group that sponsored the Rubio ad, insisted that his organization's push is based on the personal convictions of the executives who donated to the cause and who believe immigration laws need to be changed. Those convictions just happen to line up with what their corporations are lobbying for as well, he said."It will give a lot of people who are educated in this country who are already here a chance to remain in the United States," Mr. Jesmer said, "and encourage entrepreneurs from all over the world to come to the United States and create jobs."The profound transition under way inside Silicon Valley companies is illustrated by their lobbying disclosure reports filed in Congress. Facebook's lobbying budget swelled from $351,000 in 2010 to $2.45 million in the first three months of this year, while Google spent a record $18 million last year.That boom in spending translates into hiring of top talent in the art of Washington deal-making. These companies have hired people like Joel D. Kaplan, a onetime deputy chief of staff in the Bush administration who now works for Facebook; Susan Molinari, a former House Republican from New York who is now a Google lobbyist; and outside lobbyists like Steven Elmendorf, a former chief of staff to Richard A. Gephardt, a former House majority leader, who works for Facebook.The immigration fight, which has unified technology companies perhaps more than any other issue, has brought the lobbying effort to new heights. The industry sees it as a fix to a stubborn problem: job vacancies, particularly for engineers."We are not able to fill all the jobs that we are creating," Brad Smith, Microsoft's general counsel, told the Senate Judiciary Committee late last month.Chief executives met with President Obama to discuss immigration. Venture capitalists testified in Congress. Their lobbyists roamed the Senate corridors to make sure their appeals were considered in the closed-door negotiations among the Gang of Eight, which included Mr. Rubio and Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, who have been particularly receptive.In the many phone calls and hallway asides on Capitol Hill this year, those lobbyists realized that they had to give a little to get a lot of what they wanted. At the top of their wish list was an expansion of a temporary visa program called the H-1B, which allows companies to hire foreigners for jobs in the United States. There are a limited number of H-1Bs available each year, and competition for them is fierce.Companies like Facebook and Intel use them largely to bring workers to their own offices. Consulting companies like Tata, based in India, use them to supply computer workers at American banks, oil companies and sometimes software firms.
WASHINGTON — Republican opponents of legislation to overhaul the nation's immigration laws are readying an offensive intended to hijack the newly released bill as the Senate Judiciary Committee on Thursday begins a review that will offer the clearest sign yet of how difficult a path the legislation faces.With the committee expected to spend at least three weeks on the legislation, Republican critics could offer hundreds of amendments to try to reshape the overhaul. They include proposals that could lengthen the timeline for a pathway to citizenship and that could tamper with an already fragile deal negotiated between business and labor groups for a guest worker program. Anticipating an onslaught, Democrats are preparing a robust defense in an effort to keep the legislation largely intact.For the bipartisan group of eight senators who drafted the legislation and now hope to shepherd it through committee and onto the floor, each amendment is a potential hurdle."They'll be looking to throw obstacles in the way of the process and propose poison pills in order to frame the debate for the far right," said Frank Sharry, the executive director of America's Voice, a pro-immigration group, referring to some of the potential Republican amendments. "What they're really doing is playing towards conservatives, trying to make Marco Rubio and other Republicans uncomfortable, and mobilizing grass-roots opposition."Senator Jeff Sessions, Republican of Alabama and a member of the committee, has long been a vocal opponent of the immigration overhaul, and he signaled last week that he planned to try to slow down the legislation's progress by offering amendments that would "confront the fundamentals of the bill.""The longer this legislation is available for public review, the worse it's going to be perceived," Mr. Sessions said Monday in a phone interview. "The longer it lays out there, the worse it's going to smell. The tide is going to turn."The committee will take up the legislation just days after the Heritage Foundation released a report that estimated that the measure, which would offer a path to citizenship for the 11 million undocumented people already in the country, could cost taxpayers at least $6.3 trillion over time. Though the foundation's analysis, issued Monday, has come under scrutiny and criticism, a similar report helped kill an immigration overhaul effort in 2007, and many Democrats on the committee expect the Heritage study to come up.Mr. Rubio, a Florida Republican and a particularly high-profile member of the bipartisan group, is not on the committee but plans to work with his colleagues to shape the bill from the outside."We're working with other senators on the Judiciary Committee to improve the border security triggers, limit the discretionary power given to the administration and address concerns to make sure that today's illegal immigrants are not eligible for federal benefits," Mr. Rubio said in an e-mail statement. "It's clear that if the bill isn't improved, it won't ever become law."Four of the bipartisan group's members sit on the Judiciary Committee — Democrats Richard J. Durbin of Illinois and Charles E. Schumer of New York and Republicans Jeff Flake of Arizona and Lindsey Graham of South Carolina — and immigration advocates are looking to them to protect the bill. Members of the group have generally agreed to band together to vote down all amendments that they believe would undermine the core of the original bill."The Judiciary Committee is going to be a good proving ground for our bill because the committee includes some of the Republican Party's most vocal opponents of immigration reform," Mr. Schumer said. "By honing our responses to their criticisms, and perhaps even accepting some suggestions for improvement, our compromise will be all the more battle-tested when it hits the floor."While the group intends to try to beat back both Republican and Democratic amendments, its members want to do whatever they can to broaden bipartisan backing. Not only do group members want a strong vote out of committee, but they are also aiming for broad support for the legislation in the Senate — 70 votes, by some estimates — to help gather the momentum needed to push the bill through the Republican-controlled House and onto President Obama's desk."I don't think that all the Republican amendments will be shot down," said Marielena Hincapié, the executive director of the National Immigration Law Center, an advocacy group for low-income immigrants. "I think the gang members on the committee really know they want to come out of this with a bipartisan product, and they know they will have to vote in support of some Republican amendments, even if it does move the bill a little bit to the right, for both political and substantive reasons."
VIDALIA, Ga. — For years, labor unions and immigrant rights activists have accused large-scale farmers, like those harvesting sweet Vidalia onions here this month, of exploiting Mexican guest workers. Working for hours on end under a punishing sun, the pickers are said to be crowded into squalid camps, driven without a break and even cheated of wages.But as Congress weighs immigration legislation expected to expand the guest worker program, another group is increasingly crying foul — Americans, mostly black, who live near the farms and say they want the field work but cannot get it because it is going to Mexicans. They contend that they are illegally discouraged from applying for work and treated shabbily by farmers who prefer the foreigners for their malleability."They like the Mexicans because they are scared and will do anything they tell them to," said Sherry Tomason, who worked for seven years in the fields here, then quit. Last month she and other local residents filed a federal lawsuit against a large grower of onions, Stanley Farms, alleging that it mistreated them and paid them less than it paid the Mexicans.The suit is one of a number of legal actions containing similar complaints against farms, including a large one in Moultrie, Ga., where Americans said they had been fired because of their race and national origin, given less desirable jobs and provided with fewer work opportunities than Mexican guest workers. Under a consent decree with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, the farm, Southern Valley, agreed to make certain changes.With local unemployment about 10 percent and the bureaucracy for hiring foreigners onerous — guest workers have to be imported and housed and require extensive paperwork — it would seem natural for farmers to hire from their own communities, which they did a generation ago.In fact, the farmers say, they would dearly like to."We have tried to fill our labor locally," said Brian Stanley, an owner of Stanley Farms, which is being sued by Ms. Tomason and others. "But we couldn't get enough workers, and that was hindering our growth. So we turned to the guest worker program."The vast majority of farm workers in the country are not in the guest worker program but are simply unauthorized immigrants. The plan to place those workers on a path to legal status would reduce the chances of their being exploited, the bill's sponsors say, and thereby also improve the status of Americans who feel they cannot compete against vulnerable foreigners.Mr. Stanley, like other farmers, argues that Americans who say they want the work end up quitting because it is hard, leaving the crops to rot in the fields. But the situation is filled with cultural and racial tensions.Even many of the Americans who feel mistreated acknowledge that the Mexicans who arrive on buses for a limited period are incredibly efficient, often working into the night seven days a week to increase their pay."We are not going to run all the time," said Henry Rhymes, who was fired — unfairly, he says — from Southern Valley after a week on the job. "We are not Mexicans.""When Jose gets on the bus to come here from Mexico he is committed to the work," he said. "It's like going into the military. He leaves his family at home. The work is hard, but he's ready. A domestic wants to know: What's the pay? What are the conditions? In these communities, I am sorry to say, there are no fathers at home, no role models for hard work. They want rewards without input."Such generalizations lead lawyers — and residents — to say there are racist undertones to the farms' policies."I am not arguing that agricultural work is a good job," said Dawson Morton, a lawyer who focuses on farm workers' rights at the Georgia Legal Services Program, a nonprofit law firm. "I am arguing that it could be a better job. If you want experienced people, train them. Just because people are easier to supervise, agricultural employers shouldn't be able to import them. It is not true that Americans don't want the work. What the farmers are really saying is that blacks just don't want to work."To which J. Larry Stine, an Atlanta lawyer for Stanley Farms and other big farms, replied: "The farmers are not racist or against Americans. They have crops to be picked, and they see that domestics just don't have their hearts in it."
WASHINGTON — Senator Marco Rubio , Republican of Florida, aggressively pushed back Tuesday against a Heritage Foundation report that estimated new immigration legislation would cost taxpayers $6.3 trillion by using the foundation's longstanding support for dynamic scoring — which takes into account projected economic growth when determining the cost of legislation — as a cudgel against it."Heritage, I think, is the king of dynamic scoring, and in many respects we've advocated for dynamic scoring here because of the positions that they've taken," Mr. Rubio, a chief author of the legislation, told reporters. "They are the only group that's looked at this issue and reached the conclusion they've reached. Everybody else who has analyzed immigration reform understands that if you do it, and we do it right, it will be a net positive for our economy."The Heritage Foundation analysis released Monday found that the immigration legislation, which offers a pathway to citizenship for the 11 million illegal immigrants already in the country, would produce a "lifetime fiscal deficit" of at least $6.3 trillion — an amount calculated by assuming that immigrants would receive $9.4 trillion in government benefits and services, while paying only $3.1 trillion in taxes.Critics say the analysis does not account for the economic benefits that would arise from taking millions of people out of a shadow economy. A similar analysis by the conservative group helped scuttle earlier attempts at overhauling immigration laws.Mr. Rubio is a protégé and close friend of Jim DeMint, the former South Carolina senator and new president of the Heritage Foundation. While Mr. Rubio's office has been reluctant to take on Mr. DeMint directly, he and his staff have spent weeks indirectly rebutting the Heritage Foundation's expected economic analysis, arguing that the public benefits of an immigration overhaul would outweigh any cost-related concerns.With the Heritage study finally out, Mr. Rubio pressed his case even more forcefully."Their argument is based on a single premise, which I think is flawed," he said. "That is these people are disproportionately poor because they have no education and they will be poor for the rest of their lives in the U.S. Quite frankly, that's not the immigration experience in the U.S. That's certainly not my family's experience in the U.S."Officials at the Heritage Foundation dismissed the criticism. "The dynamic scoring complaint is merely an attempt to distract from the entirely valid and incontrovertible finding of our report: that amnesty will cost taxpayers at least an additional $6.3 trillion in government benefits," the organization said.As part of Mr. Rubio's effort to shore up support for his immigration bill, he met in his Senate office Tuesday afternoon with about 20  grass-roots conservative leaders who are largely supportive of the overhaul. Several attendees said Mr. Rubio had told them that he expected the bill that reaches the president's desk to be more conservative than the current legislation."He feels that in the markup and committee process, the bill probably needs to move to the right, not the left, and that it may move further to the right if it gets out of the Senate and over to the House," said Colin Hanna, president of Let Freedom Ring, a conservative grass-roots public policy organization.On Thursday, the Senate Judiciary Committee will take up the legislation. As of Tuesday evening, the filing deadline for amendments, more than 50 (and counting) had been filed — including one from Senator Patrick J. Leahy of Vermont, the committee chairman, that would allow American citizens in committed long-term, same-sex relationships to sponsor their foreign partners for green cards.Mr. Rubio had long anticipated the Heritage Foundation analysis and had taken pains to try to head it off. In a letter last month to David S. Addington, the group's vice president for research, Mr. Rubio urged the foundation to continue its history of "pro-growth economic policy and analysis" by using dynamic scoring when considering an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws."As I consider the potential impact of immigration reform, I am keenly aware that there will be budgetary impacts when illegal immigrants begin to access citizenship beginning 13 years after immigration reform is enacted," Mr. Rubio wrote."However, I also believe that immigration reform that shifts the mix of legal immigration away from family-based toward highly skilled/merit-based combined with bringing millions of undocumented aliens out of the underground economy will improve the labor market, increase entrepreneurship and create jobs, leading to a net increase in economic growth and reducing the deficit."Mr. Rubio's argument, outlined in his letter, underscores an unlikely debate raging in conservative circles. Dynamic scoring has long been an article of faith among Republicans, who have used it to justify tax cuts, arguing that the cuts will add less to the federal deficit than estimated — or even pay for themselves — by spurring economic growth and generating tax receipts.In fact, the Republicans considered it a coup in March when Senator Rob Portman, Republican of Ohio, successfully offered a nonbinding resolution that calls on the Congressional Budget Office and the Joint Committee on Taxation to produce a dynamic score when estimating tax legislation.
WASHINGTON — The revelation that a co-author of a Heritage Foundation study critical of the Senate's bipartisan immigration proposal had recently argued that Hispanic immigrants are less intelligent than white Americans touched off a furor on Wednesday, undercutting the conservative foundation's attempt to become a major force in the immigration debate.In a 2009 dissertation for a public-policy doctorate at Harvard University, Jason Richwine, the co-author, wrote that Hispanic immigrants generally had an I.Q. that was "substantially lower than that of the white native population" — and that the lower intelligence of immigrants should be considered when drafting immigration policy."Immigrants living in the U.S. today do not have the same level of cognitive ability as natives," wrote Dr. Richwine, who is a senior policy analyst at Heritage. "No one knows whether Hispanics will ever reach I.Q. parity with whites, but the prediction that new Hispanic immigrants will have low-I.Q. children and grandchildren is difficult to argue against."The dissertation came to light as the Senate Judiciary Committee prepared to take up the Senate's 844-page immigration legislation on Thursday by starting to consider no fewer than 301 amendments that senators from both parties had offered.Heritage assailed the measure with a new study saying it would cost American taxpayers roughly $6.3 trillion over the next 50 years, and supporters of the bill reacted to the disclosure about Dr. Richwine with both dismay and some satisfaction."Whether you agree or disagree with the Heritage study, what their co-author believes is downright insulting and shameful," said Ali Noorani, executive director of the National Immigration Forum, a group that has mobilized support for the bill. "Heritage has really become an outlier. The rest of the country is having a 21st-century conversation about immigration reform, and Heritage is caught in 1800. I really think their entire credibility is in question."Jim DeMint, the former South Carolina senator who resigned last year to become Heritage's president, has been trying to forge a role as a leader of the opposition to the immigration bill, much as he did in the Senate with some success when it last considered an overhaul in 2007. Fellow opponents quickly seized on Heritage's new study, and supporters of the bill, including Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, disputed it. A similar report by the group in 2007 is credited with helping to kill that overhaul attempt.The disclosure of the dissertation written by Dr. Richwine, who could not be reached for comment, threatened to undermine Heritage's push for influence even as the foundation distanced itself from Dr. Richwine's outside writing."This is not a work product of the Heritage Foundation," Mike Gonzalez, vice president of communications for the organization, wrote in an e-mail statement.In a blog post, Mr. Gonzalez added: "We welcome a rigorous, fact-based debate on the data, methodology and conclusions of the Heritage study on the cost of amnesty. Instead, some have pointed to a Harvard dissertation written by Dr. Jason Richwine."Senators piled on amendments Tuesday evening intended to remake — or in some cases thwart — the legislation. The amendments are the greatest test of the bill so far, with provisions from both Democratic supporters of an immigration overhaul and Republicans critics posing potential obstacles before the bill can move out of committee and onto the Senate floor.One of the most closely watched amendments came from Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont and chairman of the Judiciary Committee. He offered two separate amendments that would allow American citizens to seek a permanent resident visa, known as a green card, for a same-sex foreign partner.Under current law, Americans can gain a green card for a foreign spouse in a traditional marriage relatively easily, but cannot apply for a green card for a gay spouse or partner.The Republican senators in the bipartisan group that proposed the bill, two of whom sit on the committee, have warned repeatedly that any same-sex amendment would be a deal breaker for many Republicans and could sink the overhaul.Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, the ranking Republican on the committee, offered 77 amendments, and Senator Jeff Sessions, Republican of Alabama, offered 49. Mr. Sessions has been an outspoken critic of the bill, which he says would harm American workers, and an aide said two of the senator's amendments would address some of his concerns by capping the number of legal immigrants and foreign workers at 30 million over 10 years.Senator Mike Lee, Republican of Utah, offered an amendment that would more than double the number of visas offered to low-skilled workers under the bill, a provision that would upset an already delicate deal between the nation's leading business and labor communities. That agreement would ultimately cap the number at 200,000 annually; Mr. Lee's amendment would start the program at 200,000 and increase to 400,000.Mr. Rubio, a member of the bipartisan group, is not on the committee, but an aide said he was likely to support proposals to strengthen border security, including requiring double-layered fencing along the Southwest border, and to increase background checks for immigrants applying for legal status.At a private meeting Tuesday, Mr. Rubio told a group of conservatives that he expected any bill that reached President Obama's desk to be to the right of the current legislation, according to attendees.Senator Orrin G. Hatch, a Republican of Utah on the committee who is not a sponsor of the bill, offered 24 amendments, many intended to further expand the number of temporary visas, known as H-1Bs, and green cards for highly skilled immigrants in science, technology and engineering. Lawmakers from both parties on the committee will be closely watching those amendments, since Mr. Hatch has not yet declared whether he would support the overall bill and is regarded as a swing vote.Mr. Hatch "would like for the bill to get to a place where he can support it," said his spokesman, Matthew Harakal.
WASHINGTON — As the Senate Judiciary Committee began plowing through more than 300 amendments intended to reshape — and, in some cases, derail — legislation to overhaul the nation's immigration laws, signs of bipartisanship emerged Thursday, with the committee accepting at least eight Republican proposals to strengthen border security.Four of the bill's authors — Senators Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, the No. 2 Senate Democrat, and Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, along with Senators Jeff Flake of Arizona and Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, both Republicans — sit on the committee and had previously indicated that they would band together to vote against any amendments they saw as undermining the core of the bill. The legislation offers a path to citizenship for the 11 million undocumented immigrants already in the country, and implements stricter border security measures.At the same time, members of the bipartisan group — as well as Democrats on the committee — were eager to demonstrate that they were operating with an open mind and a willingness to accept Republican suggestions to improve security at the border. By Thursday afternoon, they were pointing to the eight approved Republican measures as a sign they had done just that, hoping to increase Republican backing for the bill.One amendment by Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, the ranking Republican on the committee, was approved with a voice vote and would require continuous surveillance of 100 percent of the United States border and 90 percent effectiveness of enforcement of the entire border. In the original bill, the 90 percent effectiveness rate applies only to high-risk sectors of the border.If border officials have not reached the surveillance and enforcement goals after five years, the bill creates a border commission to advise the Department of Homeland Security on how to reach its goals. Mr. Grassley's amendment makes it more likely that the commission would need to be established."We are going to make sure that we have border security first," Mr. Grassley said. "The legislation doesn't do it."But the bipartisan coalition also held firm and defeated an amendment by Mr. Grassley that would have required the Homeland Security secretary to certify that the southern border was secure for six months before any undocumented immigrants could receive legal status.Democrats on the committee felt that Mr. Grassley's measure had the potential to endlessly delay citizenship to the undocumented immigrants already in the country, and Mr. Flake and Mr. Graham — the Republican members of the bipartisan group who also sit on the committee — joined with the Democrats in voting it down, 12 to 6."This is our chance, in this hearing room, to write an immigration bill for the 21st century, for America and its future," Mr. Durbin said.Despite the generally congenial tone and the roughly two-dozen amendments, from both Democrats and Republicans, that ultimately passed, tempers were running high by the end of the day. Senator Ted Cruz, Republican of Texas, argued that, "The committee has voted down every serious border security amendment that has been presented here today."When Mr. Schumer said that Mr. Cruz simply did not want to accept any path to citizenship for undocumented immigrants already in the country — something Mr. Cruz has said, and has even filed an amendment to that end — Senator John Cornyn, Republican of Texas, accused Mr. Schumer of "impugning people's motives.""There's big holes in the underlying bill and we're trying to plug them," Mr. Cornyn said. "We're actually trying to be helpful."Thursday's sessions came as the American Conservative Union released a letter signed by more than two-dozen prominent conservatives throwing their support behind an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws."Conservatives are ready to support immigration reform, so long as it is pro-economic growth, strengthens families, fosters assimilation and prevents another wave of illegal immigration from happening again," the letter read.Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Vermont Democrat who leads the committee, has made plans for a marathon markup, as the process of considering amendments to legislation is known, that he said would likely last all month. In a move intended to head off criticism from opponents that the process is too rushed and not fully transparent, Mr. Leahy decided to make all the amendments available to the public by posting them on the committee's Web site on Tuesday night.Politically delicate amendments remain on both the Democratic and Republican sides, including two by Mr. Leahy that would allow United States citizens to seek a permanent resident visa, known as a green card, for a same-sex foreign partner — something they cannot do now.Asked about Mr. Leahy's amendments, which Republicans in the bipartisan group have said would doom the legislation, Mr. Schumer said he was nervous."This one is something, you know, I worry about all the time, even — I'm a good sleeper, but I wake up in the morning thinking of these things, sometimes early in the morning," he said. "And so how we resolve this remains to be seen."
WASHINGTON — A bipartisan group in the House of Representatives has been meeting on and off for four years behind closed doors, working on its own version of legislation to overhaul the nation's immigration laws . But with a comprehensive bill already making its way through the Senate Judiciary Committee, the House group is fast losing its chance to shape the debate percolating on Capitol Hill, let alone put forth a proposal of its own."I think a lot of us believed in this bipartisan group that we would have finished quite some time ago," said Representative Xavier Becerra, Democrat of California and a member of the group. "I think you really make it tough for yourself, and I hope House Republicans would agree with me on that, that you make it difficult to believe that you're for fixing the broken immigration system and getting our economy on track unless you really seriously try to start in May."Already, the House Judiciary Committee has begun introducing a series of bills pegged to certain parts of an immigration overhaul, in a move designed, in part, to press the bipartisan group to action.One major block, aides say, is reluctance on the part of Republicans in the group to accept a deal between the nation's leading business and labor organizations, which would establish a guest worker program, known as a W-Visa program, for low-skilled, year-round temporary workers, those who perform seasonal work but are allowed to stay in the country throughout the year.Though the U.S. Chamber of Commerce and the A.F.L.-C.I.O. reached an agreement in late March on a guest worker program, which was incorporated into legislation drafted by a similar bipartisan group in the Senate, House Republicans believe the deal is too favorable to labor and are trying to rework it. The current agreement starts the number of available W-Visas at 20,000, capping it at 200,000 visas annually, and limits the number of visas available to construction occupations at 15,000 annually.Democrats in the House group say there was an implicit agreement to accept whatever deal the business and labor groups agreed upon. But Republicans want to raise the overall cap, particularly on construction visas."From a 30,000-foot level, the concern is that construction is being treated differently than any other industry in the Senate bill," said Geoff Burr, the vice president for federal affairs at the Associated Builders & Contractors. "The 15,000 cap in the Senate bill is preposterous."Republicans and outside groups are pushing several options to increase the number of construction visas available: making those visas a percentage of the overall W-Visas, rather than imposing a hard cap; making it easier for employers who still face labor shortages after the quota is met to use a "safety valve" exemption to bring in more foreign workers; and creating a returning worker exemption, in which those workers are not counted under the cap.But Democrats in the group think that trying to modify the already delicate business-labor agreement could harm the overall bill."The moment you pull the thread from one side on this fabric, this compromise, the moment it gets undone on the other side," Mr. Becerra said.Labor organizations have publicly and privately indicated that they will not support any changes to the existing W-Visa program. "We can't accept any changes in the W-Visa program," said Tom Snyder, the A.F.L.-C.I.O.'s immigration campaign manager. "We spent many months working and reworking and carefully crafting this agreement with the Chamber of Commerce, and succeeded in getting it into the Senate bill, and we just won't accept changes."Whatever legislation does emerge from the Republican-controlled House, however, is expected to be more conservative than the Senate's approach. The House bill would offer a 15-year path to citizenship, rather than the 13-year path in the Senate plan, aides say. Both bills, however, would allow people in the country illegally to earn a green card in 10 years.Under the House plan, people would also be required, as part of their application progress for legal status, to sign an admission stating they had violated American immigration laws, aides said. That admission would lead to a probationary status, and if an immigrant was then found to violate the terms of probation, he or she would be subject to deportation.Conservative groups have been critical of the Senate bill's estimated costs. The Heritage Foundation issued a study estimating that the legislation would cost taxpayers roughly $6.3 trillion over the next 50 years, but members of both parties objected to it. The report also became a target when it was disclosed that the co-author, Jason Richwine, had written a doctoral dissertation in which he said immigrants' I.Q.'s should be considered when shaping policy. On Friday, Mr. Richwine, a senior policy analyst at the foundation, resigned.The Senate bipartisan group is eager for the House to produce legislation of its own — especially if it reflects principles in line with those already in the Senate plan."If the House eight of them came in with a bill very similar to ours, that would be helpful, and I would hope they could," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and a member of the Senate group.
SAN DIEGO — Opening a satellite city office in a far-flung neighborhood is not unusual in sprawling cities like this one. But one thing sets apart Mayor Bob Filner's newest outpost: it is in another country.When he opened San Diego's Tijuana office this year, Mr. Filner spoke in grand terms about the future of cross-border relations. "Dos ciudades, pero una region — we are two cities, but one region," he said, using the phrase popular among those who want more collaboration in the area. San Diego would put in a bid for the 2024 Summer Olympics, he said, but only to host jointly with Tijuana.For years, this coastal city was widely viewed as a hotbed of illegal immigration. Neighbors traded stories of migrants hiding in their garages and hopping through their backyards. But now the region is considered one of the safest parts of the Mexican border, and the number of apprehensions of people crossing illegally is a tiny fraction of what it was a decade ago.The changes have helped bring an astounding shift in residents' attitudes toward the border: far from seeing it as a threat, more are embracing it as a potential economic engine for the region. Perhaps one of the most remarkable things about Mr. Filner's efforts to bolster Tijuana is that there has been no opposition from other politicians or organized protests from conservative critics."We need to make the border the center, not the end — but the biggest problem we have is not security, it is openness and communication," Mr. Filner said in an interview in his City Hall office. "People have to understand that the infrastructure that we need should be an important part of any discussion on immigration. The volume here is so incredible, yet nobody understands how much this matters. People can't go back and forth, and we're losing out."Border security has been at the center of the debate on an immigration overhaul in Washington, with many lawmakers pushing for more security and fences at the border. The bipartisan group of eight senators who proposed sweeping changes have pointed to San Diego as the example of a secure border. But here, where a multimillion-dollar secondary fence was added a few years ago, many worry about the enormous economic cost of improving security that they feel is already too tight, not too loose.Mr. Filner and his supporters cite delays at the border crossings that frequently stretch to more than three hours as the prime example of the problems the region faces. They say that more crossing lanes and agents are needed to allow people to cross quickly, and that technology could allow inspections to be completed in seconds rather than minutes. A study by the San Diego Association of Governments estimated that the region loses more than $2 billion annually because of the waits."The political buzz made it so that there is a self-evident truth that the border was out of control, and that national stigma remains," said Paul Ganster, the director of the Institute for Regional Studies of the Californias at San Diego State University. "It might make people from Iowa feel better knowing that it takes hours to cross the border, but a better approach is to fix the border so it functions for legitimate purposes. Right now we're just penalizing ourselves with huge inefficiencies."While several former mayors have had warm relations with Tijuana officials, Mr. Filner has made cross-border relations a centerpiece of his administration, appointing a binational affairs director and mentioning Mexico at nearly every opportunity. In his inaugural speech, he congratulated the Tijuana soccer team, the Xolos, for winning the Mexican league title the day before, calling the team "our champions." And while the Olympic Committee has already rejected the cross-border bid, Mr. Filner is not deterred.He was elected last fall after serving for nearly two decades as the Democratic congressman representing a district that included all of California's Mexico border communities. In Congress, he routinely complained about the long lines at the border here, the busiest land crossing in the world.There are still signs that the longstanding ambivalence about the border here remains. While other American cities along the border have deep ties — or even a reliance — with Mexico, many here say San Diego residents mostly have their back to the border and give little thought to their southern neighbor. A recent survey by one local group found that less than 10 percent of residents believed that strengthening the border region should be a priority for improving the local economy. By some estimates, more than 60 percent of San Diego residents have never crossed the border."People here tend to think about ourselves as the edge of the Earth, as if there's nothing beyond the border," said Denise Moreno Ducheny, a former state senator and an analyst at the Trans-Border Institute at the University of San Diego. "When you see a place as poor, you can tell yourself it can be ignored or mistreated. But people are starting to understand that it is the front door for a lot of good things that we want to come our way."Mexico receives more exports from the United States than any country besides Canada, according to the North American Center for Transborder Studies at Arizona State University. At the Otay-Mesa crossing, a primarily commercial port of entry just eight miles east of the coast, some 3,000 trucks cross daily using two small local roads.While plans to expand the larger crossing to the west have been approved, the federal money has never been appropriated. The Mexican government completed a renovation on its side of the San Ysidro-Tijuana crossing, but the plans on the American side of the border have stalled, although President Obama included $226 million for the project in his proposed federal budget last month."The problem has always been getting others to listen to us," said Mayor Carlos Bustamante of Tijuana, who was born in California and attended the University of San Diego. "But we are an economic force now in a way that we were not a decade or two ago. It is in everyone's interest to take advantage of that."Many business leaders here say that marketing San Diego and Tijuana as one large region can help attract jobs and have encouraged manufacturers to move operations from China to Mexico. They mention the success of DJO, an orthopedic company based in Vista, just north of San Diego, with a factory in Tijuana. Over the last several years, the company has added hundreds of jobs on both sides of the border, and several executives work in Tijuana but live in San Diego.The commute also works the other way. Mario Lopez, Mr. Filner's binational affairs director, still owns a home in his native Tijuana and uses a border pass designed for frequent crossers.A poster of San Diego hangs prominently in Mr. Lopez's downtown office, meant to remind him of the popular image of the city: sailboats docked in a marina with the picturesque bay and sunny skies in the distance. Like the view from his City Hall window, there is no trace of the border in sight. He pointed to another photo, taken from the vantage point of the hills of Tijuana, which shows a sprawling metropolis on both sides of the border."That's what I have to get everyone to see," he said.
LOS ANGELES — As the head of the hotel workers' union here in the 1990s, Maria Elena Durazo negotiated a contract with provisions rarely seen by labor unions: The jobs of workers who were deported or lost authorization to work in the United States would be held open for two years, with the same pay.It was remarkable protection for the immigrant workers who made up the bulk of the union's membership — and it implicitly acknowledged that many of those immigrants were working without legal papers.In the years since, Ms. Durazo, 60, has become one of the most prominent labor leaders advocating an overhaul of the country's immigration policies. As the executive secretary-treasurer of the Los Angeles County Federation of Labor, she presides over what is widely perceived as the most successful group of unions in the country. While union membership is declining nationally, it is growing in California, and much of that growth can be attributed to Latino immigrants.And many believe immigrants offer the best potential for growth in a movement that is often viewed as foundering."You look around at who has the most difficult jobs, at who is doing the work we rely on every day, and it is immigrants," Ms. Durazo said in an interview here. "If we look at what we can do for them, what we can do together, we see that there can be very important rewards that will improve their lives. We cannot fix the prosperity of the rest of the country without improving the prosperity of immigrants."It is impossible to know just how many of the roughly 800,000 union members in Los Angeles are in the country illegally, often using fake Social Security numbers or other forged papers. But the county has an estimated 900,000 illegal immigrants, more than any other in the country, and according to the Center for the Study of Immigrant Integration at the University of Southern California they make up about 9 percent of the state's work force.The power of the heavily immigrant unions can be seen in huge protests in Los Angeles, as well as in the extensive voter outreach operations across the city. And while Ms. Durazo remains focused on the immigration debate in Congress, she is simultaneously marshaling her troops to help elect a new mayor here and prevent the sale of The Los Angeles Times to the conservative billionaires Charles G. Koch and David H. Koch.In the mayoral race, the unions have backed Wendy Greuel, the city controller, against Eric M. Garcetti, a city councilman, and have spent millions helping her. This week, the union mailed fliers suggesting that if Ms. Greuel was elected, the minimum wage would be raised to $15. Ms. Greuel has said she would support raising wages at the city's largest hotels to $15, but has not backed a citywide increase.Ms. Durazo has often enraged local business leaders, but successful campaigns to require a living wage in some of the city's hotels and to unionize carwash workers have earned her respect and devotion among many immigrants, who often line up to see her as she travels around the country."As the immigrant population starts to spread to other cities, you are going to see more and more attempts to recreate the kind of victories the unions have had here," said Peter Dreier, a professor at Occidental College who has studied unions at the local and national levels. He pointed to the successful campaigns by janitors in Texas and Florida as recent examples. "We see clearly that immigrants are willing to play a significant role in politics and that they are used to being part of a movement.""Los Angeles became the model and now Maria Elena is spreading the gospel," Dr. Dreier said.But critics of immigration reform take a far less charitable view, saying that the unions have failed to save jobs for American-born workers."They are simply searching for ways to make themselves relevant again," said Ira Mehlman of the Federation for American Immigration Reform, a group opposed to the immigration bill being discussed in the Senate. "Particularly in the large service industries, they are coming along to protect the people working in these jobs illegally."Ms. Durazo grew up as one of 11 children of Mexican immigrant farmworkers who traveled all over Central California to find jobs picking crops. She went to college and began work with unions and later got a law degree.In 1989, she took over as the head of the local chapter of the Hotel Employees and Restaurant Employees International Union after local leaders fought against providing Spanish translations of information for their members. At the time, some viewed her victory as a coup, while others saw it as an inevitable change because of the shifting demographics.Much of labor's success in Los Angeles is attributed to Ms. Durazo's husband, Miguel Contreras, who as the head of the county labor federation built a coalition of elected officials, clergy and civil rights advocates. In 2006, a year after his death, Ms. Durazo was elected to his post of executive secretary-treasurer, overseeing 350 unions, including government workers, teachers, janitors and security guards.Mr. Contreras, with help from Ms. Durazo and other labor leaders, had successfully begun recruiting new candidates for political office, including several Latinos who had long supported immigrant rights and labor unions, said Madeline Janis, the national policy director of Los Angeles Alliance for a New Economy, which she helped found with the support of Ms. Durazo in the 1990s."Unlike almost any other place, the leadership here realized that immigrants could get out and knock on doors and convince people to vote, even if they themselves were not eligible to do so," Ms. Janis said. "That really transformed California politics and was a precursor to what is happening nationally today."Many say Ms. Durazo helped make immigration a priority for unions nationally by framing the issue as an extension of the civil rights struggle. In 2003, she entered the national stage with the "Immigrant Workers Freedom Ride," stopping across the country to draw attention to the plight of illegal immigrants."There is now a collective understanding that what is happening to immigrant workers — the kinds of abuse and theft they experience every day — is just wrong," said Angelica Salas, the executive director of the Coalition for Human Immigrant Rights of Los Angeles. Ms. Salas said that workers' immigration status frequently thwarts the unions' efforts to organize new employees or improve conditions. "We hear all the time that people fear speaking out because they will be fired or deported."Eliseo Medina, the international secretary-treasurer of the Service Employees International Union, said unions' attitudes toward illegal immigrants had changed over the decades in part because more Latinos like him and Ms. Durazo have climbed through the ranks."Most of us are only one or two steps removed from a friend or a relative who is undocumented," Mr. Medina said. "We all understand that this is a much more of an entire community issue. When people started equating illegal with Latinos, it forced us to come together."While many say that immigration status often stops workers from unionizing, Mr. Medina said the efforts to organize low-wage workers here showed that many immigrants were "fearless.""Immigration and labor has become so integrated, because in order to organize workers you are going to have to deal with immigrant rights," said Victor Narro of the Labor Center at the University of California, Los Angeles. "Immigrants are really the source of optimism for the labor movement."
A labor union representing 12,000 federal officers who issue immigration documents will join forces on Monday with the union representing deportation agents to publicly oppose a bill overhauling the immigration system that is making its way through the Senate, arguing that the legislation would weaken public safety.The two unions represent a total of 20,000 employees in the Department of Homeland Security who would play a central role in carrying out the ambitious legislation, either by reviewing applications from millions of immigrants who could gain new legal status through the bill or by expelling illegal immigrants who did not qualify.A letter to Congress that excoriates the Senate proposal, and that the immigration officers' union signed for the first time, reveals simmering unrest among Homeland Security employees, who have been asked to carry out broad and fast-paced immigration policy shifts by the Obama administration. Deportation agents have been instructed to focus heavily on removing serious criminal offenders, while immigration officers have been urged to accelerate their decisions on granting legal papers and reprieves from deportation.The criticism of the bill from inside the system gives new political fuel to its most staunch opponents — among them Senator Jeff Sessions, Republican of Alabama — when they had been battling on the defensive.The labor alliance also raises the influence of the federal officer who leads the union that represents most deportation agents, the National Immigration and Customs Enforcement Council. The officer, Chris Crane, has emerged as a star witness for the opposition to the overhaul and a troublesome adversary for Obama administration officials working to promote it.Mr. Crane first wrote to Congress on May 9, saying the Senate bill was tailored to meet the demands of "special interests," and calling it "a dramatic step in the wrong direction" on public safety and interior enforcement. He said the proposal would give administration officials too much discretion in choosing which immigration laws to enforce. Mr. Sessions helped circulate Mr. Crane's letter.In a statement that the unions expected to release Monday — but that was given to some reporters on Sunday — Kenneth Palinkas, president of the National Citizenship and Immigration Services Council, said he had added his signature to Mr. Crane's letter. Mr. Palinkas, whose union represents 12,000 employees of the agency that approves documents, said the officers had been "pressured to rubber stamp applications instead of conducting diligent case review and investigation."Support from another immigration union considerably strengthens Mr. Crane's hand. Up to now, his law enforcement allies had been far outnumbered by groups that rallied behind the Senate bill and the White House. Also, Mr. Crane does not represent the more than 8,000 Immigration and Customs Enforcement agents who handle criminal investigations, hunting down human traffickers and drug smugglers. They have much smoother relations with the administration.Mr. Crane has testified repeatedly this year in Capitol Hill hearings, mostly invited by conservative Republicans who reject any measure that would offer a path to citizenship to illegal immigrants. Although his delivery is measured and cool, Mr. Crane's message is invariably scorching: he says the Obama administration has pandered to groups that advocate for those immigrants while hobbling the agents he represents, preventing them from doing their work.Opponents of the bill, written by a bipartisan group of eight senators, are increasingly relying on Mr. Crane to bolster their case. Last week, another pillar of conservative resistance, the Heritage Foundation, was badly weakened when many Republicans dismissed a study it published on the bill's costs. One author of the study, Jason Richwine, resigned under criticism of his past writings asserting that some immigrants had lower intelligence. Many conservative talk radio hosts are softening on the legislation.But Mr. Crane is not holding any of his fire. At a hearing in February, he spoke shortly after his top boss, the secretary of homeland security, Janet Napolitano. He accused her point blank of running a department afflicted with "gross mismanagement and overall corruption."In April, Mr. Crane strode into the news conference where the eight senators who wrote the bill presented it to the public for the first time. He repeatedly raised his hand and asked the senators to "take a question from law enforcement." Federal marshals finally stepped forward to march him out of the room.With debate on the bill moving quickly in the Senate, Mr. Crane's broadside attacks are a vexing irritant to administration officials, who argue that the time is right for Congress to offer a path to citizenship to millions of illegal immigrants because enforcement is stronger than ever. Claiming the authority of agents in the trenches, Mr. Crane depicts an almost opposite reality.The sweeping Senate bill would offer legal status and eventually citizenship for an estimated 11 million illegal immigrants, tighten border security, and speed visa reviews for more than four million immigrants who have applied legally and are waiting in backlogs.Homeland Security officials vehemently dispute Mr. Crane's view of their enforcement record, saying he has used the guise of labor advocacy to pursue his own political agenda, aligning squarely with the most right-wing opponents of the overhaul. They point to official figures showing that the Obama administration has deported more than 1.4 million immigrants.Last week, Latino and labor organizations called on President Obama to suspend most deportations, protesting that thousands of people from their communities are still being expelled each week.In an interview in Salt Lake City, where he is based, Mr. Crane dismissed those groups as simply mistaken. "This department under this administration is doing anything and everything they can not to arrest any alien in the interior of the United States," he contended.Up to now, Mr. Crane had managed to speak loudly from a small platform. His national council represents about 7,700 of the 20,000 employees of Immigration and Customs Enforcement. Mr. Crane, who joined the agency 10 years ago after two tours of duty in the Marine Corps, was elected to a second term as union president in August.
HONG KONG — The Boston Marathon bombings last month hit the home of some of the world's greatest universities. As the terror and violence played out in America's education and research hub, each twist and turn seemed to touch on the very campuses that draw the best and brightest from across the globe.Lu Lingzi, a graduate student at Boston University who was originally from the Chinese rust-belt city of Shenyang, was one of the three victims killed by the bombs. Her death was front-page news across China and drew condolences from President Xi Jinping, whose daughter had studied at Harvard.Meanwhile, the University of Massachusetts, Dartmouth, unknowingly played host to one of the suspects, Dzhokhar Tsarnaev. With what was described as an almost eerie sense of normalcy, the student reportedly spent the day after the bombing on school grounds: He worked out at a campus gym and ate at a dormitory grill.Once the two suspects began their frantic flight from the authorities, the violence extended to the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, where a campus police officer was shot and killed. A carjacking victim, forced to drive the suspects around, was a Chinese citizen who had moved to Boston for graduate studies at Northeastern University and had since become an entrepreneur, according to his interview with The Boston Globe.Growing concern about student safety in the United States long predates the Boston bombings. Mass school shootings — like the one by a Korean-American student that killed 32 at Virginia Tech in 2007, or the massacre that left 20 children and 6 teachers dead at a Connecticut elementary school this past December — have shocked the public both inside and outside the United States.David Qin, a co-founder of Paladin Learning, a Shanghai company that provides counseling to students who want to study in the United States, said that parents who had children bound for Boston-area universities called for advice after they heard of the bombings."A lot of the parents are talking to me about this kind of accident in Boston," Mr. Qin said. "They are concerned about the safety level. More and more are asking about this."He cited previous cases that have unnerved Chinese parents, particularly a carjacking last year that resulted in the shooting deaths of two Chinese students attending the University of Southern California. In February, a Los Angeles judge dismissed a wrongful death lawsuit filed by the victims' parents, who said they were misled by claims that the university was one of the safest in the United States, The Los Angeles Times reported."They are concerned about the safety level of universities," Mr. Qin said. "They don't want their kids to own guns. There are no gun shooting issues in Shanghai. They don't want their kids to buy guns in the future."The day of the Boston Marathon, before the attacks began, Secretary of State John Kerry addressed the issue of student safety during a visit to the U.S. Embassy in Tokyo."We had an interesting discussion about why fewer students are coming to — particularly from Japan — to study in the United States, and one of the responses I got from our officials, from conversations with parents here, is that they're actually scared," Mr. Kerry told CNN. "They think they are not safe in the United States, and so they don't come.""Apart from the international recognition of qualifications, safety is the students' primary concern," said Adrian Mitchell, head of research for Hobsons, a London company that tracks education trends, summarizing a recent report it produced. "If you couple this with the fact that the survey found parents to be the No. 1 influence on where a student chooses to go to university, then safety and the work that universities do to ensure international students are safe while studying holds even more weight."Mr. Mitchell warned that U.S. universities needed to ensure that they were perceived as being safe. Otherwise, international students might "look towards the U.K. and even Canada and Australia as an alternative," he said.Education Intelligence, the research arm of the British Council, has tracked growing concern about student safety worldwide. In 2007, students ranked "safe country to live in" as the 17th most important concern out of 19 categories; in 2012, safety became the 5th most important concern, according to surveys with 160,000 students over five years. Polled students rated Britain as the "safest place to live in when studying overseas," followed by Canada and the United States.Still, U.S. schools seem to be more popular than ever. According to the Institute of International Education's Open Doors report, the number of foreign students in the United States has been on an upward trajectory for the last decade, rising from 582,996 in the 2001-2 academic year to hit a record high of 764,495 in 2011-12. This increase is part of a broader trend of students crossing borders all over the world. The number of globally mobile students increased from 2.1 million in 2002 to 3.4 million in 2009, according to Unesco.There is little statistical evidence that U.S. school shootings or other acts of violence have dented enrollment figures. If the Boston bombings have any impact on those numbers, it will not show up in statistics for at least another year.The International Student Barometer by i-Graduate, an education consultancy, said that 82 percent of polled international students in the United States felt "safe and secure." The survey of more than 18,000 students at 21 U.S. colleges and universities was performed in autumn 2012, a few months after James Holmes, a doctoral student at the University of Colorado, shot 12 people at an Aurora, Colorado, movie theater.William Lawton, director of the Observatory on Borderless Higher Education, a British research group, said that security concerns were not unique to the United States."There is anecdotal evidence that interest in studying in Britain dipped after the London riots," he said, referring to violent clashes with the police in 2011. "There is hard evidence that attacks on Indian kids in Melbourne in 2009 or 2010 hurt recruitment from India until just this year."
TUCSON — In the Pima County Medical Examiner's Office here — repository of the nation's largest collection of missing-person reports for immigrants who have vanished while crossing the United States-Mexico border — 774 sets of remains awaited identification in mid-May, stored in musty body bags coated in dust.For the family of Andrés Valenzuela Cota, the remains represent a chance to turn the page on a sad chapter of family history. Mr. Cota was 45 when he disappeared on July 15, 2011, after calling a niece in Los Angeles and asking her to send $100 to a Western Union office in Cananea, Mexico, a staging point for smugglers bringing migrants through Arizona.As Congress debates the most sweeping changes to the country's immigration system in decades, the remains stored here are also a nagging reminder of the complicated variables of the border-security equation. The number of migrant apprehensions declined precipitously in recent years, one of the strongest indicators that fewer people have tried to cross the border illegally. But the number of migrant deaths has remained high."Less people are coming across," said Bruce Anderson, the chief forensic anthropologist at the medical examiner's office, "but a greater fraction of them are dying."There were 463 deaths in the past fiscal year, which ended Sept. 30 — the equivalent of about five migrants dying every four days, according to an analysis by the Washington Office on Latin America, a human rights group. In the time federal statistics have been compiled, only 2005 had more deaths, and in that year, there were more than three times as many apprehensions.As security at the border has tightened, pushing migrants to seek more remote and dangerous routes, the largest number of the deaths last year occurred along the punishing stretch of desert that spans the southernmost tip of the Border Patrol's Tucson sector, the busiest along the border.The only riskier stretch is the Rio Grande Valley sector in Texas, where, from Oct. 1 to April 30, law enforcement officers or ranchers found the bodies of 77 immigrants, or more than half the number of bodies recovered there in all of the past fiscal year: 150.In that sector, the most deaths have occurred in Brooks County, small and struggling at 944 square miles, where the average household income is $25,000. The number of migrant remains recovered is on pace to double that of last year, a record for the county, at 129, said a county judge, Raul Ramirez. Most of the dead are believed to be from Central America, Judge Ramirez said.In Tucson, the medical examiner's office, which handles autopsies for the border counties in the Tucson sector — three of Arizona's four border counties — received 49 sets of remains from Jan. 1 to May 9, Dr. Anderson said. Each was assigned a number, then photographed, cataloged, weighed and measured. Clothes, tattered by the elements and wildlife, were placed in plastic bags.For years, identification of the remains was elusive because there were so few clues. Few immigrants from impoverished rural communities could be traced with dental records. ID cards, found in pockets and backpacks, were unreliable because many were forgeries, bought by Central Americans to elude the authorities in Mexico, which the migrants had to cross illegally before reaching the United States.Assembling the remains, like linking a mandible that arrived in the office early this spring to a set of remains that was missing one, is like solving a grisly puzzle. It requires manually searching the color-coded paper case files lining the walls in Dr. Anderson's office: one shelf for cases from the late 1990s, when there were few, and the rest for the more than 2,100 deaths since 2001."The cause and manner of death is easy: it's either there or it's undetermined," said Dr. Gregory L. Hess, chief medical examiner in Pima County. "It's what goes on in trying to identify the person that can take a long time."Early this month, the office unveiled a computerized mapping database bearing the records of 1,826 migrants who died in the desert, listing GPS coordinates for where they were found and, if known, their sex, age and cause of death. It gives the public the first comprehensive glimpse of the complexity of the problem. Combined, the hundreds of red dots that represent people who died of exposure to the intense desert heat and cold, by far the most common among the causes of death, look like an unshapely bruise.The project began five years ago, through a partnership with Humane Borders, a nonprofit group that had already been plotting the deaths. An anonymous donor provided $175,000 to develop the database.
WASHINGTON — As proponents of a new immigration overhaul cast about for a Republican ally to help give their bill an extra boost, they have focused on a 79-year-old lawmaker with new hipster glasses (from Costco), black Nike sneakers (for his bad arches) and, perhaps most important, a deep and complicated relationship with immigration policy: Senator Orrin G. Hatch of Utah.Members of the bipartisan group of eight senators who drafted an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws see Mr. Hatch as a potentially influential partner. He was an original co-sponsor of the Dream Act for younger immigrants and has shown a willingness to embrace other immigration legislation as well. Though he ran to the right during a primary challenge in the 2012 election, they believe he might be brought back into the fold now that he is safely ensconced in his seventh Senate term."Senator Hatch is somebody who understands these issues well, has a long history, and it would very valuable to have him support our bill, both in committee and on the floor," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and a member of the bipartisan group, who also sits on the Judiciary Committee with Mr. Hatch.In an effort to increase Mr. Hatch's investment in the legislation, Mr. Schumer and other members of the bipartisan group on Monday threw their support behind a Hatch initiative to begin collecting biometric information like fingerprints at airports to register immigrants when they leave the country.With the exception of two Republican members of the bipartisan group who also sit on the Judiciary Committee — Senators Jeff Flake of Arizona and Lindsey Graham of South Carolina — Mr. Hatch is considered the other Republican member most likely to support the bill, which would give it some conservative gravitas as it heads to the Senate floor.The bipartisan group is hoping for a large Senate vote in support of the bill — some members have suggested as many as 70 votes — to place pressure on House Republicans to also get behind the legislation. And Mr. Hatch's "yes" vote is seen as a driver for what they hope will be a groundswell of support. Mr. Hatch, who hails from a state with a dynamic immigration culture, meanwhile finds himself with a final chance to help pass a broad immigration overhaul, something in which he has both publicly and privately expressed a genuine interest.But Mr. Hatch's "yes" vote in committee comes with a major caveat — the acceptance of provisions of his that would, among other things, help technology companies by increasing the number of temporary visas available for high-skilled workers (known as H-1B visas) and ease restrictions around the hiring and firing of workers. He also is offering some provisions on the finance side, including one that would require immigrants to show they have paid back taxes and are staying current with them as they proceed toward legal status."I personally believe we need immigration reform," said Mr. Hatch, adding that his tweaks to the bill are "amendments that clean it up and make it a better bill, and may even be able to get it more votes." The provisions are also, he explained, an all-but-ironclad requirement for earning his vote: "They know my point is I've got to have those," he said, referring to the message he has communicated to the group.And so last week, as the committee met twice to discuss the bill publicly, the behind-the-scenes negotiating and arm-twisting picked up in earnest, with Mr. Schumer's office taking the lead in trying to work out an agreement with Mr. Hatch."He's made it clear that having his support will be dependent on the committee accepting his proposals to improve the bill," said Alex Conant, a spokesman for Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, one of the Republican authors. "We think accepting his improvements and having his support is critical to getting the broad Republican support we want."A particular source of tension is Senator Richard J. Durbin of Illinois, the No. 2 Senate Democrat and another member of the bipartisan group, who opposes many of Mr. Hatch's amendments because he thinks they would hurt American workers."Some of them are absolutely unacceptable," Mr. Durbin said. "What he wants to do is make it easier for firms seeking H-1B visas not to hire Americans."Still, Mr. Durbin acknowledged the delicate political realities: "We want all the support we can get, but if the price of support of any Republican member is for us to turn this carefully crafted, politically balanced deal on its head, it's not worth it."
Department of Homeland Security officials, responding to sharp criticism on Monday from a union representing 12,000 of its employees, said they had added many safeguards in recent years to protect against fraud and security violations by foreigners seeking to live in the United States.The officials reacted swiftly to a statement by Kenneth Palinkas, president of the National Citizenship and Immigration Services Council, in which he called on lawmakers to reject an immigration bill before the Senate, saying security procedures were weak for checking the backgrounds of millions of immigrants who would apply for immigration documents under the legislation.Mr. Palinkas said he was adding his signature to a letter to Congress from a separate union that represents 7,700 federal deportation agents, which charged that the Senate bill would be a "significant barrier to the creation of a safe and lawful system of immigration."If the legislation passes, the immigration officers in Mr. Palinkas's union will be central to carrying it out. They would review applications for provisional legal status from an estimated 11 million illegal immigrants, as well as for millions of green cards and other immigration documents.Administration officials rallied on Monday to dispute any contention that they had been lax on immigration security, and also to fend off any new opposition arising to the Senate bill, which President Obama strongly supports.In his statement, Mr. Palinkas said immigration officers had been rushed into approving applications, with officials discouraging them from "proper investigation into red flags."The citizenship agency "has been turned into an approval machine," Mr. Palinkas said.He said a program started last year by Mr. Obama to give deportation reprieves to young undocumented immigrants had an approval rate of 99.5 percent. "Practices were put in place to stop proper screening and enforcement," he said.In a telephone interview, Mr. Palinkas said many agency employees felt they had been slighted by top officials, who paid more attention to the demands of immigrant advocate organizations."There is a sense of entitlement among the interest groups," Mr. Palinkas said. "They expect to get what they seek."Homeland Security officials said that accusations of a "rush to yes" by the employees of the citizenship agency long predated the Obama administration. The agency created an antifraud unit in 2010 to increase the number and scope of reviews of immigrants applying for documents, the officials said, with the number of antifraud officers increasing by 20 percent since then. The agency greatly expanded requirements for screenings based on fingerprints and other biometric information, the officials said.Rather than press for more approvals, the agency has scrutinized employees' decisions to make sure they were consistent with the law, officials said, and set priorities allowing officers to focus on detecting immigrants who might be security threats.Approval rates were high in the youth program, officials argued, because many young undocumented immigrants who were not likely to qualify either did not come forward to apply or withdrew when their applications were questioned by the agency."Reverting back to a system that treats violent criminals the same as children brought to this country through no fault of their own would only undermine the integrity of the immigration system and force law enforcement agencies to divert limited resources from focusing on those who pose real threats to their communities," said Peter Boogaard, a spokesman for the Department of Homeland Security.The bill by a bipartisan group of eight senators is moving through the Senate Judiciary Committee, where lawmakers on Monday continued voting on some 300 amendments. So far, opponents have gained little traction, although the committee has adopted several amendments, mainly by Republicans, to strengthen security provisions.The letters from the immigration officers' unions was quickly circulated by Senator Jeff Sessions of Alabama, a Republican who staunchly opposes the bill.
WASHINGTON — The Senate Judiciary Committee on Tuesday approved a broad overhaul of the nation's immigration laws on a bipartisan vote, sending the most significant immigration policy changes in decades to the full Senate, where the debate is expected to begin next month.The 13-to-5 vote came as the committee reached a deal on one of the final snags threatening the legislation — and agreed to hold off on a particularly politically charged amendment, which would have added protections for same-sex couples.After intense behind-the-scenes negotiations, Senator Orrin G. Hatch, Republican of Utah, struck an agreement with the group of eight senators who drafted the original bill to address his concerns about visas for skilled foreign workers who could fill jobs in the high-tech industry.By late afternoon on Tuesday, Mr. Hatch had said that he would support the bill out of committee, if not necessarily on the Senate floor, after the committee agreed, via a voice vote, to pass his amendment."I'm going to vote this bill out of committee because I've committed to do that," Mr. Hatch said.Authors of the legislation hoped for a strong vote out of committee to help the bill as it heads to the Senate floor. Mr. Hatch's support could help persuade other conservative Republicans to back the bill. He was joined in his "yes" vote by Senators Jeff Flake of Arizona and Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, both Republican members of the bipartisan group.The most emotional part of the committee process, which stretched over five days and 301 amendments, came late Tuesday, when Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Vermont Democrat who leads the committee, said that he would not offer an amendment allowing United States citizens to apply for permanent resident status, known as a green card, on behalf of their same-sex partners.Mr. Leahy, according to immigration and gay rights advocates, was under pressure from the White House not to offer this amendment. Though both President Obama and Democrats in the bipartisan group support protections for same-sex couples in the bill, Republicans in the group have warned that such provisions would lead them to abandon the legislation.Before Mr. Leahy announced his decision, Democratic senators, all of whom personally supported the provision, engaged in a lengthy and agonizing debate.Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and an author of the measure, said that not including the provision amounted to "rank discrimination." But he ultimately concluded, "As much as it pains me, I cannot support this amendment if it will bring down the bill."Similarly, Senator Al Franken, Democrat of Minnesota, said: "This is the definition of a Hobson's choice. In my bones, I believe in equality."But Mr. Graham reflected the view of his Republican colleagues when he said: "You've got me on immigration. You don't have me on marriage. If you want to keep me on immigration, let's stay on immigration."Ultimately, Mr. Leahy withheld his amendment "with a heavy heart," though he can still bring it up on the Senate floor.Mr. Hatch's amendment, which reflects the compromise he reached after lengthy negotiations led by Mr. Schumer, raises the minimum number of visas annually for high-skilled foreign workers — known as H-1B visas — to 115,000, from 110,000 in the bill, while keeping the maximum at 180,000 a year. More important, aides to Mr. Hatch said, his provision includes a mechanism based on conditions in the labor market, intended to ensure that companies based in the United States can bring in qualified foreign workers when jobs are not filled by Americans, but decreases visas when they are.His provision would also make it easier for employers to hire foreign workers, because it lightens the burden on them to demonstrate that they first tried to hire a qualified American worker.
WASHINGTON — After its solid bipartisan approval in committee, broad legislation to overhaul the nation's immigration laws was headed Wednesday to the Senate floor, where supporters of the plan were already mobilizing to bring more Republicans on board by focusing on strengthening border security provisions in the bill.The push to expand Republican support poses new challenges for the bipartisan group of eight senators who drafted the original bill, as it puts pressure on Latino and other major immigration advocacy groups to make concessions on border security. Democrats and pro-immigration organizations fear that further changing the delicate border compromise could indefinitely delay legal status for 11 million immigrants already in the country — one of the key components of the bill.Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida and a co-author of the bill who took the lead in selling it to fellow Republicans and conservative activists, is likely to become an even more visible figure, crucial to marshaling conservative support behind the immigration changes. Mr. Rubio was mainly on the sidelines during the Judiciary Committee debate because he is not a member of that panel.Mr. Rubio has said he hopes to further strengthen border security "triggers" during the Senate floor debate in June. The current bill sets up a sequence of new border measures that must be in place before illegal immigrants can gain legal status and eventually citizenship. Under the current bill, the Department of Homeland Security is directed to produce and carry out the border security plan, with as much as $6.5 billion for technology, fencing and border agents.An aide to Mr. Rubio said he was working to offer an amendment — either on his own, or with a fellow Republican — that would take the authority away from the department and move the responsibility to Congress.This week, Mr. Rubio met with border security and law enforcement officials to get their views on strengthening border provisions, and a Fox News immigration town-hall-style meeting he taped with Sean Hannity is expected to be broadcast on Friday.After more than 300 amendments were weighed, the bill emerged from the Judiciary Committee with the central provisions largely intact for a 13-year path to citizenship for illegal immigrants, only recently viewed as the most vulnerable piece of the bill. The committee on Tuesday easily defeated an amendment by Senator Ted Cruz, Republican of Texas, to eliminate the chance for citizenship.Democrats in the bipartisan group made it clear they would fight to defend that pathway, a central piece in the complex equation of the bill."If we don't have a path to citizenship, there is no reform," Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York, a Democrat and an author of the bill, told Mr. Cruz during the debate. After the vote, Mr. Schumer, foreseeing the debate to come, said, "The only bottom line I've always had, and I think the Democrats have had, is we have to make sure the trigger is achievable  and concrete."Mr. Schumer said after the committee vote that he hoped to be "lucky enough" to get 70 votes in the Senate. Lawmakers predicted the vote would come in late June.Democrats will also have to work to assuage an influential group of allies: gay advocates, who were furious when a provision they supported was left out of the legislation. After a deliberation he described as agonizing, Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Democrat from Vermont who is chairman of the Judiciary Committee, withheld his amendment that would have allowed American citizens to apply for permanent resident status — a document known as a green card — for their same-sex partners.Gay rights advocates focused their ire on Wednesday on several Democrats on the committee who had urged Mr. Leahy not to go forward with his amendment — particularly Mr. Schumer, Richard J. Durbin of Illinois and Dianne Feinstein of California — after the bill's Republican sponsors had said the measure would cause them to bolt."It is going to be rough going on the Senate floor, and when the Democrats did not speak up for gays, they made it clear they will fold under pressure," said Rachel B. Tiven, executive director of Immigration Equality. She said gay activists would press for an amendment to be added during debate on the Senate floor.The Democratic lawmakers said they hoped some pressure would be lifted when the Supreme Court issues its ruling, expected in late June, on a federal law that describes marriage as between a man and a woman.In the Democrat-controlled committee, conservative opponents made little headway on altering the bill.Senator Jeff Sessions, Republican of Alabama, tenaciously assailed the measure, offering 15 amendments, to cut back drastically the number of immigrants over all who could come to the country and to expand the role of local police enforcement. Only two of Mr. Sessions's amendments passed, and at times he appeared isolated even among the other conservatives on the committee.Conservatives had announced a national day of action on Wednesday, and many dozens of conservative leaders signed a letter denouncing the bill as a costly bureaucratic juggernaut, comparing it to President Obama's health care overhaul. But so far conservatives have not been able to generate the level of public outcry against the immigration overhaul they achieved in 2007.In the Republican-controlled House, Republican leaders were leaving several options open. A bipartisan group is also working in the House and has said it will introduce a bill by early June. But on Wednesday Representative Robert W. Goodlatte, a Virginia Republican and chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, held a hearing to examine the Senate bill, which he opened with a blunt rejection of its security provisions. Mr. Goodlatte echoed the call from Mr. Rubio for big changes in the border plans."Whether or not it contains triggers, the Senate bill is unlikely to secure the border," Mr. Goodlatte said. "It requires D.H.S. to simply submit a border security plan to initiate the legalization of 11 million unlawful immigrants."Even opponents of the bipartisan bill are part of a consensus among many members of Congress that the nation's immigration laws do need to be revamped. Before the vote in committee Tuesday night, both Senators John Cornyn, Republican of Texas, and Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa, acknowledged as much, saying that while they could not yet support the bill, they believed it deserved a full debate on the floor."I believe it's important to get the bill on the floor, and we can work together to try and improve it and make it as good as it can possibly be," Mr. Cornyn said.
FRESNO, Calif. — Like Scotch broom and dandelions, despair can be invasive. This is why, every Monday, Lee Lee, a Hmong refugee, puts on her sun hat and flip-flops, grabs the hoe handmade by her father and brother in Laos and heads to the Hmong Village Community Garden here, where she tends rows of purple lemon grass, bitter melon and medicinal herbs along with other Hmong women."It lightens the load," said Ms. Lee, whose depression has led her to think about suicide. "It brings peace, so I do not forget who I am."The garden, on the scraggly outskirts of town, is one of seven in Fresno created for immigrants, refugees and residents of impoverished neighborhoods with mental health money from the state. At the Slavic Community Garden, Ukrainian refugees persecuted for their religious beliefs in the Soviet Union now grow black currants for jam, dill for pickles and soups, and medicinal calendula flowers from Ukrainian seeds.The thinking of community leaders and health professionals is that gardens can help foster resiliency and a sense of purpose for refugees, especially older ones, who are often isolated by language and poverty and experiencing depression and post-traumatic stress. Immigrant families often struggle to meet insurance co-payments, and culturally attuned therapists are in short supply.The budget, about $171,000 a year for construction and maintenance of the community gardens and adjoining meeting spaces here, is made possible by the California Mental Health Services Act of 2004, which put a 1 percent tax on personal income of $1 million a year or more.Spending state money this way has been controversial, with some advocates for those with mental illnesss arguing that gardens are an unaffordable frill in an era of diminishing resources. From 1995 to 2008, the state cut $700 million a year in core mental health services like psychiatric facilities."Should they be a priority when there is no evidence of how many seriously mentally ill are served?" asked Curtis A. Thornton, a member of the Fresno County Mental Health Advisory Board.The one-fourth of the tax proceeds that is designated for prevention, early intervention and innovative approaches to care finances a range of roughly 400 projects throughout the state.Many immigrant and refugee cultures do not have a tradition of formal mental health treatment, said Rocco Cheng, a psychologist and a director of the California Reducing Disparities Project, a statewide policy study. "Therapy is a Western concept," he said. "The Hmong do not have a word for mental illness." But, he said, they are well able to grasp the idea of mental, physical, spiritual and emotional wellness.On a recent morning, Yer Vang, 53, sang a plaintive song about loneliness as she worked her rows of "zab zi liab," a medicinal plant used to treat high blood pressure. Across the way, Mee Yang, a 65-year-old shaman, weeded long beans beside makeshift scarecrows made of rows of T-shirts slung over a wire. She said she suffered from diabetes and depression and worried about making ends meet (about 45 percent of Hmong children in Fresno County live in poverty, according to a recent report by the Asian Pacific American Legal Center and the Asian Law Caucus)."This is my happiness," Mrs. Yang said of the garden. "You feel the world in this place, and it brings you back home."Four of the seven gardens are dedicated to Southeast Asians, many of whom were subsistence farmers in their homelands. The Hmong garden was established two years ago by the Fresno Center for New Americans, a nonprofit refugee organization. During the Vietnam War, many Hmong experienced rape, starvation and the murder of family members. Mrs. Yang survived by eating longleaf jungle plants, "the kind Americans put in the mall to decorate," she said.Ghia Xiong, a psychologist with the center, is willing to meet clients on their own turf. He consults with the gardeners over a shovel instead of in an office. He said the garden "de-stigmatizes" mental health treatment by providing a safe place to talk. "Many Hmong have been in refugee camps, where there was fear and intimidation," he said. "Then they get to America and it's 'O.K., open up.' "Neng Yang, an outreach specialist with the center, said, "Sometimes you'll drop by and see three or four ladies crying together, rain or shine."
WASHINGTON — These are hectic days for the federal deportation officer who has made it his single-minded mission to stop a bipartisan bill to overhaul the immigration system that is making its way through the Senate.The officer, Chris Crane, heads the union of immigration enforcement agents. Obama administration officials become exasperated at the mere mention of his name.Recently, Mr. Crane testified about the bill in the House Judiciary Committee, securing his record as the most frequent witness on Capitol Hill during this year's immigration debate and the favorite expert of conservative critics of the Senate measure. Once again, his warnings were categorical and dire."Americans should understand that this legislation only guarantees legal status for illegal aliens, including serious criminals," Mr. Crane said. "It contains no promise of solving our nation's immigration problems."Mr. Crane also sat down with Senator Marco Rubio of Florida, a Republican who helped write the bill, offering a sweeping critique of its security provisions. Then Mr. Crane starred at the news conference where Representative John Barrow of Georgia, a Democrat, presented his alternative bill on enforcement, which reflected many of Mr. Crane's demands for more immigration agents and less leeway for administration officials to decide how to deploy them.And the pace is picking up for Mr. Crane, even though his union, the National Immigration and Customs Enforcement Council, represents 7,700 of 20,000 employees of the immigration agency known as ICE.The Senate bill, having survived a barrage of hostile amendments in committee, is headed to the full Senate with momentum that has surprised even its supporters, driven by a coalition including Latinos, high-tech businesses, growers, labor federations and religious groups. It would create a 13-year path to citizenship for immigrants here illegally, strengthen border security and revamp legal immigration.Opponents, playing defense, increasingly argue that the bill is weak on enforcement and would allow a new wave of illegal immigration. Mr. Crane is the go-to guy to make that case.He says, in stark terms, that the Obama administration's performance could not be worse."Across the board, we're not doing law enforcement work," Mr. Crane said in a recent interview in Salt Lake City, where he is based. "It's very disturbing as an employee in general to see the Department of Homeland Security lie to the American people day in and day out about who we're arresting."He says that officials with Immigration and Customs Enforcement have exposed agents to danger from gang members in detention centers, and that they threatened to discipline agents for detaining illegal immigrants encountered on the street. To reinforce his points, he brought a lawsuit last year against Janet Napolitano, the secretary of homeland security. A decision from the Texas judge in that case is expected soon.Homeland Security officials said their enforcement record spoke for itself. Under the Obama administration, ICE has deported more than 1.4 million people, including increasing numbers of convicted criminals — 225,000 last year. Officials say Mr. Crane ignores the deportation numbers as part of a personal crusade to put a right-wing tilt on immigration policy, which they say is out of line with his duties as a law enforcement officer.Plain-spoken and camera-shy, Mr. Crane is an unlikely labor firebrand.He said he had grown up in conservative country in Wyoming and served two tours in the Marine Corps before joining ICE 10 years ago. He traced his bitter doubts about the agency to his early days there, when, he said, his first supervisor was frequently drunk on the job. He joined the union for protection from retaliation after he reported that manager, he said.Since then, morale among ICE employees has been sinking, he said, with Homeland Security ranking 279 out of 292 federal agencies in an annual federal government survey last year."Our managers are completely out of control," Mr. Crane said. He recalled an episode in 2009 in an ICE office in El Paso when two married agents said their baby had been born with medical problems because of work pressure and sexual harassment during the pregnancy.ICE agents protested on the female agent's behalf, Mr. Crane said. He broke into tears as he recounted the events.More recently, his feud with top ICE officials is over a policy instructing deportation officers to exercise prosecutorial discretion, deporting criminals rather than immigrants whose only violation is being here illegally. Mr. Crane said many ICE agents found the policy, which was started two years ago, confusing and contrary to their mission. He waged a battle with ICE managers over when and how agents would be trained to carry it out."They are asking law enforcement officers to basically ignore their law books," Mr. Crane said. "For officers out in the field, we can't function like that. We have to have laws that are very clear, that aren't ambiguous, that we can confidently go out into the street and enforce."ICE officials strongly disputed many of Mr. Crane's statements. Brian Hale, an ICE spokesman, said that the episode in El Paso had been swiftly referred to the agency's inspector general and that top managers there had changed."Any suggestion that this allegation of local misconduct is in any way linked to the broader policy disagreements between the union and ICE management is incorrect and misleading," he said.Mr. Crane is in a minority in the immigration agency. Nearly 9,000 investigating agents in ICE are represented by a different organization, the Federal Law Enforcement Officers Association, and they do not agree with his approach."The union has a tendency to fire Scud missiles at the administration," said Andrew Rakowsky, the association's representative at ICE. "We work to find common ground."And Mr. Crane is in an even smaller minority among law enforcement leaders, with national associations of police chiefs and sheriffs rallying behind the White House to support the bill. He is also rowing against a flood tide in the labor movement, even though his local is affiliated with the A.F.L.-C.I.O. The federation has organized a nationwide campaign to push for the overhaul. Its leaders have also called on the Obama administration to halt almost all deportations while the legislation is being debated.
WASHINGTON — Lawmakers will return to the Capitol on Monday from a weeklong recess, facing a critical juncture on immigration legislation and controversies at the Internal Revenue Service and the Justice Department that will test Congress's ability to balance its twin responsibilities of legislating and investigating.For President Obama, how those competing priorities balance out could mean the difference between securing a landmark accomplishment — the first overhaul of the nation's immigration laws since 1986 — or becoming consumed by charges of scandal.Invigorated by the uproars, House Republicans are setting their sights more firmly this week on the I.R.S. and Mr. Obama's embattled attorney general. After weeks of trying to leaven the House's growing investigatory zeal with serious legislating, House leaders and committee chairmen appear to be giving themselves over to an expanding and aggressive oversight effort — on the I.R.S., the Justice Department's targeting of reporters, Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr.'s statements to Congress on that targeting and the Sept. 11 attack on the United States Mission in Benghazi, Libya.House leaders including Speaker John A. Boehner of Ohio have acknowledged the risk if voters see the investigations as driven primarily by politics. But with the legislative season moving toward the routine task of passing spending bills, oversight appears to be the biggest splash that the House hopes to make.The Senate, by contrast, plans to bring a sweeping immigration bill to the floor next Monday, with the goal of passage by July 4. The bill's bipartisan advocates express increasing confidence that they will have more than the 60 votes they will need."These so-called scandals have not diverted us one iota," Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, said Sunday on the NBC News program "Meet the Press."The White House plans to keep the president in the public eye, concentrating on kitchen-table issues like the economy and the carrying out of Mr. Obama's health care law as well as on high-profile foreign-policy efforts. The hope, officials say, is to prevent Congress from seizing a public agenda that has largely been set by Mr. Obama this year.Republican investigators over the weekend rolled out what they called more evidence of I.R.S. mismanagement, including new transcripts of interviews with unidentified lower-level employees suggesting that officials in Washington pushed to give conservative groups that were applying for tax-exempt status special scrutiny. A soon-to-be-released report by the Treasury Department's inspector general will also take the I.R.S. to task for spending tens of millions of dollars on conferences over two years.The reserved statements from lawmakers who over the past weeks withheld at least some judgment on the expanding probes seemed to give way Sunday to a much more accusatorial posture. Republicans pointed to new evidence that they said would extend the cloud of scandal into higher echelons of the Obama administration."As the last few weeks have demonstrated, Congressional oversight is not only a constitutional duty, but also a vitally important check and balance to the Obama administration," Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the majority leader, wrote in a memo to members. He added: "During June and the coming months, the House will continue to hold the administration accountable."Hearings before the House Ways and Means Committee on Tuesday and the House Oversight and Government Reform Committee on Thursday will open new fronts against the I.R.S. After allowing conservative groups to sound off about being targeted by the agency, the committees will examine its spending on conferences and entertainment between 2010 and 2012.During that span, the I.R.S. held at least 220 conferences, at a cost of $50 million, according to the audit by the Treasury inspector general, portions of which the oversight committee released.The committee's chairman, Representative Darrell Issa of California, let loose a volley of accusations on Sunday that seemed to end a brief period of restraint for him. He said Washington officials had known of the flagging of applicants for tax-exempt status but had covered it up during the presidential election and allowed groups that were "not a friend of the president to be disenfranchised through an election.""My gut tells me that too many people knew that this wrongdoing was going on before the election," he said Sunday on the CNN program "State of the Union."
AJO, Ariz. — On a recent morning, Lt. Bill Clements, commander of a remote sheriff's department substation here, sent his deputies into the sun-blasted Sonoran Desert to recover a body — the fifth in five days. Hours later, back at the station, a deputy unzipped a white body bag, revealing the corpse of a man who had died making the brutal crossing from Mexico, his lips shrunken, either with dehydration or from being partly eaten by wild animals, the deputies said.Out here, life expires suddenly and without dignity. The Ajo district station recovered 18 bodies last year. As of late May, the station had recovered eight, and the summer sun was still a few weeks away.In Ajo, where cactuses dot the horizon and blue hangs in the sky like a canopy, national drug and immigration policies meet desperation.The deputies here act as the tip of the sword. Their work is a routine of grinding boredom broken by blasts of grotesque reality. Drug seizures, domestic violence, arson and methamphetamine addictions are all part of what they confront on the job. And, of course, the bodies in the desert.The sheriff's department in the Ajo district of Pima County operates as a kind of self-sufficient outpost of the county sheriff's department in Tucson, some 140 miles east. Most shifts are covered by four staff members — two deputies, a corrections officer for the 21-bed jail and a 911 dispatcher — who are responsible for a brutal 3,000-square-mile stretch of terrain between the Arizona-Mexico border and Phoenix, 110 miles to the northeast.The Pima County Sheriff's Department collaborates with federal agencies like the Border Patrol, Customs and Border Protection, and the Fish and Wildlife Service. The alliance of agencies is called the Border Anti-Narcotics Network. The network made 440 drug seizures in the first quarter, netting 18,000 pounds of marijuana, according to Lieutenant Clements. That's 2,500 pounds more than the first quarter of last year.Lieutenant Clements attributed that to "increased technology and more officers in the field." Still, he said, there is no way to know how many illegal drug shipments are making their way northward, undetected.What does a law enforcement officer have to do to end up in a place like this? Some deputies out of the police academy, eager to make their mark and ascend department ranks, agree to serve three years in Ajo. Most leave after their required stint expires.Back in Tucson, a deputy who chose to put in his time at the desert outpost joked that he did so without realizing what he had signed up for. "Nobody told me I wasn't supposed to check the box," said the deputy, Jesus Bañuelos, who served three years in Ajo before becoming a spokesman for the sheriff's department.Despite its drawbacks, serving in Ajo is a rite of passage for young officers. Because of the small staff, officers often work their cases from beginning to end — making arrests, filing cases with the district attorney and presenting facts to the grand jury if needed, Deputy Bañuelos said.The deputies' primary responsibility is to cover the community — usually sticking to town unless called by Border Patrol or other federal agencies operating in the area. Ajo, an old copper mining town, has about 2,500 residents. A green tint runs down the mounded rock just outside town, a vestige of the mine, which closed in 1986."There's no industry here," said Deputy Brad Gill, adding that law enforcement agencies keep the community afloat. "This is a government town."Spanish colonial architecture rings the Ajo plaza. Throughout the town, tidy southwestern-style homes share a block with dilapidated ranch houses — some of which, deputies suspect, could be active drug spots.Small-town sensibilities mean knowing that the individuals whom deputies arrest for heroin today may well stand next to them in church tomorrow, Deputy Gill noted. He said it is hard to build rapport with the community if people assume the officers will soon move on, leaving Ajo and its problems behind.Since April, a serial arsonist has set three fires in town. Officers speculate the fires could be drug related, since a fire requires all deputies on duty to respond, creating a possible diversion for drug shipments to move unimpeded through town.
A Quick Catch-Up on Immigration Efforts: A brief tale of the journey made by the immigration bill that is set to hit the Senate floor this month.WASHINGTON — After seven months of steadily building momentum, the push for a comprehensive overhaul of the immigration system enters its most crucial phase this week in the Senate, where Republicans remain divided over how much to cooperate with President Obama as they try to repair their party's standing among Hispanic voters.Republican leaders are betting that passage of an 867-page bipartisan overhaul will halt the embarrassing erosion of support among Latinos last year that helped return Mr. Obama to the Oval Office. But the party's conservative activists are vowing opposition, dead set against anything linked to Mr. Obama and convinced that the immigration bill is nothing more than amnesty for lawbreakers.That intraparty clash will play out for the next three weeks on the Senate floor, as Republican supporters of the bill — aided behind the scenes by the Obama administration — seek modest changes that they hope will secure broad support among both parties. Senator Kelly Ayotte, Republican of New Hampshire, announced on Sunday on CBS's "Face the Nation" that she would support the immigration bill, calling it a "thoughtful bipartisan solution to a tough problem."At the same time, conservative Republican senators, led by Jeff Sessions of Alabama and Ted Cruz of Texas, are preparing an onslaught of amendments that threaten to unravel the carefully crafted compromise. Their goal is to defeat the bill altogether or, at the least, prevent it from providing a path to citizenship for the estimated 11 million immigrants who are in this country without authorization."It will definitely give amnesty today," Mr. Sessions said on Friday as the chamber prepared for the debate, which is scheduled to begin on Tuesday.The final vote in the Senate, which is set to come by the time senators leave for their Fourth of July break, could shape the future of the Republican Party and help determine the political strength of the conservative movement heading into next year's midterm elections.If all 54 Democratic senators vote for the bill, which is unlikely, supporters would need six Republicans to prevent a filibuster and pass the legislation.For the president, the passage of a bipartisan immigration bill would be a critical piece of his legacy, made even more important by the Republican defeat in April of the gun-control measures he was pushing. A failure to pass the immigration legislation would reignite anger among Mr. Obama's Latino supporters and raise questions about his ability to move an agenda forward in his final three and a half years in office.In his weekly radio address on Saturday, Mr. Obama urged Congress to give him a bill to sign by the end of the summer. "We know the opponents of reform are going to do everything they can to prevent that," he said. "They'll try to stoke fear and create division. They'll try to play politics with an issue that the vast majority of Americans want addressed. And if they succeed, we will lose this chance to finally fix an immigration system that is badly broken."The legislation, which would be the first major immigration overhaul since President Ronald Reagan backed amnesty for illegal immigrants in 1986, was drafted over the last several months by the so-called Gang of Eight, a bipartisan group of senators. It is largely in step with the president's goals of offering a path to citizenship for the millions of illegal immigrants already in the country while tightening border security and expanding legal entry into the country for families and workers.But no one expects the bill to pass the Senate without some modifications. Mr. Obama's Republican allies on the issue — in particular Senators Marco Rubio of Florida, a member of the bipartisan group, and Tom Coburn of Oklahoma — warned last week that the president could lose their support without stronger efforts to secure the border, as well as other changes."I'm trying to get to where I can say yes," Mr. Coburn said as senators prepared to clear the way for what could be weeks of debate in the full chamber. "But the only way you can say yes and sell it to the American people is to know that the border is secure, and this bill doesn't do it."Mr. Obama will try to set the tone for the legislative fight with a speech at the White House on Tuesday. But the battle will quickly shift to the Capitol, where the biggest struggle may be over how far to go in securing America's border with Mexico against illegal crossings.
WASHINGTON — The Senate Judiciary Committee considered more than 300 amendments to immigration legislation last month before sending it to the full Senate, which is expected to begin debate on the bill on Tuesday.But even as they begin a floor fight that is likely to last until the Fourth of July recess, senators from both parties are readying dozens more amendments in an effort to shape the most significant overhaul of the nation's immigration laws in a generation. Though amendments will continue to roll in during the debate, below are some of the more complicated, controversial and important provisions expected to be offered — including some considered to be "poison pills.""RESULTS" Senator John Cornyn, Republican of Texas, has signaled that he plans to introduce a measure that would require several border security triggers — including a 90 percent apprehension rate of illegal crossings — to be met before undocumented immigrants could transition to lawful permanent residence, or green card, status. His amendment also would require putting into place a biometric exit system and a nationwide electronic-verification system, to ensure employers are not hiring workers who are in the country illegally.Democratic senators in the bipartisan group of eight that drafted the legislation, as well as immigration advocates, seized on the provisions as logistically unfeasible hurdles that could delay indefinitely a path to citizenship for the 11 million undocumented immigrants already in the country. Speaking Sunday on Univision, Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, warned that Mr. Cornyn's amendment was "a poison pill."Speaking on the Senate floor Monday, Mr. Cornyn said, "The true poison pill would be the failure to take sensible measures by adopting measures like mine which are designed to solve the problem.""TRUST BUT VERIFY" Senator Rand Paul, Republican of Kentucky, intends to offer an amendment that would require Congress to write and enforce a border security plan, rather than delegating that responsibility to the Department of Homeland Security. In addition, as Mr. Paul explained in an e-mail statement, his provision "requires Congress to vote every year on border security" for the first five years after the legislation takes effect."If Congress votes that the border is not secure, elements of immigration reform will cease to go forward and visa programs will be slowed," he said.Immigration advocates and many Democratic senators, however, argue that requiring Congress to vote every year would create an inherently partisan process that could derail the path to citizenship."That's extremely problematic," said Marielena Hincapié, the executive director of the National Immigration Law Center. "You're leaving it up to chance whether or not a future Congress wants immigration reform."EARNED-INCOME TAX CREDIT When the Judiciary Committee debated the legislation last month, Senator Jeff Sessions, Republican of Alabama, offered several provisions that would have blocked millions of immigrants from receiving certain tax credits. One amendment would have required families to provide a valid Social Security number — for each qualifying child as well as for the filing parent — in order to receive a child tax credit, and another would have denied the earned-income tax credit to immigrants while they had temporary legal status.Both amendments failed in committee on a party-line vote, but Mr. Sessions — or a fellow Republican — is expected to offer them on the floor.BACK TAXES Senator Orrin G. Hatch, Republican of Utah, is expected to offer an amendment that would require immigrants to prove they have paid back taxes and are staying current with them as they proceed toward legal status, and another that would create a five-year ban for immigrants who are legal permanent residents before they can receive Affordable Care Act subsidies, both of which are viewed as controversial.Members of the bipartisan group who wrote the bill worked with Mr. Hatch to amend the bill in committee to address his concerns involving the high-tech industry and visas for high-skilled immigrants, and they hope to work out a similar compromise on the Senate floor.GUN AMENDMENTS Senator Richard Blumenthal, Democrat of Connecticut, is considering offering two amendments that would restrict access to guns for undocumented immigrants. One of his provisions would close a loophole that allows certain immigrants, including those who entered the country through the Visa Waiver Program, to buy firearms. The other would require the attorney general to alert the secretary of homeland security when an unauthorized immigrant or visitor on a temporary visa tries to buy a firearm, something they cannot do legally.Mr. Blumenthal said he is still discussing with his Democratic colleagues whether, and how, he should proceed."The priority is immigration reform and I think gun violence prevention issues belong in the debate about immigration reform, but I would not press them if the result is to doom immigration reform," he said.SAME-SEX PARTNERS Senator Patrick J. Leahy, Democrat of Vermont and the chairman of the Judiciary Committee, is considering filing an amendment that would add protections for same-sex couples — a provision that he ultimately declined to offer in committee, "with a heavy heart," he said.Mr. Leahy's amendment would allow United States citizens who are in state-recognized marriages to apply for a green card on behalf of their same-sex partners, something citizens in traditional marriages can do relatively easily.Though many gay rights advocates are hoping Mr. Leahy will offer his amendment on the Senate floor, Republicans — including members of the bipartisan group that wrote the bill — have said that it would be a deal-breaker that would cause them to abandon the entire overhaul.BORDER FENCE AND SECURITY Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, has said that he does not think he can support the current legislation, which he helped draft, unless border security provisions are strengthened. To that end, Mr. Rubio and Senator Tom Coburn, Republican of Oklahoma, are considering offering an amendment in which Congress would take over from the Department of Homeland Security the responsibility for drafting a border security plan, which the department would then carry out.Several of the bill's authors — including Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, and Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York — showed early signs of support for Mr. Rubio's plan. Mr. Schumer said he was willing to strengthen border security provisions as long as any trigger is "both achievable and specific."
WASHINGTON — When Senator Tim Kaine , Democrat of Virginia, took the Senate floor on Tuesday to deliver a speech in support of an immigration overhaul bill, he did it in a way no senator had done before: entirely in Spanish."We are going to have hours upon hours of debate about this on the floor of the Senate, and taking 15 minutes to explain the bill in Spanish just seemed like a good idea," Mr. Kaine said. "Latinos have so much invested in the outcome of the bill, people ought to know what the bill is about."According to records from the Senate Library, Mr. Kaine was the first senator to give a speech all in Spanish on the Senate floor. Senator James M. Inhofe, Republican of Oklahoma, spoke Spanish in brief statements on the floor in 2003 and 2005, and former Senator Mel Martinez, Republican of Florida, did the same in 2005.Mr. Kaine, who learned Spanish when he lived in Honduras and helped run a Roman Catholic school with Jesuit missionaries, said he had started planning the speech six weeks ago and had written it with the help of two staff members who speak Spanish."I think people were probably surprised," Mr. Kaine said. "One of my people got a call by a Latino staffer in the House and said, 'I have waited 20 years to see this happen.' "Mr. Kaine, a former governor of Virginia, said he used to speak Spanish only every four to five months, but now found himself speaking it every day. "It is a sign of the changing nature of Virginia," he said.Public reaction to Mr. Kaine's speech was mixed, even among Hispanic civil rights groups that support the immigration bill."To have the speech in Spanish — it brings a great joy and a sense of pride that we are being heard, finally," said Paloma Zuleta, communications director of the League of United Latin American Citizens.But Lisa Navarrete, a spokeswoman for the National Council of La Raza, said that while Mr. Kaine's linguistic outreach was appreciated, the organization believes that "the debate should be something that everyone in Congress can understand and that all languages understand."
As the Senate opens debate on an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws, organized labor is picking up the pace of its advocacy for the bill.The Service Employees International Union, which claims more than two million members, said it had purchased more than $1 million in television advertising to run in June on cable networks nationwide. Five advertisements, which will rotate, feature police officers, Republicans and small-business owners — not traditional supporters of labor — calling on Congress to stop fighting over immigration and "fix what's broke" in the system. The ads call for a pathway to citizenship for 11 million immigrants in the country illegally.The A.F.L.-C.I.O., the nation's largest labor federation, said it would take 50 union leaders from 27 states to Washington on Wednesday to lobby in the Senate and the House. The organization said it was also starting a call-in campaign by union members focusing on about two dozen senators, including lawmakers from Alaska, Georgia, Illinois, North Carolina, Ohio and Tennessee, who have not made public their positions on the legislation. Richard L. Trumka, the president of the A.F.L.-C.I.O., was among an array of supporters who appeared with President Obama when he spoke from the White House on Tuesday morning to urge the Senate to pass the bill.Immigrant workers, especially Latinos, have brought growth to unions that had struggled for years with declining membership. The A.F.L.-C.I.O reached a hard-fought agreement with business earlier this year on a program for future temporary low-skilled foreign workers, which is included in the Senate bill.
WASHINGTON — As the Senate voted overwhelmingly Tuesday to begin debating an overhaul of the nation's immigrations laws, President Obama offered a wholehearted endorsement of the bipartisan proposal, which presents him with a chance to reach the kind of landmark accord with Republicans that has eluded him on the budget and gun violence.For Mr. Obama, who has picked his shots in the immigration debate to avoid stirring partisan anger on Capitol Hill, it was a moment of promise and peril. While he threw his weight behind the bill, he conceded that it would not satisfy all sides and said he anticipated a bruising fight over issues like border security and the path to citizenship.The president, however, may have more leverage than in previous battles, not least because many Republicans believe rewriting the immigration laws is critical for the long-term viability of their party given the nation's demographic shifts, even if doing so risks alienating parts of their base.Republican willingness to weigh significant changes in immigration policy was evident in the 84-to-15 vote to begin what is expected to be a monthlong debate on the bill, a lopsided majority that comprised 52 Democrats, 2 independents and 30 Republicans. The opponents were all Republicans.Advocates hailed the vote as an encouraging sign for the measure's eventual passage. But Senate veterans warned that the procedural victory did not preclude Republicans from ultimately rejecting the legislation, which would provide a path to citizenship for 11 million people who are in the country illegally."This bill isn't perfect; it's a compromise," the president said at a carefully choreographed White House appearance with advocates of reform. "Going forward, nobody is going to get everything they want. Not Democrats, not Republicans, not me."Though the Senate's Republican leader, Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, often an impediment to Democratic initiatives, voted to allow debate, he said he would vote against the bill unless major changes were made. "These include, but are not limited to, the areas of border security, government benefits and taxes," he said.The House speaker, John A. Boehner, said he feared that the Senate bill "doesn't go far enough." Speaking on ABC News before the vote, Mr. Boehner said he had "real concerns with the Senate bill," especially on border security and internal enforcement.A vote to allow a debate is no guarantee of a bill's passage: the Senate cleared that threshold on legislation to tighten the nation's gun laws, but its key provision, to tighten background checks on gun buyers, still went down to defeat. At the same time, this procedural vote was larger than one in 2007, when the Senate last debated immigration reform, and Mr. Obama was clearly determined to seize the moment."If you're serious about actually fixing the system, then this is the vehicle to do it," Mr. Obama declared. "If you're not serious about it, if you think that a broken system is the best America can do, then I guess it makes sense to try to block it."Speaking in the East Room, Mr. Obama surrounded himself with supporters of the bill, including a former police chief in Los Angeles and New York, William J. Bratton; Thomas J. Donahue, the president of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce; Julián Castro, the mayor of San Antonio; Steve Case, an entrepreneur and a founder of AOL; and Richard L. Trumka, the president of the A.F.L.-C.I.O.While Mr. Obama speaks about the need to overhaul the immigration system at schools and factories across the country, the East Room event was his most concerted push for it since he spoke in Las Vegas in January, around the time a group of Republican and Democratic senators presented a draft framework for legislation.That speech, analysts said, drew a positive response from some influential Republican lawmakers, and the White House appeared to be trying to replicate the experience. But they warned not to overestimate Mr. Obama's role in the debate now.
WASHINGTON — As debate started on Wednesday on amendments to the Senate immigration bill, border security emerged as a focal point, with supporters and doubters agreeing that those provisions would have to be strengthened to attract more votes, especially from Republicans."In order to bring conservatives to this cause, those who want immigration reform must understand that a real solution must ensure that our borders are secure," said Senator Rand Paul of Kentucky, a Republican who is one of those conservatives.Mr. Paul, a libertarian close to the Tea Party movement, said he supported the bill's purpose of creating a pathway to legal status for illegal immigrant workers, but would not vote for it without tougher border provisions.The eight senators who wrote the overhaul bill say they are open to changes, but not to altering its core: a path to citizenship for 11 million immigrants now in the country illegally, with a sequence of border measures, known as triggers, along the way."The bottom line for us is we need to make sure the pathway is real," said Senator Michael Bennet of Colorado, a Democrat who is one of the eight, "and that people can be assured that whatever trigger or gating items are in place are ones that don't make the pathway to citizenship a fantasy." Mr. Bennet spoke at a breakfast hosted by The Christian Science Monitor.The debate got off to a rocky start with a dispute between Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, and several Republicans, including Senator Charles E. Grassley of Iowa, over how many votes would be required to pass an amendment.The current bill would give the Department of Homeland Security six months to present plans to extend border fencing and achieve "effective control" of the Southwest border, defined as continuous surveillance along its length and 90 percent effectiveness in stopping illegal crossings. Once those plans are presented, illegal immigrants could apply for provisional status. The bill includes $4.5 billion in border financing in the first five years.If the security goals had not been met after five years, a commission would be created to ensure border officials met them. After 10 years, provisional immigrants could apply for permanent residency — the first step toward citizenship — if the border plans were fully operational, the fencing was completed, mandatory electronic verification for new workers was in place nationwide and an electronic exit system checked foreigners departing through airports and seaports.An important test for the bill was an amendment filed Wednesday by Senator John Cornyn of Texas, whom other Republicans are watching closely. It would require certification from Homeland Security and the top federal auditor that his border goals had been met for one year before provisional immigrants could start the path to citizenship.Democrats denounced Mr. Cornyn's amendment as a "poison pill" to cripple the bill. But Senator Jeff Flake of Arizona, a Republican who is one of the eight authors, said at the breakfast with Mr. Bennet that he believed Mr. Cornyn was looking "to improve the bill" and that they were working to find a compromise.Mr. Grassley offered an amendment that would require Homeland Security certification of effective control of the entire Southwest border six months before any illegal immigrants could apply even for provisional status."Border security first. Legalize second," he said.Mr. Paul said he would offer an amendment that would require Congress to vote to approve border security levels annually for five years while illegal immigrants gradually received work visas.
As the Senate prepares to debate a path to citizenship for more than 11 million immigrants in the country illegally, the House Judiciary Committee argued in an open hearing on Thursday the nuances of a bill that would turn millions of those immigrants into criminals overnight.The Strengthen and Fortify Enforcement Act, also known as the SAFE Act, includes provisions outlined in a contentious immigration bill passed by the House in 2005 that would criminalize all undocumented immigrants in the country whether they crossed the border illegally or overstayed a visa.The SAFE Act calls for increasing the number of Immigration and Customs Enforcement officers by 5,000 and lets states and localities enforce federal immigration laws. Under the bill, local law enforcement units could arrest and detain immigrants in newly constructed federal detention centers indefinitely."It is inhumane politics," Representative John Conyers Jr., Democrat of Michigan, said. "It will endanger public safety, increase racial profiling and infringe due process."Representative Trey Gowdy, Republican of South Carolina, who introduced the bill, spoke in favor of allowing local law enforcement to help federal officers with immigration issues on the border. "If you are good enough to solve homicide cases, then I trust you to solve immigration cases," he said.Representative Tom Marino, Republican of Pennsylvania, criticized those who opposed the bill, saying they just wanted to "cherry pick" the laws they wanted to enforce and who they wanted to enforce them.Opponents of the bill who spoke at the hearing said they thought the measure did not do enough to distinguish between different kinds of immigrants and expressed particular concern about those who had applied for visas but were waiting for official documents.
WASHINGTON — The former governors Jeb Bush of Florida and Haley Barbour of Mississippi, two of the Republican Party's most outspoken advocates of overhauling the nation's immigration laws, urged conservatives on Thursday to "change the conversation" on immigration by arguing that immigrant workers, both high-skilled and low-wage, are essential for economic growth.In a moderated discussion before reporters at the Bipartisan Policy Center, a nonprofit research group, both Republicans said they generally supported a bill under debate in the Senate and were guardedly optimistic that overhaul legislation would pass Congress this year.Their comments highlighted the rift among conservatives over the bill, which includes a pathway to citizenship for 11 million immigrants here illegally. Senator Jeff Sessions of Alabama, a Republican who is a leading opponent of the measure, said this week on the Senate floor that it would bring an influx of foreign workers that "would be disastrous for the wages and job prospects of U.S. workers."Mr. Bush, the son and brother of former presidents who is the perennial subject of speculation about his own White House aspirations, said he was advising  Republican lawmakers to shift from a focus on illegal immigration to emphasize "how do you create a strategy of sustained economic growth."  Both men said the economy would need foreign workers to replace and sustain an aging American labor force."That is a winning conversation in conservative America for sure," Mr. Bush said.Mr. Bush said he agreed with the 13-year pathway to citizenship in the Senate bill, which includes requirements to learn English and to pay back taxes and fines, saying it "reaches the proper balance" between the rule of law and the nation's immigrant heritage. Mr. Bush, in a book he published this year, had raised doubts on his views of citizenship for those immigrants.
WASHINGTON — One week into the Senate's immigration floor fight, Senator John Cornyn of Texas has emerged as one of the most polarizing figures on the issue: a Republican leader from a border state brandishing a border security plan that he says is meant to salvage the measure but that is seen by others as a surreptitious attempt to scuttle it.To his supporters, Mr. Cornyn is simply trying to rescue a potentially historic immigration overhaul by offering a reasonable plan that would attract reluctant Republicans by strengthening border security before 11 million people who are in the country illegally can begin their path to citizenship. But to Democrats and immigration advocates, Mr. Cornyn, the No. 2 Senate Republican, has written a "poison pill" provision intended to torpedo a bill he would never support.One thing is certain: the role of Mr. Cornyn, who has snowy white hair and a visage that looks more British tea-sipper than Texas two-stepper, is sure to have ramifications for him in the Republican leadership, in the Senate itself and in Texas, where the fast-growing Hispanic population is changing the demographic face of the state."No one believes the status quo is acceptable, and I think just saying no is not a satisfactory answer," Mr. Cornyn, shod in brown alligator-skin cowboy boots, said in an interview in the whip's office just off the Senate floor. "So if you're not going to say no, I think you have to come up with a solution, and I think this is part of it."Mr. Cornyn's proposed amendment would require both the Department of Homeland Security and the top federal auditor to certify that all of his border goals had been met before immigrants could start the path to citizenship and receive green cards. His method of measuring success would include a 90 percent apprehension rate of illegal crossers at the southern border, as well as the installation of a biometric exit system at all air and sea ports, which immigration advocates worry could be logistically unattainable.Though Democrats have expressed a willingness to strengthen border enforcement measures, they say that Mr. Cornyn's provision goes too far. Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and a member of the bipartisan group that drafted the legislation, called it a "nonstarter," and Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the Democratic leader, was among those who labeled it a poison pill. (Mr. Cornyn took to the floor to assert that the real poison pill would be not accepting his amendment.)"He's pulled out a machete, and he's hacking at the path to citizenship," said Frank Sharry, the executive director of America's Voice, a pro-immigration group. "He doesn't want to improve border security, he wants to take down the path to citizenship. If he wanted more border security without impaling the path to citizenship, he'd probably get it.""This is a guy," Mr. Sharry added, "who pretends he wants to get to yes, always gets to no, and in the meantime destabilizes the bipartisan immigration bill in place."Some conservative Republicans are also frustrated with Mr. Cornyn's plan. On Friday, Heritage Action for America, an advocacy group, released a statement urging senators to vote against Mr. Cornyn's proposal, which, it said, could "serve as political cover for those senators seeking to justify their support for amnesty."Mr. Cornyn says that his critics are simply wrong and that his plan is a way to respond to a "real trust deficit" between the federal government and Republicans by making sure that the government remains accountable for its border security promises."If my amendment is adopted," he said, "we will have something concrete and credible we can show people that improves the broken system, and that's something I can comfortably defend."Mr. Cornyn's fellow Republicans largely agree. Senator Marco Rubio of Florida, a Republican author of the bill and one of his party's most prominent Hispanics, has been publicly supportive of Mr. Cornyn's amendment, and Senator Orrin Hatch, Republican of Utah, called it "reasonable, moderate, middle-of-the-road."
WASHINGTON — Driver's license photographs and biographic information of most Americans would be accessible through an expanded Department of Homeland Security nationwide computer network if the immigration legislation pending before the Senate becomes law.The proposed expansion is part of an effort to crack down on illegal immigration by requiring all employers to confirm the identity and legal status of any new workers by tapping into a Homeland Security Department system called E-Verify, which is now used voluntarily by about 7 percent of employers in the United States.But the proposal already faces objections from some civil liberties lawyers and certain members of Congress, who worry about the potential for another sprawling data network that could ultimately be the equivalent of a national ID system.The questions are being raised while a debate takes places over access to domestic phone records and Internet files of foreigners."Over time, this could become a single, national, searchable database of vital biographic information and photographs of nearly every American," said Senator Chris Coons, Democrat of Delaware. "I want to make sure we embed privacy protections in the system, both in how it is built and administered so that data cannot easily be stolen, and also that the information is only used for legitimate purposes."Homeland Security Department officials consider such fears unwarranted because E-Verify simply reaches out to other existing government computer systems, like Social Security records or passport records, to confirm a person's identity and work eligibility."It is not a stand-alone database that collects and stores," said Christopher Bentley, a spokesman at the department's Citizenship and Immigration Services division, which runs E-Verify. "It pings the other databases that are already established for confirmation, and once that process is complete the information disappears."E-Verify would have to be greatly expanded if the immigration bill is passed, because within four years all employers would have to electronically submit information gathered from new employees, including citizens, to confirm that they are eligible to work in the United States.Alex Conant, a spokesman for Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, whose staff helped write the language in the Senate bill, said the E-Verify changes would make it harder for someone who has entered the country illegally to find a job and would accomplish this without creating a national identification card."The system we currently have is full of fraud and contributes to illegal immigration," Mr. Conant said. "This proposed system protects individual civil liberties while giving employers the tools to make sure their employees are legal."To prevent a job applicant from using fraudulent credentials — as often occurs with illegal immigrants — the legislation mandates the expansion of a photo-based confirmation system. It would allow employers to compare a photo on a driver's license or a passport with what should be a replica of that photo maintained by the agency that issued the identification document.Since late 2010, the Homeland Security Department has had access to the 113 million State Department passport records and photos to help prevent abuse. But the Senate bill would direct the department to expand the photo program by offering grants to states if they allow the department to tap into their driver's license photo records, and also makes it clear that allowing such access would not represent a violation of a federal privacy law.Currently, only Mississippi allows the department into its motor vehicle database, Mr. Bentley said, and only for biographic information, like name and date of birth, not photographs.But several civil liberties lawyers and lawmakers have said they were concerned that an expanded E-Verify — if it had access to all 212 million driver's license records in the United States — would soon be tapped by other federal agencies, like the Transportation Security Administration at airport checkpoints or the Federal Bureau of Investigation in a search for suspects.Just as Social Security numbers became adopted for identification uses never intended, E-Verify, they say, would draw many unexpected uses."We are wary of giving the federal government this kind of centralized power over our daily lives," Senator Rand Paul, Republican of Kentucky, wrote in an opinion article in The Washington Times, opposing the plan for expanding the E-Verify system.The Senate legislation makes it clear that the proposed law should not be interpreted to "permit or allow" any other government agency to use the E-Verify data for any purpose other than employment verification. But it does not explicitly prohibit such a use, as the law governing the census does, critics said.In fact, privacy guidelines issued by the Homeland Security Department governing E-Verify say it may, on a case-by-case basis, "give law enforcement agencies extracts of information on potential fraud, discrimination or other illegal activities."Mr. Bentley said this provision was intended to prevent individual cases of wrongdoing, and not to allow broad searches of the data that are linked together by the E-Verify system.Mr. Conant said Senator Rubio would consider amendments to the legislation to address privacy concerns about the proposals."Given the justified concerns that many Americans have with the current administration's overreach," Mr. Conant said in a statement, "we are open to refinements that would further restrict the government's use of this technology, without undermining the ability of employers to ensure undocumented immigrants are not illegally obtaining employment."
WASHINGTON — Republicans have an opportunity for a get-out-of-jail moment with the fastest-growing slice of the U.S. electorate, Hispanics.An immigration bill is likely to pass the Senate by the end of the month. The size and shape of the measure and the tone of the debate will be framed by Republicans in the next 10 days.That may have a small impact on recalcitrant House Republicans. It will have a larger impact on reinforcing or modifying the hostility of Hispanics to Republicans. Party leaders don't expect to win the Hispanic vote — they've put themselves in such a hole that it may take a generation or two to do that — but to clear the deck and begin a conversation with these voters on other issues.There are three Republican blocs to watch in the Senate this week and next:The Presidential Aspirants Marco Rubio of Florida is an architect of the bill before the Senate and is simultaneously trying to assuage the party's far-right base. This balancing act must keep him awake at night. He had been pulling it off until last week, when he began playing more games that infuriated John McCain of Arizona and Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, his Republican partners on the measure.Whatever the rhetoric and however he votes on some amendments, Mr. Rubio still is likely to support the bill in the end.That won't be the case with Senators Rand Paul and Ted Cruz. Mr. Paul, the freshman Kentucky conservative libertarian, does remarkably well in some of the hypothetical polls on the 2016 race. He's trying to carve out a role as a bridge with House Republicans on immigration. That won't work; it suggests he won't want to make a big deal of the issue.Mr. Cruz, a Texas freshman who is the most natural Tea Party candidate for 2016, has no such inhibitions, and seems to relish making his fellow Cuban-American, Mr. Rubio, squirm. He has called the path to citizenship — the sine qua non element of any measure for Hispanics — "the most divisive aspect" of the legislation, and says he is proud to be called "Obamaphobic."Governing Lawmakers In the Senate, liberal-moderate Republicans are dinosaurs. There are, however, as many as a dozen Republicans who are periodically interested in bipartisan consensus and want to support an immigration bill. These include Susan Collins of Maine, Lisa Murkowski of Alaska, Bob Corker and Lamar Alexander of Tennessee, Rob Portman of Ohio, Dean Heller of Nevada and Kelly Ayotte of New Hampshire.This group generally is sensitive to finding compromises that aren't deal killers for Hispanics and that can win broader Republican support."We're not there, but I think we can find the sweet spot," said Mr. Corker, declaring that he very much wants to vote for the legislation. Now the important negotiations are over a tougher border security measure that, unlike the proposal by Senator John Cornyn, a Texas Republican, would not impede the creation of a path to citizenship for undocumented immigrants who already are in the United States.A mischievous Rubio proposal would require immigrants to be proficient in English before becoming citizens. Mr. Graham, noting a list of criteria for citizenship that includes paying back taxes, learning English, understanding civics and keeping a job, said, "Hell, half my family wouldn't qualify."Only a handful of Democrats will defect. If these Republican senators hold and generally back a middle ground on votes over the next week or so, the bill will muster the necessary 60 votes, even in the unlikely event that Mr. Rubio peels off.Conservatives An immigration overhaul appeals to some on the right like Jeff Flake, the freshman senator from Arizona, and Paul D. Ryan of Wisconsin, chairman of the House Budget Committee. If supporters can get an additional half-dozen staunch Senate conservatives — like Tom Coburn of Oklahoma, John Hoeven of North Dakota, Saxby Chambliss and Johnny Isakson of Georgia or Orrin G. Hatch of Utah — they could approach 70 votes on final passage and create momentum as the measure moves to the House.Mr. Hatch, a consummate deal maker before the Tea Party made him fear for his political life in his re-election bid last year, backed the bill in committee after winning concessions to bring in more high-technology workers. Now he's part of a group that is trying to restrict public benefits for immigrants with ideas that are harsher than most Democrats can accept.When the bill passes the Senate it will put enormous pressure — more than most now realize — on House Republicans. Speaker John A. Boehner, Mr. Ryan and possibly the House whip, Kevin McCarthy, whose California district is one-third Hispanic, want to pass legislation that is acceptable to the Hispanic community. A large majority of the House Republican caucus does not.Conservatives insist on applying the so-called Hastert rule, which allows consideration only of bills that have a majority of the Republican caucus.If this is irreconcilable, here is a prediction, based more on instinct than reporting: Mr. Boehner, if necessary, will sacrifice his speakership rather than be party to the death of the immigration overhaul. He realizes that, even though it may not much affect congressional elections next year, his party cannot continue to lose 70 percent of the Hispanic vote and be competitive nationally.Alan Cowell on the prospects for Christian unity under new leadership .
WASHINGTON — Senate Democratic leaders sought on Monday to spur their colleagues to pick up the pace as the immigration debate entered its second week.With the legislation's backers hoping to win Senate approval before members of Congress leave for the Fourth of July, Senator Harry Reid of Nevada, the majority leader, warned that the Senate could be held in session over the weekend if there was no progress soon.Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Vermont Democrat who chairs the Judiciary Committee and is managing the bipartisan immigration measure on the floor, also prodded the Senate."Either we do it now or we are never going to do it," he said.The Senate has disposed of just one amendment, setting aside a proposal on border security by Senator Charles E. Grassley, Republican of Iowa, that the bill's supporters saw as a threat to its passage.After getting hung up last week on the number of votes an amendment would need to pass, Senate leaders said Monday night that they had struck a deal for votes on at least four proposals Tuesday, including one on citizenship for children adopted internationally. All will require 60 votes to pass.When the Senate slows down on big legislation that has a deadline, Mr. Reid often threatens to keep lawmakers on weekends, but rarely does the need reach that point."The bill isn't perfect," Mr. Reid said. "But it takes important steps to reform our broken legal immigration system and strengthen border security."
WASHINGTON — Senator Jeff Sessions, an elfin Alabamian with a mischievous smile and a relentless approach to legislative battle, has a theory about the sweeping immigration bill pending in the Senate: It's as good as dead."The longer it lays in the sun, the more it smells, as they say about the mackerel," said Mr. Sessions, the Republican enthusiastically leading the opposition to a bill others on his side of the aisle see as vital to the very future of the Republican Party.If that sounds familiar to the immigration rights advocates who have been pressing an overhaul since 2006, it should. "As sunlight falls on the mackerel, it begins to smell more and more," Mr. Sessions said in 2007 as he successfully waged war on a previous immigration bill, championed by President George W. Bush and pushed forward by his party's most senior leaders.In 2006, the dead-mackerel theory played out for the first time as Mr. Sessions helped churn an immigration bill written by the Capitol Hill titans Edward M. Kennedy of Massachusetts and John McCain of Arizona into Senate chum.Advocates of the legislation — Republicans and Democrats — insist this time will be different. The Republican drubbing in November among Latino voters, the shifting demographics of the American electorate, and the rise of telegenic champions of the immigration changes like Senator Marco Rubio of Florida and Representative Paul D. Ryan of Wisconsin, both Republicans, have changed the stakes as well as the political equation.But in Mr. Sessions, they face an opponent with experience, one who reminds his staff every day that passage of immigration legislation was supposed to be inevitable in 2006 as well, and even more so in 2007. His tactics are the same as they were back then: organize the opposition, break down the bill section by section, raise questions over every aspect of it, slow progress on the floor to a crawl through procedural objections and a flurry of amendments, and hope that in the light of day a conservative backlash will crush final passage.During the first official week of debate on the Senate floor last week, Senate leaders were able to hold all of one amendment vote — in large measure because of Mr. Sessions's delaying tactics. "Sessions is taking a full-spectrum view of this bill, and his opposition is not just one section: it's from Page 1 to Page 1,041," said Tripp Baird, director of Senate relations at Heritage Action, the conservative Heritage Foundation's political arm and a vociferous opponent of the immigration bill.Mr. Sessions does not necessarily hold the same sway in the Senate as the lawmakers he is challenging. The leading champions of the immigration bill include the Senate's No. 2 and No. 3 Democrats, Richard J. Durbin of Illinois and Charles E. Schumer of New York, along with a former Republican presidential nominee in Mr. McCain and one of the party's brightest stars in Mr. Rubio.Mr. Sessions, the son of a country-store owner from rural Alabama, is neither party leader nor telegenic star. He was elected to the Senate in 1996, a decade after that same body blocked his nomination by President Ronald Reagan to a Federal District Court judgeship amid accusations of racial insensitivity.His main job at the moment, the ranking Republican on the Senate Budget Committee, has little to do with the task at hand.What he has is a visceral distaste for a measure that would grant 11 million illegal immigrants a path to United States citizenship, increase the number of legal immigrants allowed in, and reinvigorate guest worker programs across the country.His motivation, he said, is simple: Other Republicans are too scared to take the lead, fearing they will be labeled anti-immigrant, intolerant or worse. It has fallen to him again."People want to vote for something. I mean that makes you feel good. You want to fix the problem," Mr. Sessions said, "but we've been hijacked by legislation that won't work."
WASHINGTON — Two Senate Republicans closed in on a deal regarding stronger border security on Wednesday evening with the bipartisan group of eight senators that drafted an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws, hoping to find a resolution to an issue that for two weeks has dominated — and at times bedeviled — the immigration debate on the Senate floor.The agreement, if reached, would further strengthen border security provisions in the measure, with the goal of attracting more votes, especially from Republicans who are reluctant to support any immigration legislation that does include significant enforcement measures at the southern border.The two Republican senators, Bob Corker of Tennessee and John Hoeven of North Dakota, have been working behind the scenes to come up with a provision that would appease hesitant Republicans and help garner broad bipartisan support for the bill. On Wednesday evening they said they were close."We've had a really good day," Mr. Corker said. "I feel good about where we are."The two senators briefed their Republican colleagues at a party lunch, and afterward said they were heartened by the positive response. Their push to strengthen border security, they said, was given a boost by a Congressional Budget Office report released Tuesday that found that the current bill — without any additional border security provisions — would decrease annual illegal immigration by only 25 percent."I don't know what the hell is going to happen," said Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, "but we're on the verge of doing something dramatic on the border, and if it happens it will be due to Hoeven and Corker and a lot of our colleagues."Mr. Graham, a member of the bipartisan group that drafted the original legislation, served as the group's conduit to Mr. Corker and Mr. Hoeven to ensure that their provision was acceptable to both Democrats and Republicans.The Corker-Hoeven proposal would be an alternative to an amendment introduced by Senator John Cornyn, Republican of Texas. Mr. Cornyn's plan would create strict goals that would need to be met before more than 11 million undocumented immigrants could start on the path to citizenship and attain legal status, including a 90 percent apprehension rate of illegal crossers at the southern border and a biometric exit system at all airports and seaports.Democrats consider Mr. Cornyn's plan a "poison pill" that is logistically hard to achieve and could indefinitely delay citizenship for those covered by the measure.Originally, Mr. Corker and Mr. Hoeven were considering a provision that would have required a 90 percent effectiveness rate in apprehending or turning back illegal crossers, using a combination of conventional border infrastructure, like fencing and observation towers, and high-tech elements including heat-sensing cameras and drones."It has to be measurable, objective metrics so we know the border is secure and so that folks feel that it's attainable and we can agree that we have a secure border," Mr. Hoeven said. "We're trying to come up with something where we can get Republicans and Democrats to agree on."Democrats, however, still objected to the 90 percent trigger linking border security to a pathway to citizenship, and on Wednesday, Mr. Corker said they had "come up with a solution."According to aides with knowledge of the discussions, the Republicans agreed to make the 90 percent figure a goal rather than a requirement, in exchange for a detailed border security plan that lays out serious assurances of both manpower and resources at the southern border."Unprecedented deployment of boots on the ground and commitment to the fence," explained an aide close to the talks, speaking anonymously to talk candidly about continuing private discussions. The aide added that the Corker-Hoeven provision would go even further in terms of adding border patrol agents than Mr. Cornyn's plan, which required an additional 5,000.
WASHINGTON — The hide-out has no sign on the door, but inside Dirksen 201 is a spare suite of offices the White House has transformed into its covert immigration war room on Capitol Hill.Strategically located down the hall from the Senate Judiciary Committee in one of the city's massive Congressional office buildings, the work space normally reserved for the vice president is now the hub of a stealthy legislative operation run by President Obama's staff. Their goal is to quietly secure passage of the first immigration overhaul in a quarter century."We are trying hard not to be heavy handed about what we are doing," said Cecilia Muñoz, the director of the White House Domestic Policy Council and the president's point person on immigration.Six years ago President George W. Bush publicly sent cabinet secretaries to roam the Capitol building daily to try to woo Republican senators for a similar immigration bill. But this time, high-profile help from the White House is anathema to many Republicans who do not want to be seen by constituents as carrying out the will of Mr. Obama.So while lawmakers from both parties are privately relying on the White House and its agencies to provide technical information to draft scores of amendments to the immigration bill, few Republicans are willing to admit it. Some are so eager to prove that the White House is not pulling the strings that their aides say the administration is not playing any role at all."President Obama's concept of engaging Congress is giving a speech that nobody up here listens to," said Alex Conant, a spokesman for Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, who is an important supporter of the immigration legislation. "If passing legislation is like making sausage, then this White House is like a bunch of vegetarians."As senators near a final tally on the 867-page bill before the July 4 holiday, immigration supporters acknowledge serious risks in Mr. Obama's approach: leaving the public advocacy for a major piece of his legacy in the hands of others. If the bill fails to become law, Mr. Obama will be open to criticism from Hispanics that he did not put the weight of his office behind the legislation.But Mr. Obama has made some careful public efforts, including a speech last week at the White House in which he strongly endorsed the legislation. On Tuesday while on Air Force One in Europe, he called a Democratic negotiator, Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York, to reinforce his opposition to part of a Republican amendment that would have what the administration views as unrealistically tough requirements for border security.Inside Room 201, the administration has gathered a collection of its own Congressional lobbyists, policy specialists and experts from an alphabet soup of the agencies that will have to put the immigration legislation into effect if it passes. They all moved into the vice president's offices on June 10, setting up laptop computers and thick binders filled with proposed amendments on an oval conference table."We have folks who know the Senate really well, who know the players, who have been through this before so they know exactly what Senate staff needs," Ms. Muñoz said. "We are deeply, deeply engaged."The group is led by Ed Pagano, Mr. Obama's chief liaison to the Senate and a former chief of staff to Senator Patrick J. Leahy, the Vermont Democrat who is chairman of the Judiciary Committee. He is joined by Felicia Escobar and Tyler Moran, senior advisers at the Domestic Policy Council, and Esther Olavarria, director for immigration reform for the National Security Council staff. Some days, Ms. Muñoz and Miguel Rodriguez, the president's chief Congressional liaison, are there too.On one day this week, those at the table included two representatives from the Justice Department, a homeland security official, a State Department official and someone from the Department of Labor. Throughout the day they pored through proposed amendments, offering suggestions to the staff of the senators who offered them and flagging problems that might arise.At one point, Mr. Pagano, Ms. Escobar and the other White House advisers huddled for 45 minutes in the smaller of the two rooms with Mr. Leahy's top aides. Working from spreadsheets, they discussed each of the 10 amendments that Mr. Leahy was likely to bring to the floor for a vote that day."When Republican amendments are filed and we are trying to decide, 'Can we accept this? Can we accept this without some modifications?' they are the ones who tell us, 'This is quite doable,' " said one Democratic Senate leadership aide, who requested anonymity to talk about legislative strategy.
WASHINGTON — The prospects for Senate approval of a broad overhaul of the nation's immigration laws improved on Thursday after two Senate Republicans worked out a deal on a plan to strengthen border security with the bipartisan group of eight senators that drafted the original bill, raising hopes that the new agreement could build Republican support for the immigration legislation.The deal calls for a "border surge" that nearly doubles the current border patrol force to 40,000 agents from 21,000, as well as for the completion of 700 miles of fence on the nation's southern border. The additional border agents, the senators said, would cost roughly $25 billion.Senator Bob Corker, Republican of Tennessee and one of the deal's architects, said he expected that his provision could attract the support of roughly 15 Republicans for the legislation, which includes a pathway to citizenship for the 11 million unauthorized immigrants already in the country. Those Republican votes would be a significant boon to the measure, which backers hope to push through the Senate by the end of next week.If nearly all Senate Democrats vote for the bill, as aides now expect, the additional Republican support would not only ensure the bill's passage through the Senate, but that it passes with nearly 70 votes and bipartisan momentum as it heads to the Republican-controlled House."We must do more to secure the border in this legislation, and that's exactly what we're offering today," said Senator John Hoeven, Republican of North Dakota and Mr. Corker's partner in drafting the border provision, explaining the deal on the Senate floor. "It is a very straightforward way to secure our border and to do so before allowing a pathway to legal permanent residency for those who came here illegally."Their amendment, Mr. Hoeven added, will provide "more manpower, more fencing, more technology."The Corker-Hoeven proposal will also include a $3.2 billion high-tech border surveillance plan — including drones, infrared ground sensors and long-range thermal imaging cameras — and require both an electronic employment verification program for all employers and a visa entry/exit system at all air and seaports, in order to limit immigrants who overstay their visas.Mr. Corker and Mr. Hoeven had been working behind the scenes over the past week to come up with a provision that would appease hesitant Republicans and help garner broad bipartisan support for the bill. Their breakthrough came on Wednesday, after a Congressional Budget Office report released Tuesday found that the current bill — without any additional border security provisions — would decrease annual illegal immigration by only 25 percent.Originally, the Corker-Hoeven plan would have also required a 90 percent effectiveness rate in apprehending or turning back illegal border crossers, something to which Democrats objected because they believed it was a hard-to-achieve moving target. On Tuesday, Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and an author of the original bill, received calls from both Janet Napolitano, the secretary of homeland security, and President Obama — calling from Air Force One, in the middle of his overseas trip — to reiterate that the 90 percent figure was unacceptable.The budget office report, however, offered some additional breathing room on the 90 percent disagreement. The analysis found that the immigration bill would lower the federal budget deficit by $197 billion in the first 10 years after the law goes into effect; Leon Fresco, Mr. Schumer's immigration counsel, noted that some of those savings could be redirected to further strengthening border security.Though the security measures outlined in the Corker-Hoeven plan must be in place before any immigrant can qualify for legal status, the group agreed to scrap the effectiveness requirement, in exchange for a series of heightened border security concessions made possible by the new funds.
On the Senate floor on Thursday, Republicans and Democrats forged a hard-fought path forward on a bill to overhaul the nation's immigration system. At the same time, the House was voting down the farm bill, historically one of the easiest legislative lifts for Congress.Though both chambers have added more conservative Republican members over the last few election cycles and partisan divides have deepened, the House and Senate are set on disparate legislative trajectories that may well linger for the rest of this Congress and beyond, and may be a dark harbinger for immigration legislation."If you think this is hard," said Trey Gowdy, Republican of South Carolina and one of the scores from his party who joined Democrats, for opposite reasons, to bring down the farm bill, "try getting 218 on a path to legal status."Senate Republicans and Democrats have come to a compromise on various issues this year, even along the margins, passing drama-free measures like a farm bill, and the Violence Against Women Act. They appear to be working in earnest to come together on immigration, with each side seeking significant policy and political goals."This is not about saving the Republican Party or anything else," said Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, a key member of a Senate coalition on the immigration bill. "This is about something that is hurting the U.S.A."Across the rotunda, House Republicans have clutched even harder the conservative positions that are popular in largely gerrymandered Congressional districts, if not among the majority of Americans. As such, bipartisanship has been largely limited to things like post office namings and the Permanent Electronic Duck Stamp Act.The theory in the Senate is simple: If a bill can pass in that chamber with 70 or more votes, Democrats reason, then the House will be forced to take it up and pass their version of bills.But that notion ignores the repeated evidence that many House Republicans are far more interested in using their floor as a place to send messages and uphold political principles. Their theory is that blocking things is less about doing nothing than about preventing something they dislike.The farm bill is just the latest and most straightforward example of the House dynamic. The House measure called for far more significant cuts to food stamps than the Senate bill did and would have most likely passed with even some Democrats and created a path toward a Senate compromise in a conference committee.For many House Republicans, those cuts still did not go far enough. What is more, they piled on, adding amendments to allow states to drug-test food stamp applicants, and to require food stamp recipients to meet federal welfare work requirements. The result was more Democrats bailing from the bill, and too many Republicans still unmollified.This pattern has repeated along a broad array of fiscal and social policy measures for nearly three years. For measures to extend student loan rates or payroll tax cuts, aid states hit by natural disasters, finance the United Nations and keep the government running, House Republican prescriptive social policy amendments have been their undoing, alienating Democrats, yet often not going far enough for their most conservative blocs.When it comes to immigration, that battle is almost certain to play out over the concept of whether or not immigrants here illegally can be given a road to citizenship.All this leaves Speaker John A. Boehner with essentially two choices: pass bills with House Democrats, which is the political equivalent of cheering with Phillies fans at a Nationals game, or let his conference pass bills that are so far to the right of anything that the Senate passes that compromise via conference committee becomes elusive.The consequences for Mr. Boehner are far from clear; following every humiliating defeat on the House floor, predictions of the speaker's imminent loss of the gavel have become as predictable in Washington as mosquitoes in June. So far, the House is hard pressed to find a credible candidate willing to replace him as chaos manager.But the consequences for the party seem more predictable: while Democrats have been eager in the past to find a way to compromise with House Republicans on things like keeping the federal government from shutting down, their tears over failed immigration legislation may be more of the crocodile variety.Blaming Republicans for a failed immigration overhaul would be, however disappointing to those most invested in the policies, a political boon headed into the midterm election, the result of which seems likely to maintain the current dynamic on the Hill.
OLYMPIA, Wash. — The cold war may have ended, but in the Vietnamese community here in Washington State, the muscle memory persists.Aging refugees who lived through the Vietnam War and the fall of Saigon in 1975, many of them scarred by the experience, have not forgotten, nor forgiven. Even now, an accusation of sympathy with the Communist government — real or imagined — can shatter a reputation.That is apparently what happened in the case of Duc Tan et al vs. Norman Le et al, according to the Washington Supreme Court, in a civil defamation case that has offered a rare glimpse into the gut-punching, passionate inner life of Vietnamese America.Tensions and worries about free speech have surged in recent days all over the nation amid the controversy over federal monitoring of telephone and Internet traffic for national security. And many of those anxieties are heightened in immigrant communities, especially those from the Middle East, where the terminology of religious extremism can raise red flags.Here in Olympia, the combatants were men of spare build and thinning hair. One was accused of being a Communist, the other of being a slanderer. Both worked for the South Vietnamese government or military. Both became leaders in local groups that strove to keep Vietnamese language and tradition alive in Western Washington.But starting about a decade ago, Mr. Le, who is 78, said he became convinced that Mr. Tan, 69, was a secret sympathizer with the Communists in their birth country. He eventually went public with his assertions, which were published in the Vietnamese press and spread through social media.Some elements of the proof Mr. Le cited might sound comical to outsiders. A cooking apron used at a community fair, for example, was produced at the trial showing a jolly, cap-wearing figure that Mr. Le said was a clear representation of Ho Chi Minh, the Communist leader, but which Mr. Tan said was in fact none other than Santa Claus.A musician brought in by Mr. Tan for a function struck up the first bars of the national anthem of modern Vietnam, before awkwardly stopping and resuming with what people had expected to hear: the South Vietnamese anthem, theme song of a country that no longer exists. Conspiracy, Mr. Le said; accident, said Mr. Tan.Mr. Tan ultimately sued in 2004 for defamation, itself a rare occurrence in Vietnamese-American communities, where disputes are usually hashed out internally. A civil court jury found Mr. Le and his co-authors liable.An appeals court overturned that verdict, but then last month Washington's highest court restored the jury's original finding, and the $310,000 award to Mr. Tan and the Vietnamese Community of Thurston County, a civic group. Mr. Le's lawyers have asked the court to reconsider.But the scorched-earth battle has already changed the community, residents said.A Vietnamese language school, which Mr. Tan once led as principal, shrank in the aftermath of the controversy: from 120 students a decade ago to about 60 now, the current principal said. Large gatherings once common for cultural celebration in the Olympia area, like the New Year, have faded or stopped entirely in the last few years."We are trying to avoid additional conflict, or labeling," said Hiep Tran, 50, a transportation analyst for the state.Mai Vu, 55, said she became convinced in the 1970s, after a few years in America, that rallies and demonstrations were futile in ridding Vietnam of the Communists. But now, she said, she feels a concern that not being seen as anti-communist enough could invite attack."When we don't go out in the street and denounce and say, 'Down with the Communists,' then we are communist sympathizers," she said. "That's the trouble that I see, and I have a problem with that."Mr. Tan said an interview here in his lawyer's office (where Mr. Tran and Ms. Vu were also interviewed, invited by Mr. Tan and his family to speak about the community) that he is not a Communist, and that the very idea is insulting. Speaking through an interpreter, he said he believed the accusations by Mr. Le arose over a personal dispute about leadership of a civic committee."I believe it was a personal disagreement, a personal vendetta," Mr. Tan said.Mr. Le, in an interview in his daughter's house in nearby Lacey, remained adamant, too. He spoke the truth, he said, and regrets nothing.
WASHINGTON — Six years ago this month, re-election campaign looming, Senator Mary L. Landrieu of Louisiana joined 15 other Democrats to shoot down an overhaul of the immigration system, which she said encouraged "illegal behavior" with "a generous path to citizenship" for "people who have broken the law to enter this country."Ms. Landrieu's next campaign is already upon her. Republicans have made her a prime target in their quest to retake the Senate in 2014. But on immigration, her tone has changed markedly, as has what she called her own internal political compass."Sometimes it just takes awhile for issues to marinate," Ms. Landrieu said, indicating she is a likely "yes" on a Senate bill offering a route to citizenship for 11 million people in the country illegally. "You can kind of feel like the public is ready to do this, and wants to do it."As the Senate prepares a pivotal vote on Monday to end debate on a border-security amendment that is expected to bring some reluctant Republicans on board, Ms. Landrieu's about-face reflects a new political reality in which conservative Democrats like her are uniting with moderate Republicans to help carry the legislation across the finish line. If the amendment goes forward on Monday with more than the 60 votes needed to avoid a filibuster, the bill is almost certain to pass, probably by Thursday or Friday.In 2007, a bipartisan, left-right coalition brought down an immigration bill that had the backing of the Senate's most senior leaders, as well as the White House. The qualms from the right over "amnesty" for workers here illegally were nearly matched in intensity by fears on the left that new guest-worker programs and millions of newly legal workers would expand unemployment and depress wages.But advocates of the newest version of a comprehensive immigration overhaul say the large Democratic defections that helped sink the last bill will be minimized this time — in part because of changes to the legislation and in part because the bill's time has finally come as far as Democrats are concerned.Officially, at least half a dozen Democrats — along with the liberal independent Senator Bernard Sanders — remain undecided, a number that could doom the chances that the immigration bill can get the 60 votes it will need to reach a final vote.Conservative Democrats like Joe Manchin III of West Virginia; Max Baucus and Jon Tester of Montana; and Mark Pryor of Arkansas have pressed for stronger border security measures to be added to the base bill written by a bipartisan group of eight senators this year, a demand met on Friday in an agreement reached by Senators Bob Corker of Tennessee and John Hoeven of North Dakota, both Republicans. Their amendment would double the border control force at a cost of roughly $30 billion.Liberals like Mr. Sanders and Senator Tom Harkin, Democrat of Iowa, remain concerned about new visa programs and their effect on American workers and wages. The jobless rate, 7.6 percent, is three percentage points higher than six years ago, and income inequality has widened."Bottom line is, unemployment is high, wages are low, and it is absurd to bring hundreds of thousands of low-wage workers into this country," Mr. Sanders said.But pressed on their final votes, most Democrats concede that barring an abrupt shift in the political climate, they will almost certainly fall in line behind their leaders. Negotiators laid the groundwork early by uniting organized labor behind an overhaul that badly divided unions six years ago. Efforts by Republican supporters of the bill to squelch a nativist backlash has redounded to the favor of Democrats in Republican states."Clearly the Republican Party, after demagoguing against immigrants, has determined that's not in their political interest anymore," said Senator Debbie Stabenow, Democrat of Michigan, who six years ago opposed a bill she called "amnesty" and "Social Security for illegal immigrants."
WASHINGTON — Chad Griffin, a gay rights advocate, has arrived twice this month at the Supreme Court with his bags packed, ready to fly off to a rally if the court rules on same-sex marriage . Ted Olson, a veteran lawyer who argued the case, will be sitting in court on Monday, just in case. And Lisa Blatt, a Supreme Court litigator, is one of many Washington court watchers who will be eagerly refreshing her Web browser.They will be joined, if Twitter is any guide, by thousands of anxious, curious people across the country eagerly waiting for the court to rule on a remarkable number of major cases with huge implications. With just days remaining in its 2013 schedule, the court has left dangling its considered opinions on same-sex marriage, affirmative action and the nation's voting rights laws."We all crave information instantaneously," said Ms. Blatt, a lawyer at Arnold & Porter who has argued 33 cases before the court, including one that is still pending this year. Last Monday, and again last Thursday, she found herself scouring legal blogs, looking for whatever clues might exist."I always thought those people were strange, and there I was, doing it," she said. "People are dying to know something that they can't."In a city beset by leaks — a young programmer recently gave a hoard of top-secret documents to newspapers — the high court's annual rulings remain stubbornly opaque until they are handed out (on paper, first) by the court's public relations staff. Meanwhile, the nine justices have the luxury of appearing publicly oblivious to the swirl of social media, the angst of Washington's legal community and the voracious appetite of America's 24-hour news cycle.Many Washington institutions are making the high-tech transition; even the chairman of the Federal Reserve holds regular news conferences now. But like the Kremlinologists of the cold war, who deduced Communist power struggles by a leader's presence on the Red Square reviewing stand, modern-day court watchers can do little more than speculate about when and how the court might rule."You never know when it's going to come down," said Mr. Olson, a former solicitor general who would know, if anyone would. A court observer for decades, he has shown up on each of the last three decision days at the court. "I just try to prepare for anything."Mr. Griffin is a founder of the American Foundation for Equal Rights, the organization that filed the legal challenge to Proposition 8, which banned same-sex marriage in California. Four times in the last two weeks, the court has issued decisions in other cases but not about that law's constitutionality. Each time, Mr. Griffin has returned home and unpacked, lest his suits become wrinkled.On Monday, Mr. Griffin will return once again, joined by the four plaintiffs in the case, who plan to stay in Washington until the high court rules, before they return home to California. If the court overturns the ballot initiative, the couples hope to have a wedding ceremony as soon as possible.Across California, gay rights organizations have started many early mornings refreshing their Web pages for news and then going back to bed. Staff members at the Los Angeles Gay and Lesbian Center have elaborate plans for action after any outcome, and they are preparing to head into the office in the early morning as they anticipate widespread celebration or protest in West Hollywood.And lawyers at the office of California's attorney general, Kamala D. Harris, have been preparing for weeks with legal memos anticipating a wide range of possible outcomes.The Web is ready, too. On Thursday, after the justices once again did not issue rulings in any of the biggest cases, news organizations blared the "news" to their followers. "BREAKING NEWS: No major decisions from Supreme Court today," the Yahoo News site announced on its Twitter feed. Another Twitter user wryly observed: "Clearly all Supreme Court judges were unpopular kids in high school and, excited by all the attention now, are gonna drag this out."A year ago, in the minutes before the court announced its decision on President Obama's health care law, Twitter users posted more than 13,000 messages a minute about the court. (By comparison, there were 160,000 a minute at the height of the presidential debate in Denver last year.)The court's term is dwindling fast. The schedule calls for a round of rulings on Monday, and court observers believe the justices may issue decisions on Wednesday and Thursday as well. There has been speculation of a July 1 session, though Chief Justice John G. Roberts Jr. is scheduled to teach a class on the history of the Supreme Court in Prague on July 2.There will be other issues in Washington this week. The Senate is set to take a final vote on an immigration overhaul, perhaps on Thursday. (If the court overturns the federal Defense of Marriage Act first, lawmakers may not need to seek immigration protections for same-sex partners of immigrants, advocates said.)But most of the intellectual guesswork will be about the justices and their rulings.There are ways, if you know them, to offer educated guesses about the timing and authorship (if not the substance) of the court's coming decisions. The tricks have become de rigueur among the Washington social set, whose members swap Supreme Court theories at cocktail parties the way Angelenos swap movie industry gossip."Everybody around this time starts to try to predict who has the decision and what it's going to say," said Irving L. Gornstein, the executive director of the Supreme Court Institute at Georgetown University. Mr. Gornstein calls himself a "participant" in the court-guessing parlor games. This year, he said, is the worst he can remember."Here you have four huge cases, which is really extraordinary for a Supreme Court term," Mr. Gornstein said. "I can't remember when you've had this many cases at the end of a term."Among the tricks of the court-watching trade is knowing that each of the justices is assigned to write the majority opinion in at least one case during each two-week "sitting," when cases are heard for oral arguments. On Monday, if there are rulings yet to be announced from a particular sitting, and a justice who has not yet written an opinion from that set of cases, that justice might be a good bet.Knowledgeable observers also keep close watch on the number of boxes of rulings set out by the public information officers at the court. The more boxes, the more rulings."It is a game that everybody's playing because it's so important," Mr. Olson said. "These decisions are really important to the people involved, and they have consequences for a long time."
What's in the Senate Immigration Bill: Enough Republicans and Democrats have come to a compromise on an immigration bill that passage seems likely. Certain elements of the plan, however, may prove tough for the House of Representatives.WASHINGTON — The bipartisan push to overhaul the nation's immigration laws took a major step forward Monday evening when the Senate endorsed a proposal to substantially bolster security along the nation's southern borders as part of a measure that would provide a path to citizenship for 11 million undocumented immigrants already in the country.The 67-to-27 vote prevented any filibuster of the plan to devote roughly $40 billion over the next decade to border enforcement measures, including nearly doubling the number of border agents to 40,000 and completing 700 miles of fencing. Opponents of the measure questioned whether the security steps would ever be taken and said that the legislation should require that the border be secure before undocumented immigrants could seek legal status.But the solid bipartisan support for the border security proposal by two Republican senators, Bob Corker of Tennessee and John Hoeven of North Dakota, suggested that advocates of the overhaul had the votes needed to clear remaining hurdles and pass the legislation, which was drafted by a bipartisan "Gang of Eight" senators, perhaps before lawmakers leave town for the July Fourth recess.Senators and aides said that Monday's vote offered a preliminary glimpse of how many senators, roughly, would vote for the bill's final passage. Several senators missed the vote because of flight delays, and Democrats said they could have landed at least 69 votes had all legislators been present."The bill has been improved dramatically tonight by this vote, there's no question," Mr. Corker said. "Hopefully there will be other improvements made with other amendments, and my sense is we're going to pass an immigration bill out of the United States Senate, which will be no doubt historic."Earlier Monday, speaking at the White House to business leaders in favor of the legislation, President Obama called for speedy action: "Now is the time to do it," he said.The Corker-Hoeven plan helped bring on board more than a dozen Republicans, many of whom said they were reluctant to support any immigration overhaul that did not secure the southern border and guard against a future wave of illegal immigrants. Their amendment will also require a $3.2 billion high-tech border surveillance plan — including drone aircraft and long-range thermal imaging cameras — as well as an electronic employment verification system and a visa entry/exit system at all air and sea ports.All those security measures must be in place before any undocumented immigrant can become a legal permanent resident and receive a green card.Any final bill passed by the Senate will head to the Republican-controlled House, where it already faces vocal opposition. Speaker John A. Boehner has publicly said that he will not bring any immigration bill up for a vote that does not have the support of a majority of House Republicans. That decision pleased the conservative wing of his caucus but also raises hurdles for any broad immigration bill in the House, where many Republicans oppose any pathway to citizenship."I think that we're on track to move the bill forward and then remember, it's got to go to the House," Mr. Hoeven said. "There's more work to be done, but we're working on it, we're making progress — more to do — but we want to continue to improve it in the Senate and likewise in the House."Speaking earlier on the Senate floor, Mr. Corker urged his colleagues to vote for the amendment, while also reminding them that a "yes" vote on the Corker-Hoeven proposal did not necessarily translate into support for the final legislation."I hope everyone will get behind this," Mr. Corker said. "I think this puts in place a balance, and I think if this amendment is passed we will be doing something great for our nation."
WASHINGTON — With the Senate days away from passing the most significant immigration legislation in a generation, House Republicans say they feel no pressure to act quickly on a similar measure, leaving the fate of the bill very much in doubt despite solid bipartisan Senate support."We have a minority of the minority in the Senate voting for this bill," said Representative Tom Cole, Republican of Oklahoma, referring to the 15 or so Republicans expected to back the Senate measure. "That's not going to put a lot of pressure on the majority of the majority in the House."Two senior House Republican leadership aides were more blunt when speaking privately: Speaker John A. Boehner has no intention of angering conservative voters and jeopardizing the House Republican majority in 2014 in the interest of courting Hispanic voters on behalf of a 2016 Republican presidential nominee who does not yet exist.If anything, the politics of a gerrymandered House where Republican lawmakers have much more to fear politically from the right than from the left could push many Republicans to oppose a conservative alternative to the Senate's plan.Even advocates of a comprehensive immigration bill that includes a pathway to legalization for unauthorized immigrants now in the country say that Senate passage as early as Friday would not change House sentiment quickly."The House is not going to get logrolled by the Senate," said Representative Paul D. Ryan of Wisconsin, who lost his bid to be vice president last year in part because of the Republican Party's abysmal showing with immigrant voters. "We'll have a more methodical, patient way of doing this."The outcome of Monday's crucial vote in the Senate on added border security provided evidence of the difficulty of getting an immigration measure produced in the Democrat-controlled Senate through the Republican-held House. All of the Senate's Republican leadership opposed the border plan. States represented by the 15 Senate Republicans who backed the proposal have 56 Republican House members, and senators from two of the states — South Carolina and Mississippi — split. The states represented by 30 Republican senators who opposed the border plan or indicated they would — a good gauge of local political sentiment — have 123 Republican members of the House."Can we pass a House bill? It's a very open question," said Representative Charlie Dent of Pennsylvania, a leading voice among a shrinking group of moderate Republicans. For Republicans, the stakes are high and the crosscurrents are strong. Advocates of the Senate bill say the future of the national Republican Party could rest on how this issue plays out. Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, who helped write the measure, said Tuesday that "the passion level" among Hispanic voters on the immigration issue "is as high as on any issue I've observed.""If we can't grow our numbers, particularly among Hispanics, it's pretty hard to win the White House in 2016," said Senator Lindsey Graham, Republican of South Carolina, another of the bill's authors. "Don't get me wrong. Conservatism sells, and after eight years of Obama, people will be looking around for someone new. But it's hard to sell your economic agenda if they think you're going to deport their grandmother."On the other hand, a vote for legislation like the Senate bill could hold real peril for House Republicans, whose solidly Republican districts reward politicians who take the most conservative positions on issues. A new poll by National Journal found that nearly half of Republican voters, 49 percent, said a lawmaker who backs legislation offering a pathway to citizenship would lose their support. Thirty percent said it would make no difference. Only 15 percent said such a vote would make them more likely to back their incumbent."I think most members look at this with a great deal of trepidation," Mr. Cole said.What the House's methodical approach yields may determine the ultimate fate of immigration legislation in the 113th Congress. If the House can pass its own immigration bill, lawmakers will have a counteroffer to bring to the voters next year — even if the House and Senate bills cannot be reconciled into a final package for President Obama to sign.That dynamic played out in 2006, when the Senate passed a comprehensive immigration bill, the House passed a measure bolstering border security without offering new paths to legal immigration, and both bills died with the 109th Congress.
WASHINGTON — The sweeping immigration measure advancing rapidly in the Senate goes far beyond much-debated border security measures and a path to citizenship for undocumented immigrants with a crucial requirement that could affect every American who takes a new job in the future.The provision, a linchpin of the legislation, would require all employers in the country within five years to use a federal electronic system to verify the legal eligibility to work of every new hire, including American citizens.The verification plan has united an unusual array of supporters — including Democrats protective of workers' rights and Republicans normally skeptical of government intrusion — who say it is essential for preventing illegal immigration in the future because it would remove the jobs magnet that attracts migrants to this country.But there has been little debate up to now about the provision to expand the federal system, which is known as E-Verify, and critics of the measure as well as some proponents worry that most Americans are unaware of the mandate's broad scope. The system relies on imperfect federal databases that contain errors, and when it goes national, some Americans are likely to face unexpected bureaucratic headaches and could even lose new jobs."I don't think people really understand that this creates a regulation not just for every employer, or for every immigrant, but also for every citizen in this country," said David Bier, an immigration policy analyst at the Competitive Enterprise Institute, a conservative research group that favors limited government and opposes mandatory employee verification.Now, with the bill headed for a final vote in the Senate as early as Thursday, the E-Verify mandate has become the focus of intense last-minute deal making.Senator Rob Portman, Republican of Ohio, has demanded a separate vote on an amendment that would make the requirements even tougher by ordering employers to comply sooner and tightening antifraud measures. Sponsors of the overhaul, which seems headed for passage, are negotiating with Mr. Portman, hoping to win his support to maximize the Republican votes in the final tally.One American who has been watching the progress of the E-Verify provisions with a growing sense of dread is David Borris, the owner of Hel's Kitchen Catering, a small business in Northbrook, Ill. While he agrees with the path to citizenship in the bill, Mr. Borris said he worried that the requirement to check all new employees with E-Verify would bring a host of costly and time-consuming troubles.Mr. Borris said he needed to spend his time finding new customers who are planning banquets and bar mitzvahs, and perfecting the eggplant timbale that is a signature dish of his service."Businesses like mine don't have the resources to be catching up with bureaucratic snafus," he said. Mr. Borris is a leader of the Main Street Alliance network, one of many small business organizations opposing the E-Verify mandate.On Wednesday, talks were still under way between Democratic and Republican leaders in the Senate to try to hold a vote on a several additional amendments, which would likely include the proposal on E-Verify that Mr. Portman offered, together with Senator Jon Tester, Democrat of Montana.The measure would speed up the dates when employers would have to start using the system. It would also increase the use of photograph technology to eliminate a flaw in the system, which can fail to detect unauthorized immigrants who present employers with valid documents belonging to someone else."No matter how many miles of fence we build and how many agents we station on the border, I truly believe people will come to this country illegally as long as they believe America offers a better life and a better job," Mr. Portman said on the Senate floor. Speaking on Wednesday, the senator said, "I believe strongly that if we do not have a stronger employee verification system at the workplace, this legislation is not going to work."Even without Mr. Portman's vote, the overhaul bill appears almost certain to pass. It gathered new momentum Wednesday, when the Senate voted 69 to 29 to formally add a border security plan by two Republican senators, Bob Corker of Tennessee and John Hoeven of North Dakota, to the legislation. Fifteen Republicans supported the proposal, which would cost roughly $40 billion and create what some senators have described as a "border surge," adding 20,000 new border patrol agents and erecting 700 miles of fencing at the southern border, among other measures.
PHOENIX — A push to assuage opposition to the bipartisan immigration bill before Congress by devoting more money and muscle to the task of securing the border with Mexico has yielded at least one unforeseen consequence: It weakened support for the bill among some pro-immigrant groups that had been its most reliable backers.Advocates have staged protests in several cities this week denouncing a plan endorsed by the Senate to inject $40 billion in enforcement measures over the next decade, including 18,000 more Border Patrol agents and 700 more miles of the hulking steel fence that demarcates the countries.Leaders of Presente.org, the nation's largest online Latino advocacy organization, took the step of opposing the broader immigration bill altogether, saying in a statement they could not "in good conscience" stand by it if it is also "guaranteed to increase death and destruction through increased militarization of the border."Other advocates are considering the same path as they increasingly shift their criticism to the Democrats. In closed-door meetings, many have accused Democrats of giving up on a balanced compromise over immigration reform just to move the bill forward."Is this the way they're going to, quote-unquote, resolve immigration issues?" said Fernando Garcia, executive director for the Border Network for Human Rights, based in El Paso, Tex.The group is one of several that signed a letter to the bipartisan "Gang of Eight" senators who drafted the bill, denouncing the border-security proposal, an amendment by two Republican senators, Bob Corker of Tennessee and John Hoeven of North Dakota, that they said made no mention of the families it is bound to keep apart."This amendment makes border communities a sacrificial lamb, in exchange for the road to citizenship," said Christian Ramirez, director of the Southern Border Communities Coalition, based in San Diego.By focusing on border security, the Corker-Hoeven plan — brought to a vote quickly and under criticism by conservative legislators, who said they had not been given enough time to digest it — helped break the resistance of more than a dozen Republican senators to overhauling immigration laws. Fifteen of them joined Democrats to advance the measure by a vote of 67-27.Its provisions, the toughest in the history of border-enforcement buildup, got Mexico to break its silence on Tuesday, when Foreign Minister José Antonio Meade told reporters: "Fences do not unite us. They are not the solution to the migratory phenomenon and are not consistent with a secure and modern border."The approach did draw praise from Gov. Jan Brewer of Arizona, who signed a law in 2010 that reignited the debate over illegal immigration in the United States. She stopped short of lending her support to the bill before Congress. "I have faith that House Republicans will improve the bill by making securing our border the top priority," she said.At a meeting here on Wednesday, in the fellowship room of a church on the edge of downtown, leaders of 20 immigrant rights' groups grappled with what to do next. One, Carlos Garcia, executive director of Puente, said: "There's no outrage at what's going on. We can't just put our head down and accept this is the best we're going to get."Máxima Guerrero, of the Arizona Dream Act Coalition, asked, "Where do we actually draw the line?" Reyna Montoya, Arizona organizer for United We Dream, said that no matters what happens, "We're not willing to compromise on citizenship."Petra Falcón, executive director of Promise Arizona, who worked for 15 years along the southern border, said the Corker-Hoeven amendment "caught a lot of people off guard" and called it "overkill" because of the amount of resources it devotes to security.But Ms. Falcón said "there are still good pieces left" in the broader immigration bill, like a path to citizenship for many of the immigrants who are in the country illegally."The question we have to ask ourselves is, can we live with this as it is and continue our work to make other changes down the road?" she said. "I'd rather be at the table fighting than say we're going to stop this now."
WASHINGTON — The Senate on Thursday approved the most significant overhaul of the nation's immigration laws in a generation with broad support generated by a sense among leading Republicans that the party needed to join with Democrats to remove a wedge between Republicans and Hispanic voters.The strong 68-to-32 vote in the often polarized Senate tossed the issue into the House, where the Republican leadership has said that it will not take up the Senate measure and is instead focused on much narrower legislation that would not provide a path to citizenship for the 11 million unauthorized immigrants in the country. Party leaders hope that the Senate action will put pressure on the House.Leading up to the final votes, which the senators cast at their desks to mark the import of the moment, members of the bipartisan "Gang of Eight," who drafted the framework of the legislation, took to the Senate floor to make a final argument for the measure. Among them was Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, who is one of his party's leading Hispanic voices. When Mr. Rubio finished, the other senators in the group surrounded him on the floor, patting him on the back and offering words of encouragement. "Good job," one said. "I'm proud of you," another offered.The future will show whether voters in Republican presidential primaries share that pride.After Mitt Romney's loss in November, top Republicans immediately began formulating a way to improve the party's standing with Hispanics, who have flocked to Democrats. A group of top Republican political and business officials who support an immigration overhaul met at the downtown Washington office of the anti-tax leader Grover Norquist on Jan. 17 with memories of Mr. Romney's poor showing in their minds.Optimism ran high at the session, which included Mr. Norquist, the former national party chairman Ed Gillespie and representatives of the U.S. Chamber of Commerce and Republican "super PACs." Reeling from a second consecutive presidential loss and with Mr. Rubio taking the place of Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, as the face of the immigration reform movement, the strategists were hopeful that the wall of conservative opposition that blocked immigration legislation under President George W. Bush could be breached.Now, even after the lopsided Senate vote, the prospects appear grim for the pro-overhaul Republicans. And Mr. Rubio, the 42-year-old Cuban-American who is seen as a prime White House contender in 2016, is confronting rising criticism from conservatives for pushing legislation with Democratic boogeymen like President Obama and Senator Charles E. Schumer of New York."Before the Gang of Eight and the immigration debate, I think many conservatives as well as some establishment Republican folks saw Senator Rubio as a possible bridge candidate between the conservative Tea Party base of the G.O.P. and more establishment G.O.P. voters," said Greg Mueller, a conservative public relations executive who opposed the Senate bill. "That position is on much shakier ground today because conservatives and the Tea Party see the immigration bill as a big-government piece of legislation resembling Obamacare."Republicans strongly opposed to the immigration bill said they had little sympathy for Mr. Rubio."I don't think we're doing any damage to him," said Representative Tim Huelskamp, Republican of Kansas. "I think he's done damage to himself with the amnesty bill."Alex Conant, Mr. Rubio's spokesman, said: "Immigration is a personal issue for Senator Rubio, and he took it on because he thought it was the right thing to do. There may be some political implications, especially in the short term, but it wasn't an issue he believed he could ignore. We don't expect any parades for our work on this."On Thursday, Mr. Rubio had little cover from his party's right flank, much less a parade.  Not wanting to tempt primary opponents next year, the top two Senate Republican leaders — Mitch McConnell of Kentucky and John Cornyn of Texas — cast "no" votes.  And a potential 2016 presidential primary rival for Mr. Rubio, Senator Rand Paul of Kentucky, also voted against the legislation, despite making a show of announcing his general support for an immigration overhaul earlier in the year.
WASHINGTON — Even as they were popping corks on Thursday night after a strong bipartisan vote in the Senate to pass an immigration bill, supporters of the overhaul were laying plans for the far more difficult task of moving something similar through the Republican-controlled House.Speaker John A. Boehner of Ohio insisted on Thursday that the House would not take up the Senate bill and would pass its own measure only if a majority of Republicans backed it, instead of relying more on Democratic votes.As a sign of the conservative direction of the debate in the House, its Judiciary Committee recently approved a bill to enforce immigration laws away from the nation's borders that was much tougher than anything from the Senate. The House has yet to produce a bill that includes a core piece of the Senate legislation: a path to citizenship for 11 million unauthorized immigrants in the country.While supporters are hardly confident, they say House Republicans will soon discover a crucial difference this year from failed immigration efforts of the past. They say their coalition is broader and far more energized and committed than in 2007, when an immigration overhaul by President George W. Bush did not even reach a vote in the Senate.Latinos, who showed their strength when they overwhelmingly supported President Obama last November, are a leading force, but are not the only one, supporters said. Business and technology industry groups, labor unions, agricultural growers, farmworkers, law enforcement associations, churches, educators, youth groups and other immigrant organizations are also in the mix.The diversity gives supporters a variety of pressure points for approaching reluctant House Republicans, said Clarissa Martínez de Castro, an organizer for NCLR, the national Latino organization also known as the National Council of La Raza. A lawmaker who does not have many Latino voters in a district might have vegetable farmers, or labor unions, or a university, or an evangelical Christian megachurch, she said.Asked why he thought the overhaul had a fighting chance in the House, Ali Noorani, a veteran of many immigration wars, pointed to a big green mobile billboard that had circled Capitol Hill every day this week.Its flashing message was "Praying for immigrants. Praying for Congress." Groups of evangelical Christians prayed on the Capitol lawn for the Senate to pass its bill. Mr. Noorani's group, the National Immigration Forum, has worked with Southern Baptists and other large evangelical denominations to coordinate prayer campaigns and run pro-overhaul spots on Christian radio stations in states where lawmakers might be persuaded to change their views."In 2007, we weren't even on the radar," said the Rev. Samuel Rodríguez, the president of the National Hispanic Christian Leadership Conference, an evangelical group. Mr. Rodríguez said he had been on the road continuously, addressing primarily non-Hispanic Christian conferences to spread the message on the overhaul.Business groups are also pledging to stay in the fray."What will shock a lot of people in the House is the level of interest and intensity of the business community compared to 2007," said Scott Corley, the executive director of Compete America, which represents tech companies that are pressing for an increase in visas for skilled immigrants.In 2007, Silicon Valley companies stayed in the background, and after a bruising and finally fruitless fight with labor unions, the U.S. Chamber of Commerce lost enthusiasm. This year, the Senate bill includes a compromise that the chamber and the A.F.L-C.I.O. worked out to bring in low-wage migrant workers in the future, as well as provisions for high-skilled immigrants.On Thursday, the House Judiciary Committee approved its own bill to offer more visas for foreign computer engineers and scientists, which was also to the liking of Mr. Corley and leaders of other tech groups. But Mr. Corley said tech companies remained convinced that such measures had to be part of a comprehensive package like the Senate bill, including the path to citizenship for unauthorized immigrants.
An American man in Florida and his husband, who is from Bulgaria, have become the first same-sex married couple to be approved for a permanent resident visa, an immigration milestone that comes after the Supreme Court struck down a federal law against same-sex marriage .The notice of approval of a permanent visa, known as a green card, was issued by e-mail late Friday to Traian Popov, a Bulgarian immigrant who lives with his American spouse, Julian Marsh, in Fort Lauderdale, Fla. The approval was evidence that the Obama administration was acting swiftly to change its visa policies in the wake of the court's decision on Wednesday invalidating the Defense of Marriage Act, or DOMA.The approval came so fast that it took the couple's immigration lawyer, Lavi Soloway, by surprise. Mr. Soloway, who represents many same-sex couples, said he received the official message while he was attending the annual conference in San Francisco of the American Immigration Lawyers Association."I thought, 'Am I reading this wrong?' " Mr. Soloway said in an interview on Saturday. Although it was a professional setting, he said, he began to weep with emotion when he realized the significance of the notice.The Supreme Court's decision has had a significant impact in cases involving United States citizens who are seeking green cards for foreign spouses of the same sex. DOMA, which defined marriage as a union between a man and a woman, had prohibited the federal government from recognizing same-sex marriages as the grounds for any visa.Speaking by telephone on Sunday from the couple's home, Mr. Marsh said that he turned 55 on Friday and that he and Mr. Popov were celebrating with dinner at a Red Lobster restaurant when they received news of the unprecedented green card."It was just kind of a shock, like winning the lottery," said Mr. Marsh, a music producer. "The amazing overwhelming fact is that the government said yes, and my husband and I can live in the country we chose and we love and want to stay in."Mr. Popov, 41, said he had been living legally in the United States for 15 years with a series of student visas. He has completed three master's degrees, he said, and is working on a doctorate in social science at Nova Southeastern University in Florida. The couple married in New York last year, and they applied for a green card in February.Immigration officials said the visa agency, United States Immigration and Citizenship Services, would announce new procedures early this week for same-sex binational couples seeking green cards. The first approval was also supposed to be issued this week, officials acknowledged, but eager officers at the agency pressed the button on the notice on Friday.For the last two years, the agency has kept a list of same-sex couples whose green card petitions were denied, the officials said, anticipating that the Supreme Court would eventually weigh in on DOMA. Those denials will now be reversed without couples having to present new applications, if no other issues have arisen. Gay couples with no denials, like Mr. Marsh and Mr. Popov, will move through the system at the same pace as traditional spouses, officials said.Mr. Popov said he would work to quickly finish his doctorate since he will now be able to seek a job legally. He and Mr. Marsh said they also planned to become same-sex marriage activists in Florida, a state that does not recognize such unions. "We are first-class citizens in New York and in the eyes of the federal government, but second-class citizens in Florida," Mr. Marsh said. "We won't stand for that."
WASHINGTON — Fox News viewers in Florida will see a new commercial in the coming weeks urging them to call Senator Marco Rubio . "Thank him for keeping his promise, and fighting to secure the border," a narrator says in the ad, which is paid for by the conservative American Action Network.Another group, Americans for a Conservative Direction, led by former Gov. Haley Barbour of Mississippi and other top Republicans, has been running ads in Iowa lately that implore those watching to "stand with Marco Rubio to end de facto amnesty."And when the Americans for Prosperity Foundation, the Koch brothers' political advocacy group, decided to move its signature annual conference outside Washington for the first time, it picked a spot right in Mr. Rubio's political backyard: Orlando. The keynote speaker? Mr. Rubio.Mr. Rubio's advocacy for a proposal that would allow immigrants here illegally to gain a path to citizenship has made him a pariah among some rank-and-file Republicans.But many of the most powerful and well-financed forces in the party are moving to provide cover for the Florida senator and Republicans like him who are pushing to overhaul the nation's immigration system.Their message: if we ever want to take back the White House, we have to stop devouring our own.As the party assesses its chances for the 2016 presidential campaign, many Republican strategists believe that they need as robust a primary field as possible, with more than just one or two viable potential contenders.A messy fight over a subject as touchy as illegal immigration is a prospect many Republican leaders are eager to avoid, especially since three of their best hopes for 2016 are closely tied to the debate: Mr. Rubio, former Gov. Jeb Bush of Florida, and Representative Paul D. Ryan of Wisconsin, who is expected to play a vital role once the House starts debating the issue next week."I think we have a great bench," said Carlos Gutierrez, who was commerce secretary under President George W. Bush and leads the "super PAC" Republicans for Immigration Reform. "It's whether we can stop becoming our own worst enemy."Mr. Rubio is just one of several top Republicans who have taken a political risk by supporting the immigration plan that passed the Senate last week, but his situation is the most urgent. No public figure other than President Obama is mentioned more often in news coverage of the immigration debate, an analysis by Kantar Media News Intelligence showed. Mr. Rubio appears in articles almost twice as often as Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, who has often taken the lead in Senate negotiations.His words have been turned into television commercials by groups on both sides of the issue. And no one has taken on more friendly fire. Mr. Rubio has been attacked at Tea Party rallies (his name elicits boos), on conservative radio ("a piece of garbage," Glenn Beck called him) and in National Review ("Rubio's Folly," declared a recent cover).Still, running interference on Mr. Rubio's behalf is fraught with risk for conservative groups, who are going against many in their own base."We know that there's a lot of folks on both sides," said Tim Phillips, president of Americans for Prosperity. "But I think the vast majority of people appreciate the fact that Senator Rubio is doing what he thinks is best for the country. And that he's doing it in an open and honest way."Mr. Phillips declined to discuss any implications for Mr. Rubio and 2016, but said, "We think that he's got a bright future within the movement, and in whatever he chooses to do down the road."Many other big players in the conservative movement would like to keep that future bright as well.Ralph Reed, president of the Faith and Freedom Coalition, invited Mr. Rubio to speak to several hundred of his members at a conference in Washington last month. Mr. Reed, who has made clear that he believes the Senate immigration bill that Mr. Rubio helped write is too lenient, described the crowd as right-leaning, by Republican standards. "Not the Chamber of Commerce variety," he noted wryly in an interview.But when he introduced Mr. Rubio, he offered nothing but effusive praise. "We're proud to count him as our friend because he has not forgotten who got him here," Mr. Reed told the crowd, which applauded politely. "He has not forgotten who he is."Weighing heavily on conservative leaders is a reminder of how immigration policy bedeviled Mitt Romney last year. His "self-deport" comments about what should happen with the 11 million immigrants living illegally in the United States became an easy punch line for Democrats and helped drive Latinos even farther away from the Republican Party.And many see the success of an immigration reform package shaped with considerable input from Republicans like Mr. Rubio as key to their future, and his."Certainly the way in which the bill is perceived and Rubio's own political fortunes are closely entwined," said Steven Law, president of American Crossroads, Karl Rove's political outfit, which plans to play a larger role in the debate once House Republicans get deeper into their discussions."Our first priority is to promote and advance immigration reform, and to talk about the ways this advances conservative goals," Mr. Law added. "If we do that we will not only be helping to move legislation, but it will also protect those who stuck their necks out like Rubio."Mr. Rubio is not the only beneficiary of such efforts. Republicans who backed the measure, including Senators Lindsey Graham of South Carolina, who is up for re-election next year, and Kelly Ayotte of New Hampshire, another of the party's rising stars, have attracted support.The U.S. Chamber of Commerce, one of the most active and well-financed proponents of immigration reform, began a seven-figure nationwide ad campaign last week featuring Mr. Rubio, Mr. Ryan and Senator Rand Paul of Kentucky, another 2016 contender.And before its new Florida ad campaign, the American Action Network had already spent nearly three-quarters of a million dollars on pro-immigration-reform commercials featuring Mr. Rubio and Mr. Gutierrez.After Ms. Ayotte came out in support of the Senate bill and criticism from the right rained down on her, Republicans coordinated a response campaign that included a news conference hosted by four former Republican state party chairmen.
GONZALES, Tex. — The questions about immigration at Representative Blake Farenthold's town meeting were urgent and to the point.So were the answers.Mr. Farenthold, a Republican, told an audience here on Tuesday that the overhaul of the nation's immigration laws that recently passed the Senate "doesn't stand a snowball's chance in hell in the House of Representatives."The 70 or so constituents — largely older, largely white — who filled the small, warm room in the Gonzales Municipal Building were more curious than combative, more earnest than angry. They wanted to know, for instance, why Mr. Farenthold thought that Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida, had supported the Senate's immigration bill, which includes a path to citizenship for 11 million unauthorized immigrants in the country. "I think he wants to be president," Mr. Farenthold said with a laugh.Mr. Farenthold embodies the challenge for advocates of major immigration changes as they press the issue in the House. Even though he represents a district with a significant population of Hispanics, he has strong reservations about providing a path to full citizenship for unauthorized immigrants, a provision that backers of the Senate measure consider a condition of their support. Mr. Farenthold instead favors what he calls "earned legalization" — a process in which immigrants would have to meet a series of conditions for remaining in the United States. Immigration advocates say that approach would create a second class of people who could never become citizens."My deal is you start as far to the right as you can get, and go to the conference committee with the Senate, and hopefully end up with something you can live with," Mr. Farenthold said in an interview after his event. "Getting to citizenship is going to be tough, but never say never."Mr. Farenthold is among the House Republicans who have expressed some openness to an immigration overhaul. Elected in 2010 on the Tea Party wave, he defeated a longtime Democratic incumbent by 800 votes. His district at the time stretched from Corpus Christi down to Brownsville, on the border with Mexico, with Hispanics making up more than 70 percent of the population.After a politically favorable redrawing of his district after the 2010 census, Mr. Farenthold now holds what is considered a safe Republican seat, with a decreased, but still significant, share of Hispanics — 49.5 percent, according to the census.For many other House Republicans, however, the redistricting changes were starker, creating little political incentive to support an immigration overhaul.Only 24 Republicans sit in districts that are more than 25 percent Latino, and last year Mitt Romney won 17 of those districts by more than 10 points. That leaves, said David Wasserman, the House editor for The Cook Political Report, only a handful of districts that are "substantially Latino and remotely competitive."Redistricting, Mr. Wasserman added, "makes the Republican majority in the House almost impenetrable," but it also makes the job of Speaker John A. Boehner "almost unmanageable."Representative Steve Israel, Democrat of New York and the chairman of the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee, described the Republican predicament similarly. "Redistricting puts them in a very difficult position when they're contemplating voting for immigration reform," he said. "They know in their hearts it's the right thing to do, but their political brain is blaring warning signals that they're exposing themselves to a primary from the Tea Party and extreme right-wing base."In person, Mr. Farenthold can come off as slightly goofy. He is fleshy, with a gap between his top front teeth, and he kicked off his hourlong question-and-answer session by joking, "We can now play stump the congressman with questions." After the event, he turned to his district director and said good-naturedly: "You never got me a Dr Pepper, Bob. That's a hashtag fail." Moments later, the soda appeared.
WASHINGTON — Senator Harry Reid was as outspoken on the need for new immigration laws 20 years ago as he is today. But his viewpoint was markedly different."If you break our laws by entering this country without permission and give birth to a child, we reward that child with U.S. citizenship and guarantee full access to all public and social services this society provides, and that's a lot of services," Mr. Reid said in a 1993 Senate speech that would mesh easily with the current opposition to the newly passed Senate immigration overhaul.Now Mr. Reid, the Nevada Democrat and majority leader, is a chief advocate of creating a path to citizenship for millions of unauthorized immigrants. Not only did he embrace the cause of Hispanics to help him win a difficult re-election race in 2010, he has shown national party leaders the advantages of a strong pro-immigration stance.Behind the scenes, he put intense pressure on the Obama White House to ease deportation rules in 2012, a policy change that stoked Hispanic voter enthusiasm crucial to President Obama's re-election.It is a remarkable transformation, one Mr. Reid readily acknowledged recently as he began to press the House for action on immigration."I came to the realization that I was way off base," Mr. Reid said of his prior stance, one he said he reversed after his wife, Landra, reminded him that she was the daughter of a Russian immigrant. "I am so glad she righted the ship."Immigration is not the only issue on which Mr. Reid has evolved. He has shifted to the left on gun control and gay rights over the years and now he is threatening to force through a rules change on filibusters, something he has been reluctant to do in the past.Given his leadership role, Mr. Reid's about-face on immigration had significant consequences for both the policy and politics surrounding the topic. His ability to build a winning campaign around an issue that Democrats in swing states typically tried to avoid provided a road map for Congressional candidates as well as the Obama campaign."He was able to speak to them as someone who had risked his political career on leaning in on a controversial immigration issue and lived to tell about it," said Frank Sharry, head of the pro-immigration group America's Voice. "He spoke with authority and this undeniable credibility."With a rapidly growing Hispanic population back home, Mr. Reid had ample incentive to try to increase his appeal to that constituency and organize Hispanics politically even when others advised against it or saw it as fruitless."People immediately started making fun of me in their own way," he said. 'Why are you wasting your time? No. 1, most of them are illegal. And even if you get some to register, they never vote.' "As he made inroads, Mr. Reid said he reminded Hispanics that the only way to gain political power was to vote. Through his efforts to encourage greater political participation, Mr. Reid said he developed deeper personal ties and a new affinity for the community as he regularly attended local festivals and Christmas and Cinco de Mayo celebrations."They were kind of fun," he said of the events. "They had music and food and people were happy."When it came to the music, Mr. Reid saw a way to help. Never one to shy away from pushing an earmark through the Appropriations Committee, Mr. Reid in 2004 secured a $25,000 grant for Clark County schools in Las Vegas to begin a mariachi program. The federal spending was ridiculed by Citizens Against Government Waste as "La Pork-a-Racha," but it was immensely popular with Hispanic students and their parents."That is one of the best things I have ever done in my political life," said Mr. Reid, who still cannot help smiling about the earmark.For Mr. Reid, the true test of growing Hispanic political might in Nevada came in 2010, when he was deemed to be in jeopardy of losing his seat.
WASHINGTON — Meeting for the first time as a group to hash out their approach to immigration , House Republicans on Wednesday came down overwhelmingly against a comprehensive overhaul of the nation's immigration laws, putting in jeopardy the future of sweeping legislation that includes a path to citizenship for undocumented immigrants.Despite the resistance, Speaker John A. Boehner warned about the steep price of inaction, telling House Republicans that they would be in a weaker political position against a bipartisan Senate coalition and President Obama if they did nothing to answer the immigration measure passed by the Senate last month.House Republicans huddled in a crucial two-and-a-half-hour session in the basement of the Capitol as their leaders tried to devise some response to the demand for immigration legislation, especially the Senate provision that would grant a path to citizenship for the 11 million undocumented immigrants already in the country. The bill also mandates tough border security provisions that must be in place before the immigrants can gain legal status.The bottom line was clear: The Republican-controlled House does not plan to take up anything resembling the Senate bill, which many believe is bad policy and smacks of an amnesty strongly opposed by the conservatives who hold sway over much of the rank and file. The House also does not intend to move very quickly, and some Republicans are wary of passing any measure at all that could lead to negotiations with the Senate, talks that could add pressure to the House to consider a broader plan.The Republicans met just hours after former President George W. Bush added his voice to the immigration debate during a naturalization ceremony at his new presidential center outside Dallas. His speech was a reminder to Republicans that he had long believed it necessary to overhaul the system in a way much as the Senate bill outlined."The laws governing the immigration system aren't working," Mr. Bush said. "The system is broken. We're now in an important debate in reforming those laws. And that's good." Mr. Bush said he did not intend "to get involved in the politics or the specifics of policy. But I do hope there is a positive resolution to the debate, and I hope during the debate that we keep a benevolent spirit in mind and we understand the contributions that immigrants make to our country."House Republican leaders struck a defiant tone after the meeting, issuing a joint statement declaring the Obama administration "cannot be trusted to deliver on its promises to secure the border and enforce laws as part of a single, massive bill like the one passed by the Senate." Mr. Boehner repeatedly reassured Republicans that he would pass nothing through the House that did not have the support of a majority of his party, and lawmakers left the meeting certain that nothing significant would move through the House until September — and possibly much later." 'Comprehensive' has always been a swear word in the House of Representatives, but having a step-by-step approach that deals with the issue comprehensively, I don't think that's dead," said Representative Raúl Labrador, Republican of Idaho, a Hispanic legislator who until recently had been part of a bipartisan group in the House working on a broad immigration proposal.Instead, House Republicans will consider a piecemeal approach, passing several individual bills rather than one large package, as the Senate did. Any immigration proposal, members said, is likely to concentrate on border security and enforcement; a path to legalization or citizenship, they stressed, must come later — if at all.Though they may pass one or two modest bills before the August recess, many members said they felt no urgency to deal with an immigration overhaul, with the fall likely to be dominated by fights over the budget and the federal debt ceiling.House Republicans find themselves in a difficult spot on immigration, caught between the needs of the national party to broaden its appeal to Hispanics, and the views of constituents in gerrymandered, largely safe conservative districts.Many returned to Congress this week after hearing from constituents in their districts who do not trust the federal government to overhaul the nation's immigration laws, as well as mounting evidence that conservative opinion is beginning to harden against a broad immigration push.
WASHINGTON — As opposition to an overhaul of the immigration system hardens in the Republican-controlled House , President Obama is trapped between the need to promote what could be a legacy piece of legislation and the reality that being out front might be counterproductive at best.Immigration advocates, including members of the Congressional Hispanic Caucus, are urging Mr. Obama to undertake a campaign-style push and travel the country giving big speeches to rally support for the bill. "We believe that the president is giving consideration to going across the country and explaining to the American people the benefits that will come from passage of this legislation," said Representative Rubén Hinojosa, Democrat of Texas, after members of the caucus met with the president. "We welcome that."But other lawmakers in the House and Senate who support an immigration overhaul are warning the president to keep a low profile as debate intensifies in the weeks ahead. Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, and Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York, both said Thursday that they wanted the president to play an unobtrusive role."These Republican House members — many of them are in districts that they will be representing for a long time — do not feel that they have been unduly pressured by the president of the United States," Mr. McCain said after a White House meeting with Mr. Obama. "So I think the president is walking a careful line here, and I think it's the appropriate one."Top Republicans in the House have in the meantime told Mr. Obama's staff that an ambitious push by the White House would backfire in trying to persuade conservative House members to support some kind of immigration overhaul."It has been conveyed from the speaker's office to theirs that if a positive outcome is desired, it would be best for the president to stay out of it," one Republican leadership aide said Thursday.The president's political advisers say they are sensitive to the politics of immigration in the House, where an overt pressure campaign for the legislation by Mr. Obama is more likely to persuade Republicans to dig in their heels against the effort. Instead, aides said, Mr. Obama will offer his support to advocacy groups and lawmakers strategically.In the last two days, for example, the White House released reports and videos that argue the economic benefits of an immigration overhaul, but that use neither the president's image nor his voice. White House officials said that the president's support for the legislation has not wavered, but that there are no immediate plans for Mr. Obama to deliver a speech on the issue or to travel for on-the-road immigration events similar to ones he held on gun control, infrastructure investments and early childhood education."The president will continue to do all he can to make the case for reform both publicly and working behind the scenes with supporters of the legislation on Capitol Hill and elsewhere," said Jennifer Palmieri, the White House communications director. "But we are aware of and sensitive to the fact that ultimately how the House Republicans choose to resolve this issue is something for them to decide."The president's strategy of keeping a low profile during debate on immigration legislation in the Senate in June appears to have worked. A bipartisan bill developed by the "Gang of Eight" — four Democratic senators and four Republican senators — passed the Senate in a 68-to-32 vote late last month. Backers of the bill said they hoped the easy passage would put pressure on the House to act.But Speaker John A. Boehner made clear on Thursday that his Republican members did not intend to even consider the Senate legislation."We are not going to do the Senate bill," Mr. Boehner told reporters. Instead, he said, the House may consider a series of smaller bills that address individual parts of the immigration system, like border security or identity verification."It's clear from the conversation yesterday that the vast majority of our members do believe that we have to wrestle with this problem," Mr. Boehner said. "It's clear that dealing with this in bite-size chunks that the members can digest and the American people can digest is the right way to go."Top White House officials said that advocates of an immigration overhaul — including the president, lawmakers and outside campaigners — have to find ways to keep the pressure on those House members. They did not rule out the possibility that Mr. Obama would become more forceful and public if it seemed like the effort was stalled or headed in a direction that immigration activists would not accept.In the coming days, White House officials are planning a conference call with small-business owners to encourage them to stay engaged and Mr. Obama may use his weekly address to call on the House to act.For now, officials said, the president is more likely to wait and see what progress Mr. Boehner and other Republicans make in the House. Republican leaders said this week they did not expect much work to be done before lawmakers leave Washington in August for a summer recess, but officials on Capitol Hill and at the White House are eager to make sure the effort does not languish for too long."I believe that the president feels strongly about immigration," Mr. Schumer said at the White House on Thursday. "I believe he'll continue to let America know how important it is to getting immigration reform done. But I believe that he will continue to let the details be worked out by Democrats and Republicans in the House and the Senate."
TOPEKA, Kan. — Over the past several months, Kris W. Kobach, Kansas' staunchly conservative secretary of state, has seen numerous Republicans tack toward the center on immigration policy.He watched a Senate debate that resulted in an immigration overhaul bill that largely ignored the strict enforcement measures he has spent a career championing across the country: denying utilities, housing and public education to illegal immigrants, and using local law enforcement to catch them.Moderation on immigration, some Republicans say, is vital to the future of the party if it hopes to remain relevant in a country of shifting demographics. But even if public sentiment and electoral math on immigration might be bending away from his principles, Mr. Kobach is not budging."Any politician who thinks, 'Oh, we just cast one vote, and then all of a sudden this demographic group comes flocking to us,' they're being superficial Washington idiots," Mr. Kobach said.In his third year as secretary of state, Mr. Kobach continues to make immigration a centerpiece of his work, even when it is far outside the boundaries of the office he was elected to. As the immigration debate moved last week to the more conservative House, he hoped to find a more receptive audience as he tried to insert his beliefs into the national dialogue.His supporters say he is succeeding in such efforts; his detractors call him old news.An Ivy League-educated lawyer, Mr. Kobach, 47, helped write the Arizona immigration law that gave local law enforcement officers the right to check the status of people they suspect are in the country illegally. The first legislation he pushed when he took office was a bill to require Kansans to show identification when they vote and to prove their citizenship when they register. It passed easily.Other efforts have been less successful. He has proposed measures — all of which have failed — to repeal the awarding of in-state college tuition for illegal immigrants; to require businesses to verify their workers' immigration status; and to give local law enforcement officers the right to check the status of people they suspect to be in the country illegally, similar to the Arizona law.Some say the proof of citizenship measure could be in jeopardy, since the Supreme Court recently struck down a similar law in Arizona."He seems determined to ignore his growing irrelevance," said Melinda Lewis, a public policy consultant for El Centro Inc., a social services organization in the Kansas City area. "The sheer futility of his policy ideas has made him largely irrelevant in the Congressional debate."But Mr. Kobach has felt emboldened by a federal appeals court decision last month upholding a Nebraska town's ordinance that prohibits landlords from renting to illegal immigrants and requires employers to verify the status of new workers — a case he litigated.He is also hoping for victory in another case he brought, challenging President Obama's program to suspend deportations for illegal immigrants who entered the country as children. A federal judge in Texas, who issued a preliminary decision favorable to Mr. Kobach's side, is expected to rule soon on whether to temporarily halt the program.Although Mr. Kobach has strongly opposed the kind of amnesty critics say the Senate bill offers, the bill also included a measure he has long advocated — requiring all employers to use an electronic database to verify the legal eligibility of new workers.And in the more conservative House of Representatives, Mr. Kobach sees a place for his policies. Already, the chamber has considered measures to give state and local authorities immigration enforcement authority, and to make it a crime to remain in the country illegally.Mr. Kobach has the heft of a power forward, but can flash a toothy smile and is eager to talk about his outdoorsy ways. He is an avid mountain biker and hunter; the heads of two deer he killed with a bow are on a wall in his office.
WASHINGTON — With political momentum behind an immigration overhaul flagging, advocates are counting on business groups to turn up the pressure on skeptical House Republicans who are much less susceptible to that lobby than they have been in the past.The changed dynamic illustrates the difficulty of guiding immigration legislation through the House as well as the challenge for business interests to reassert their influence before a more ideological brand of Congressional Republican."I've heard from all sides on the immigration bill, certainly our Kansas Chamber of Commerce," said Representative Lynn Jenkins of Kansas, a member of the House Republican leadership. "But I will tell you, a majority of Kansans that I visit with are not as eager. And the power lies with the people, at least in Kansas."The prickly relationship between House Republicans and business groups large and small will complicate efforts to move legislation to increase immigration of highly skilled workers, expand guest worker programs and establish a path to legalization or citizenship for the 11 million immigrants in the country illegally.Yet advocates of such a comprehensive approach say the business world may still be their last best shot, and business groups are mobilizing for an immigration offensive expected to kick into high gear by August."The business community is solidly behind this — small business, large business, the chamber, the Business Roundtable, you name it, they're all solidly in," said Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona and an author of the bill approved by the Senate last month. "We need them to weigh in, very frankly, on this issue, because we advertise ourselves as the party of business. Perhaps they can have some effect."In a meeting on Tuesday with seven of the eight senators who drafted the original bill and members of various advocacy groups, a frustrated Mr. McCain took business to the woodshed. Their efforts so far to lobby House Republicans, he explained in a stern tone, have not been sufficient. Their side is losing the battle to define the message, he said, and the next few months, including the August recess, will make or break the immigration effort.This week, Speaker John A. Boehner said he welcomed any sales pitches from business, noting that the majority of House Republicans had never been faced with immigration legislation. "The more education that we have for our members, the better we're going to be able to facilitate dealing with a very thorny issue," he said.In a broad immigration overhaul, businesses desire an injection of highly skilled workers who have found it increasingly difficult to enter the country, an expanded pool of lower skilled but energetic immigrants and a way to legally employ workers in the country illegally who have been mainstays of the labor force in many areas.Many business groups have been working on the issue for more than a year. Last month, during the annual summit meeting of the National Association of Manufacturers, the group's members held meetings with lawmakers to discuss immigration and other issues. Several of the association's members recently participated in an immigration briefing for House staff members hosted by Representative Robert W. Goodlatte, Republican of Virginia and the chairman of the House Judiciary Committee."It does us no good to bring in the best and brightest in the world, train and educate them, and then send them home," said Joe Trauger, the association's vice president of human resources policy, in summing up the group's message.Last month, Mr. Goodlatte also met with 20 chief executives of some of the largest corporations in the country through the Business Roundtable, an association of major-company chief executives, said Greg Brown, 52, the chairman and chief executive of Motorola, who heads the group's immigration task force.The Business Roundtable has strongly supported the Senate's comprehensive approach, he said, and the chief executives "remain cautiously optimistic that as the House continues to progress and pass a series of independent bills, then after August there will be a mechanism to unify them with the Senate."At the same time, the House's approach has risks. High technology businesses strongly back an expansion of visas for skilled workers. Agribusiness and service industries are most interested in guest worker programs. In a comprehensive bill, like the Senate's, all the business groups have an incentive to back the whole measure to make sure that their particular component remains. If the House separates the components, businesses could get behind some — but not all — of the piecemeal bills."You've got to keep a holistic momentum going because if you disaggregate, you run the risk of fragmentation," Mr. Brown said.
BEVERLY HILLS, Calif. — One of the country's most renowned sushi restaurants, Urasawa, sits in a small alcove above Rodeo Drive here. A typical bill for two people easily tops $1,000. Over an evening that can stretch to three hours, diners are served dishes dotted with caviar and 24-karat gold flakes (for the iron, the chef notes).But workers in the back kitchen are routinely denied overtime pay and forbidden from taking breaks, according to former employees and a California Labor Department investigation. Now, the chef and owner, Hiroyuki Urasawa, is battling state and civil claims that he withheld tens of thousands of dollars in wages and overtime from workers. One former employee who left the restaurant last year said he resorted to urinating in the sink meant for cleaning mops after being told the men's restroom was for customers only during business hours.Each night, Mr. Urasawa stands behind a pristine sushi bar serving more than a dozen dishes, each with an elaborate description of the provenance of the ingredients, mostly imported from Japan. With an affable smile, he happily accepts sake from diners, who can spend hundreds of dollars on a bottle."It was always about the customers, making sure that they were happy," said Heriberto Zamora, 26, who worked at the restaurant for more than five years and has filed a civil suit for back pay. "None of the employees were treated very well. We knew people were paying a lot to eat there, but for us it was no different."After immigrating from Oaxaca, Mexico, as a teenager, Mr. Zamora found a job at Urasawa through a friend. He worked his way up, starting as a dishwasher and eventually cleaning and preparing the fish and arranging precisely cut vegetables. After a promotion, while he was earning about $9 an hour, Mr. Urasawa forced him to buy his own $700 set of knives — each meant to touch only certain ingredients, Mr. Zamora said. Eventually, he was working nearly 60 hours a week for $11.50 an hour.One day last June, nine hours into his shift, Mr. Zamora was coughing and asked to go home, complaining of a fever, he said. Mr. Urasawa fired him on the spot, he said.Mr. Urasawa and his lawyer declined to comment for this article. But he has appealed a ruling issued by the state last month fining him $55,000 for failing to pay overtime and give breaks to Mr. Zamora and three other employees.Mr. Urasawa is not the first high-end chef to face charges from workers. Mario Batali and his partners ultimately reached a $1.15 million settlement last year with a group of employees at several of his restaurants in New York.The Urasawa case has become something of a battle cry among the overwhelmingly immigrant work force in hundreds of kitchens here. Labor and immigrant advocates say Mr. Zamora's experience is typical for thousands of workers in restaurants, regardless of how much customers might be paying to eat there.The problem is particularly acute in businesses that rely on cash to pay workers, as many restaurants do. A 2009 study by the Labor Center at the University of California, Los Angeles, found that there was an average of $26 million worth of wage violations each week in Los Angeles."There are countless examples in which workers are taking home less than they've earned," said Julie Su, the state labor commissioner, who has made cracking down on wage violations a focus of her office. In the case of Urasawa and dozens of other restaurants, investigators wait outside watching workers come and go, comparing what they see to the time records kept on employers' books. "It's a perversion of the concept of minimum wage — it goes from being some kind of floor to instead being some kind of ceiling," Ms. Su said.Ms. Su has investigated hundreds of wage violation cases this year, using individual complaints as starting points for many of the investigations. In countless cases, she said, owners rely on paying the same rate over 12 hours, though such practices violate labor laws created a century ago in part to ensure that employers hire a sufficient number of people, rather than rely on one worker for many hours."We see this happen all the time, across all industries, all parts of the city and all kinds of businesses," said Kevin Kish, a lawyer for Bet Tzedek, a nonprofit legal group that has taken on Mr. Zamora's case. "The only thing that is remarkable about this case is that people might expect paying so much means that workers are getting paid fairly."After Mr. Zamora was fired, a friend told him to go to the Koreatown Immigrant Workers Alliance, which helps many workers file wage violation complaints. This spring, the organization held a daytime protest in front of Urasawa, which garnered some attention in the local news media.
NEW ORLEANS — Latinos gathered here this week for a major annual convention said they would use their new political influence to press the House of Representatives for a vote this year on a broad immigration bill and mobilize support for House Republicans who take the risk of backing it.More than 5,000 Latinos from community groups came to the conference of NCLR, the nation's largest Hispanic organization, which is also known as the National Council of La Raza. Facing fading momentum in Washington on immigration, the leaders said they were heading to the fight this fall with their rank and file intensely motivated and more united than ever."Fear, denigration, abuse: those are words that resonate with our community, particularly when it comes to immigration," Janet Murguía, the president of NCLR, said in a speech on Monday.She said the travails of millions of immigrants without legal status were widely affecting Latino neighborhoods, making them feel besieged the way African-Americans did during the civil rights era of the 1960s. Illegal immigrants, she said, were vulnerable to wage discrimination, sexual attack in the workplace, even theft when they cash their paychecks, since many do not have bank accounts.While most of those in NCLR are citizens who have been in the United States for years, if not generations, community leaders here said that Republican advocacy last year of "self-deportation" for immigrants who are here illegally was offensive and heightened their personal identification with those immigrants.They said that legislation including some pathway to citizenship for 11 million illegal immigrants in the country was a "threshold issue" that Republicans would have to cross to start to win back large numbers of Latino voters."We are all family," said Rick Olmos, a leader of A.P.M., a Puerto Rican group in Philadelphia. "Latinos who are undocumented are still part of our community, and we will take care of each other."An immigration overhaul bill passed the Senate with bipartisan support last month, and the debate is now moving slowly in the Republican-controlled House. The House Judiciary Committee held a hearing on Tuesday to explore legislation to give legal status to an estimated 1.7 million young immigrants who came here as children. But the House speaker, John A. Boehner of Ohio, has made it clear no votes will happen before Congress recesses in August.A bipartisan group of seven House lawmakers is continuing work on a broad bill similar to the Senate's, and Representative Luis V. Gutierrez, an Illinois Democrat who is part of that group and is a fervent advocate of citizenship for illegal immigrants, assured conference participants on Monday that they would introduce it in September. Mr. Boehner has said most House Republicans prefer to handle the issue in smaller, "bite-size chunks" of legislation.Since the Senate vote, conservative Republicans opposing any legalization have seen a burst of support, and they are seeking to stop the House from passing any bill that could be matched with the Senate's in negotiations between the chambers.Ms. Murguía, whose main job as the head of NCLR is to oversee a large organization with nearly 300 local operations including health clinics, charter schools and community development corporations, is not known as a firebrand. But she became emotional when speaking of the more than 1.4 million deportations under the Obama administration."I have seen the devastation of families in the wake of deportation," Ms. Murguía said."I know in my heart it is long past time for this to end," she said, to applause.Because of its full name — the National Council of La Raza — which harks back to its earliest era in the 1970s of scrappy community organizing and polarized ethnic disputes, many politicians in Washington still think of NCLR as Latino radicals. At the conference, the group's mainstream approach, bordering on staid, was on full display. Major sponsors of the gathering included Walmart, Shell, Hilton Worldwide, JPMorgan Chase and Toyota.Michelle Obama gave the keynote address at the conference on Tuesday. Talking about her campaign to reduce childhood obesity, she also assured the crowd that President Obama would not give up until he had signed an immigration bill.In an interview, Ms. Murguía said the "silver lining" in the immigration debate had been that it erased sometimes sharp differences between Mexican-Americans, Cuban-Americans and other Latino groups in different regions of the country. "The attacks on our larger Latino family has been unifying and galvanizing for us," she said.The attention in Washington to immigration this year has vindicated a decision by NCLR leaders before the 2012 elections to focus major resources for the first time on Latino voting. The organization registered more than 100,000 voters and helped many hundreds of thousands get to the polls, leaders said. The wide Latino margin in favor of Mr. Obama was credited with swinging the election for him in several states. The Latino electorate continues to grow much faster than the overall voting public.Latino leaders said their focus now was on winning over House Republicans. The group has identified 26 districts, mainly in California, Texas, Florida and New York, where in coming months Latinos will pressure Republicans to hold a vote in the House and to support broad legislation with a path to citizenship. The plan is to reward lawmakers who come around."Our community is very interested in seeing Republicans who step up for us get the credit they deserve," said Clarissa Martinez-de-Castro, the top NCLR organizer of the immigration campaign.She said Latinos were aware that they would not succeed on their own, and were coordinating closely with business, evangelical Christian and labor groups to divide up the country to maximize the effort. Speakers from the National Association of Manufacturers, among other business groups, featured prominently at the conference.
WASHINGTON — As House Republicans took a tentative step forward on an immigration overhaul this week and raised the possibility of citizenship for those brought to the United States illegally as young children, immigration advocates found themselves pondering a new question: Is the potential concession as far as many House Republicans are willing to go, or are they slowly inching their way toward a broader compromise?"It's a good first step —  provided it is just a first step," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York and an author of the immigration bill that passed the Senate last month.Just where House Republicans stand on a pathway to citizenship for all of the 11 million undocumented immigrants already in the country remains to be determined. But on Tuesday, the House Judiciary Committee took up the question in a subcommittee hearing, with both Democrats and Republicans expressing optimism that they could support some form of citizenship for young adults known as "Dreamers," who were brought across the border as children."Simply put, children who were brought here haven't committed a crime, misdemeanor or otherwise," said Representative Trey Gowdy, the South Carolina Republican who leads the Immigration and Border Security Subcommittee. "The adults may have, but the children have not."House Republicans have largely rejected the overhaul of immigration laws recently passed by the Senate, instead opting for a piecemeal approach of several smaller, but related, immigration bills. But Tuesday's hearing showed that House Republicans were open to at least some possibility of legalization or citizenship."The most optimistic interpretation is that leading House Republicans are testing the waters in hopes they can bring enough of their caucus along to get to a more conservative approach to a broad bill — one that would include legalization of the 11 million, with a citizenship option for many," said Frank Sharry, the executive director of America's Voice, a pro-immigration group. "A more cynical take is that they are trying to position themselves to win the blame game."Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the No. 2 House Republican, and Representative Robert W. Goodlatte, his fellow Virginia Republican who leads the House Judiciary Committee, are working on legislation, known as the Kids Act, which would probably provide a path to legalization for the Dreamers. Both legislators voted in 2010 against the Dream Act, legislation that would have led to citizenship.Tuesday's hearing was briefly overshadowed by comments made in a recent interview by Representative Steve King, Republican of Iowa and an outspoken opponent of an immigration overhaul. He told a conservative Web site that while some Dreamers were "valedictorians," other undocumented immigrants had "calves the size of cantaloupes because they're hauling 75 pounds of marijuana across the desert."On Wednesday, Representative Raúl Labrador, Republican of Idaho, called Mr. King's comments "out of touch" with House Republicans. He also chastised the news media, saying they were making too much of "one person making a reprehensible and irresponsible comment."House Democrats remain divided on their strategy. Some are hesitant to support any bill that does not include a broad path to citizenship for more than just the younger immigrants. Many Dreamers rejected any Republican bill for their group, arguing that they would not accept anything that stopped short of citizenship for the 11 million, which includes many of their parents."We are determined to win citizenship, not only for Dreamers, not only for immigration youth, but for all of the undocumented," Cristína Jiménez, the managing director of United We Dream, said in a conference call Monday.Other Democrats see the path for Dreamers as a positive step, and a signal that House Republicans might be willing to go even further in eventual negotiations with the Senate. For similar reasons, some House Republicans are hesitant to support any immigration bill, worried that it could serve as a Trojan horse that would lead to, in the words of Mr. Labrador, "having the Senate bill jammed down our throats."While many House Republicans have been hesitant to support full citizenship for those who have come to the country illegally, some now seem willing to consider legalization for the undocumented immigrants already here.Representative Steve Pearce, a New Mexico Republican who represents a district that borders Mexico, on Wednesday relayed the message he is hearing back home."If there are jobs for those people, then fine, let's give them legal status, let's let them work," he said. "But not the citizenship, because that's going to take benefits away from my family."
WASHINGTON — More than 100 Republican donors — many of them prominent names in their party's establishment — sent a letter to Republican members of Congress on Tuesday urging them to support an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws.The letter, which calls for "legal status" for the 11 million immigrants here illegally, begins with a simple appeal: "We write to urge you to take action to fix our broken immigration system."The effort was organized by Carlos Gutierrez, who was secretary of commerce under President George W. Bush and was a founder of a "super PAC," Republicans for Immigration Reform. The letter is the beginning of a campaign to lobby Republican lawmakers in favor of a broad immigration bill as they return to their districts for the August break."What tends to happen during the month of August is that members go home and they go to town hall meetings and they check up on their offices in terms of phone calls and letters, and that's where they get bombarded," Mr. Gutierrez said in a phone interview. "So Republicans who are for immigration reform — and I believe there are many — we need to make our voice known in August."A cross-section of Republican donors and fund-raisers signed the letter. They include Karl Rove, a deputy chief of staff in Mr. Bush's White House; former Vice President Dan Quayle; Tom Stemberg, a founder of Staples; and Frank VanderSloot, the founder of Melaleuca Inc.An overhaul of the immigration laws passed the Senate in June, but members of the Republican majority in the House are uneasy about any bill that would provide a path to citizenship for illegal immigrants already here — as the Senate plan does — and some Republicans have balked at doing much beyond strengthening security at the border.The letter argues that a refusal to change the immigration system amounts to "de facto amnesty," and the signers outline three steps that they say are integral to any overhaul."To fix our immigration system we need meaningful reforms that will (1) secure our borders, (2) provide a legal way for U.S.-based companies to hire the workers they need while making it impossible to hire workers here illegally, and (3) take control of our undocumented immigration problem by providing a path to legal status for undocumented immigrants who pay penalties and back taxes, pass criminal background checks, and go to the back of the line," the letter says.Mr. VanderSloot, in a phone interview, said he believed that some of the Republican holdouts might support a pathway to citizenship for illegal immigrants as long as no special treatment is involved."I think most Republicans are on board with a path, but they don't want them to go the front of the line," Mr. VanderSloot said. "There should not be a reward for breaking the law. They're O.K. with them having a path to citizenship, but not having an advantage over those who have been waiting in line for a long time legally."He added, "I agree with that, too."The letter also says that support of an immigration overhaul is both smart policy and smart politics, and argues that Republicans and immigrants should be natural allies."Immigrants are often entrepreneurial, family-minded and guided by faith," the letter says. "These are Republican values. Immigrants play key roles at every level of the American economy. From high-skill workers to seasonal laborers, from big-city neighborhoods to small-town main streets, immigrants help drive our economic growth. These are Republican issues. Republicans ought to be welcoming immigrants and be seen as doing so."During the 2012 presidential campaign — when President Obama won 71 percent of the Hispanic vote — Mitt Romney alienated many Latinos with his comments that he favored a "self-deportation" approach to immigration. Yet many of the Republicans who signed the letter supported or worked for Mr. Romney, including Spencer Zwick, who was his campaign finance director.Mr. Gutierrez said, "This is our way of saying there are some Republican leaders who want to see the problem solved."
WASHINGTON — Seeking to send a message to lawmakers as they leave to face their constituents over the August recess, 41 leaders of groups supporting an overhaul of the immigration system held a noisy but peaceful sit-in on Capitol Hill on Thursday and were arrested, in an escalation of their tactics.Just after midday, the protesters filed onto Independence Avenue near the Capitol and sat in the street, unfurling a banner that said "Keep Our Families Together, Immigration Reform Now." With a crowd of several hundred cheering from the sidewalk and calling for "citizenship now," the protesters were handcuffed one by one and whisked away in police vehicles.Meanwhile, young immigrants delivered cantaloupes to the offices of more than 200 House lawmakers who voted in June to halt an Obama administration program that provides reprieves from deportation for some young people here illegally. That vote was on an amendment by Representative Steve King of Iowa, a Republican who created a stir last week when he said that many young immigrants had "calves the size of cantaloupes" from running drugs across the Southwest border.Among those arrested were labor leaders — including Eliseo Medina, secretary treasurer of the Service Employees International Union; Arlene Holt Baker, a vice president of the A.F.L.-C.I.O.; and Larry Cohen, president of the Communications Workers of America — as well as Deepak Bhargava, Angélica Salas, Gustavo Torres, Petra Falcón and other immigrants' rights advocates from around the country.It was the first time during the immigration debate this year that so many leaders had opted for civil disobedience."We have marched, we have rallied, we have prayed, we have written, we have called and now it is time to take it up another notch," Mr. Bhargava said just before his arrest. "We think it is important that the Republican leadership understand the intensity of the feeling in the community about the need for a vote on citizenship."The protesters said they were expressing frustration to the Republican-controlled House of Representatives because it had not taken any action on an immigration bill by an Aug. 1 deadline the groups had set earlier this year. Organizers said the action represented the beginning of a campaign of town hall meetings, rallies, vigils and other events in Republican districts during the recess that would extend into the fall, as the House considers whether to vote on any bill that would give legal status to immigrants here illegally.The protesters were charged with blocking a street and face $50 fines. The police began releasing them on Thursday afternoon. Fifteen more protesters were arrested in the afternoon as they sat down and chanted slogans in the hallway outside the office of the House speaker, John A. Boehner of Ohio.The Senate passed a broad bill in June that offers a 13-year path to citizenship for 11 million unauthorized immigrants. House leaders have said they will not take up that bill, and House Republicans are sharply divided over whether to move on any legalization, which many conservatives reject as amnesty for lawbreakers.As House members head to their districts, supporters of an overhaul said they would ollow them, to bring pressure and to work to outdo any mobilization from groups against an amnesty.
A protest by nine Mexican immigrants in which they tried to enter the country through a border station in Arizona even though they had no valid documents has provoked an unusual public argument among groups pushing Congress to overhaul the immigration laws.Most of the nine are young people who grew up in the United States without legal status. On July 22, they approached the border crossing in Nogales and asked to be admitted on a special parole. Border officers detained them for deportation, and they are being held in a detention center in Eloy, Ariz.The most heated part of the debate centers on the high-risk move by three undocumented youths in the group, who left the United States shortly before the protest, knowing they had no legal visas to return. The six others had been deported or had left the country on their own some time ago.Some advocates and lawmakers praised the immigrants, who are calling themselves the Dream 9, for their bold civil disobedience in the tradition of the civil rights era. Others said their tactics were reckless and distracted from the fight in Washington to win a path to citizenship for the 11 million immigrants living illegally in the country.Representative Michael M. Honda, Democrat of California, sent a letter signed by 32 other House members calling on President Obama to allow the immigrants to stay, saying they had taken a "courageous step because they are fighting to reunite families separated by the border and mass deportation policies."Mr. Honda said the nine were "victims of our broken immigration policies, and they deserve to come home to the United States."There have been small rallies and vigils in support of the immigrants in at least half a dozen places.But DeeDee Garcia Blase, a leader in Arizona of the Tequila Party, an organization of Latinas working for the immigration overhaul, said the protesters should keep their focus on passing legislation that would allow unauthorized immigrants to stay on this side of the border."It's counterproductive to be defiant and leave our nation and put themselves at risk," Ms. Garcia Blase said."It's our position," said Mohammad Abdollahi, a leader of the National Immigrant Youth Alliance, which organized the protest, "that all these folks should be allowed to come home."He said the three young people who recently went to Mexico had gone to accompany the other six as they tried to get back into the United States."It was purely civil disobedience," Mr. Abdollahi said. "We wanted everybody to be treated the same."A lawyer representing the nine immigrants, Margo Cowan, said they had asked to enter on a humanitarian parole, a special permission generally granted in short-term personal emergencies. To reinforce their case, they also requested asylum.Immigration officials and lawyers said it would be difficult under current law for the Obama administration to give them a break.One of the protesters, Claudia Amaro, is 37, too old to be eligible even for the deportation reprieves that the administration has offered since last year. Ms. Amaro had been living here illegally since 1988, and her teenage son is an American citizen. She was arrested in 2005 at her home in Wichita, Kan., with her husband, who was under police investigation, immigration officials said. She was released and left for Mexico, but a court order for her deportation was filed in her absence.Another Mexican, Luis León, who is 20, grew up in North Carolina but left in 2011 to go to college in Mexico. In a phone call on Thursday from the detention center, Mr. León said he soon began to miss his family. He was caught and deported four times trying to cross the border illegally. In most cases, foreigners who are deported cannot return to the United States for at least 10 years.Mr. León said that the Nogales attempt was his last resort, and that he had told the protest's organizers, "I would do whatever it takes to get back to my family."Mr. León said he did not mind being detained because he was holding out hope that he might be released.
ATLANTA — He says the United States is filling up with immigrants who do not respect the law or the American way of life. He refers to Latino groups as "the tribalists," saying they seek to impose a divisive ethnic agenda. Of his many adversaries, he says: "The illegal alien lobby never changes. It's the Wall Street wing of the Republican Party joining forces with the Chamber of Commerce, the far left and the Democrats in an effort to expand cheap labor and increase voting for the Democratic Party."D. A. King, who quit his job as an insurance agent a decade ago to wage a full-time campaign against illegal immigration in Georgia, is one reason this state rivals Arizona for the toughest legal crackdown in the country. With his Southern manners and seersucker jackets, he works the halls of the gold-domed statehouse, familiar to all, polite and uncompromising.Now, like other local activists around the country, he is looking beyond Georgia to stop the House of Representatives from following the Senate and passing legislation that would open a path to legal status for illegal immigrants.As lawmakers return to their home districts for the August recess, advocates like Mr. King are joining forces with national groups that oppose legalization and favor reduced immigration for an all-out populist push."These local people live in the middle of these places, they know how to be effective in their districts," said Roy Beck, executive director of one of the largest national groups, NumbersUSA, who is now holding regular strategy calls with Mr. King and more than 50 other state advocates.The zeal of militants like Mr. King is a problem for the House speaker, John A. Boehner of Ohio, and other Republican leaders, who are hoping to steer their divided caucus to pass a House version of legislation to fix the broken immigration system, which could include legal status for those who lack it — though probably not citizenship.Mr. King's "respectful but firm" message for the speaker, he said in an interview, is that "any vote for legalization would be a matter of very great consequence for the people who voted for conservative congressmen from Georgia."Mr. King says his wrath grew slowly, beginning in the 1990s with a feud with Mexican neighbors who disrupted the quiet of his leafy street. In Mr. King's account, they parked fleets of run-down vehicles on their lawn and at one point housed 22 people in a jerry-built warren of rental rooms in the basement.He took the neighbor to court over code violations, and the conflict boiled for seven years until the family moved away.A visit in 2004 to the Southwest border convinced Mr. King that the country was facing "what was easily described as an invasion." Returning to Georgia, he made common cause with the struggling father of a teenage boy killed in a car accident by a reckless driver who was an illegal immigrant. He named his organization the Dustin Inman Society, after the boy.The mistrust of Mr. Boehner among Mr. King and his allies deepened recently when the speaker rebuked an anti-amnesty hero, Representative Steve King, Republican of Iowa, for commenting that young immigrants here illegally had "calves the size of cantaloupes" from running drugs across the border.Mr. King in Georgia said he sided squarely with the congressman of the same name, although he might have chosen a milder metaphor. He nonetheless spared little in his description of Senator Marco Rubio, the Florida Republican who was one of the authors of the Senate bill, calling him a "smarmy and dishonest" turncoat. During the Senate debate, Mr. King designed and paid for thousands of bumper stickers as well as three large billboards along a commuter highway near Atlanta."Help us stop RubiObama amnesty!" one big sign read, with President Obama's name joined by his hallmark red-white-and-blue letter to that of Senator Rubio.His billboards instructed drivers to call a senator from Georgia, Johnny Isakson. Mr. Isakson, who supported a comprehensive bill in 2007, voted against the Senate legislation this year.In Georgia, Mr. King has not been afraid to take on many adversaries, including the farmers and growers, business organizations, labor unions and Latinos. A big-shouldered former Marine, he often shows up with his own placards at rallies called by his opponents — just to let them know he is watching."I was taught that we have an American culture to which immigrants will assimilate," Mr. King said. "And I am incredibly resentful that's not what's happening anymore."
A new study by the Brookings Institution presents what the group calls "an emerging portrait" of young immigrants who have sought a temporary reprieve from deportation under a year-old program that is one of President Obama's signature immigration initiatives.The study shows that the population of applicants, who must be between 15 and 30 years old, is heavily skewed toward the younger end of that spectrum: most were under 21 and more than a third were younger than 19.In addition, two out of every three applicants for the program, known as deferred action, were under 11 when they arrived in the United States and almost one-third were 5 or younger, said the study, which will be released on Wednesday. Nearly three-quarters of the applicants have been here for at least a decade.Immigrants' advocates have long argued that many young unauthorized immigrants should be granted an expedited path to legal status because they were brought to the United States as young children through no fault of their own and, having grown up in the country, were essentially American in all but legal status. The Brookings findings, the first of their kind, may well be used to bolster this case."If we think about what they've done in their lives and how they've spent their time in this country, the fact is that they've been part of the American school system," said Audrey Singer, co-author of the report and a senior fellow at Brookings, a nonpartisan research organization. "This is one of the big things that makes them American."More than 557,400 immigrants had applied for deferred action as of the end of June, according to the latest government figures, and nearly 400,600 of those — or about 72 percent — have been accepted, with the vast majority of the remaining applications still under review.The Brookings study was based on a review of applications obtained through a Freedom of Information Act request to the Homeland Security Department. The data covers the period from Aug. 15, 2012 — the first day applications were accepted — to March 22, 2013, and includes the first 465,509 applications received by the department.United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, the division of the Homeland Security Department that has been processing the applications, has released monthly data about the program, including the number of applicants and recipients; states of residence; and the countries from which the largest subpopulations of applicants come. But the Brookings study offers deeper statistical insight, including applicants' geographic distribution, age, gender and year of arrival in the United States.The applicants came from some 192 countries, Brookings found. About three-quarters were born in Mexico, and the top 25 countries account for more than 96 percent of all applicants, the study said.The report also noted that only 4 percent of applicants were Asian, fewer than expected, the authors said. China, for instance, does not appear among the 25 countries with the largest number of immigrants who have applied for the reprieve.The applications have come from all 50 states and the District of Columbia, as well as Puerto Rico, Guam and the Virgin Islands, Ms. Singer said. Most applicants, however, live in states with large foreign-born populations, including California, Texas, New York, Illinois and Florida. But New Jersey, which has the fifth-largest immigrant population in the country, ranks in ninth place for applications, behind North Carolina, Arizona and Georgia, the study said.The volume of applications was at its highest in the early months of the program, peaking at about 116,200 in October, according to government statistics. Since then, the number of applicants has dropped sharply, dipping to a low of about 18,300 in June.Ms. Singer and her co-author, Nicole Prchal Svajlenka, a research analyst, offer several likely reasons for this tapering. Applicants with the most straightforward cases — including younger people enrolled in school, recently graduated, or living with their parents — have an easier time showing that they have continuously resided in the United States since June 2007, one of the criteria for approval, and therefore may have applied earlier, the authors wrote.In addition, young people "have more support than their older counterparts through nonprofit organizations," particularly those that are working with high schools and colleges, the study said. "Older applicants, especially those living independently from parents, and those not enrolled in school, may have a harder time documenting that they have been living in the United States continuously since 2007."
PHOENIX — Requests for asylum in the United States along the border with Mexico have more than doubled over the last three years as immigrants seeking legal entry into the country claim a fear of persecution back home, according to a federal government report.The so-called credible fear claims reached 14,610 by the end of June, with three months left in the fiscal year, the Department of Homeland Security reported. For the entire 2011 fiscal year, there were 6,824 such claims. The department's report notes, however, that those numbers are a tiny portion of the millions of travelers who legally enter the country each year.The numbers represent "defensive" applications by foreigners arriving at American ports of entry seeking asylum. They do not include "affirmative" asylum requests filed in the same period by immigrants who are already in the country without permanent legal status. The department said those figures were not available.The data was released on Friday, in part, to dispute claims first reported by Fox News that large numbers of Mexican citizens had been showing up at San Diego ports of entry recently to seek asylum, citing the drug violence in their country. Homeland Security Department officials said the news reports had been overstated and called the increase in asylum requests at those ports "modest."Between Aug. 1 and Aug. 15, the agency said, an average of 30 people per day have arrived at San Diego ports seeking asylum, out of about 170,000 travelers who cross the border there legally each day.Critics of current immigration overhaul efforts in Washington have claimed that would-be immigrants are using the credible fear claim and seeking asylum as a loophole to gain legal entry into the United States, citing fear of drug cartel violence in Mexico. Immigration experts say the concerns are overstated.The issue gained new attention last month after a group of nine immigration rights activists presented themselves at the Arizona border in Mexico seeking asylum. After spending several weeks in detention, they have been released into the United States pending hearings before an immigration judge who will make a final decision on their requests.Homeland Security Department officials are quick to point out that such requests from Mexican citizens are rarely granted, noting that, on average, 91 percent are denied.While it is unclear what will happen in the nine activists' cases, some say their release into the United States, even if only temporarily, sets a dangerous precedent and could overwhelm ports of entry across the border. All of this is occurring while the White House is pressuring a reluctant Republican-led House to pass a major immigration bill."Frankly, I don't think the House should pass any bill until the administration shows its willingness to confront and fix this problem," said Senator Jeff Sessions, an Alabama Republican and vocal opponent of the immigration bill pending in Congress. "This is a direct threat to the orderly administration of our immigration law," Mr. Sessions added, predicting that even the perception of easy entry into the United States through asylum applications could create havoc on the border by prompting thousands more to try the same tactic.Homeland Security Department officials say there has been no marked increase in the numbers of such asylum requests from Mexican citizens, but the agency could not provide more detailed figures."Border activity levels are cyclical in nature," said Peter Boogaard, a spokesman for the department. "Claims of credible fear along the Southwest border vary month to month and year to year."He added that "credible fear determinations are dictated by longstanding statute, not an issuance of discretion."
TUCSON — For Senator John McCain , the Congressional summer recess has turned into a race against the clock, and against other Republicans. As the most senior member of the bipartisan Senate group that drafted the omnibus immigration bill pending in the House, he has spent his days prodding constituents to pressure Arizona's Congressional delegation to support it.Mr. McCain knows how much is at stake. He has tried before — and failed — to push immigration changes through Congress, where political divisions on the issue run much deeper than party lines. And he knows how hard it will be to get anything done in 2014, an election year.In the state that is at the center of the fight against illegal immigration, his campaign for the overhaul is an uphill battle. There are four Republicans among Arizona's nine-member House delegation, and they are all adamantly against tackling an immigration overhaul with a single piece of legislation.They have also been making their case in corners that are decidedly more conservative than Tucson, which is represented in the House by two Democrats and was the site of a town-hall style meeting held by Mr. McCain on Tuesday.He faced questions there about the increasing emphasis on border security and a perceived lack of accountability among Border Patrol agents, who have been involved in at least 15 deadly shootings since 2010. But elsewhere, "what's waiting for him is quite the opposite," Representative Paul Gosar, a Republican whose district includes most of the rural western part of Arizona, said in an interview."We've said all along that we want immigration reform, but American voters, American taxpayers, are done with this bill that passed in the Senate because it's a bill that came together with no debate," said Mr. Gosar, who early this month hosted two meetings in Kingman, a Republican stronghold near the Nevada border, where increased security is central to the immigration debate. "What's so scary about having a conversation with America?"Mr. McCain is undeterred. Last week, to turn up the pressure, he urged evangelical pastors and Hispanic civic leaders to mobilize their communities. He also encouraged immigrant advocates to remain active, while reminding them to be respectful of those with differing opinions. A week ago, from a conference room in Phoenix, he issued a call for action to members of the Arizona Chamber of Commerce, saying, "We will not succeed if we don't have the active support of our business leaders."Mr. McCain was quick to concede that the bill had shortcomings. "I don't think that any legislation that is a series of compromises that need to be made is perfect," he said at the public meeting here on Tuesday. But he is open to making one more concession, if that is what it will take: the "piecemeal approach," as he put it, that is favored by Mr. Gosar and many other House Republicans who have been unwilling to throw their weight behind the all-encompassing legislation."We now have, for better or for worse, 11 million people who are residing in this country illegally," Mr. McCain told more than 100 people at the meeting. "Does that mean they should be permanently punished?"Pacing the floor, he turned on the charm, cracked jokes and more than once invoked religion to justify restructuring the country's immigration laws, saying an overhaul was exactly what "a nation founded on Judeo-Christian principles" would want.Attempting to turn one of the main arguments used by opponents into ammunition for supporters, he told the audience that doing nothing amounted to "de facto amnesty.""There's no way you're going to round up everyone and send them across the border," he said.Addressing concerns about border security, he offered numbers outlining what the immigration bill before the House would provide: 20,000 additional Border Patrol agents, 350 miles of fence and billions of dollars for security, including drones and a radar system named Vader, which was developed to track Taliban fighters planting roadside bombs in Afghanistan.When one man at the meeting brought up the deadly shootings by Border Patrol agents, he responded, "When these things happen, there has to be investigations, there has to be oversight by Congress, there has to be hearings." (On Monday, the Justice Department exonerated agents involved in two shootings in 2011 in Douglas, Ariz., and Nogales, Mexico, saying they had committed no crime.)The unrelenting reality, Mr. McCain said later at the meeting, was that "sometime in the next few days, the Border Patrol is going to find more bodies in the desert" — migrants who died of dehydration or exposure in the extreme heat. Somewhere, he went on, smugglers were waiting to bring more people across the border, crossings during which "young women are treated in the most unspeakable fashion" and others are abandoned and left to die."What I respectfully ask you to do," Mr. McCain said, "is to contact our members of Congress and tell them how important this legislation is."Immigration has been a politically difficult subject for Republicans, who have had to balance a need for change, which they have acknowledged, against the animosity among their most loyal supporters toward the idea of giving illegal immigrants a chance at citizenship. Many Republicans have avoided the face-to-face free-for-alls that stirred passion among voters in years past, choosing to conduct meetings by telephone or behind closed doors to focus only on immigration.Representative Matt Salmon, a Republican who represents Mesa and other suburbs east of Phoenix, spent a lot of time in recent days talking to groups with different opinions on immigration, like border sheriffs and evangelical leaders. He also fielded phone calls at his district office, mostly from people telling him, "We don't like this Senate bill at all, we don't support it," he said.The immigration legislation as it stands "has many problems," Mr. Salmon said, "starting by the fact that it's willy-nilly throwing money at border security and there isn't even a clear objective on what constitutes a secure border."
PHOENIX — Federal agents arrested 11 managers and supervisors of a local car-washing chain on immigration fraud and other charges in weekend raids that brought in more than 200 people, setting off fear among immigrants already on edge by years of relentless enforcement in a state at the core of the debate over illegal immigration.The scene on Saturday resembled the workplace raids by Sheriff Joe Arpaio of Maricopa County and operations by federal authorities here and elsewhere: heavily armed agents in bulletproof vests and ski masks surrounded the businesses, and then escorted workers outside single file with hands bound behind their backs.In all, the agents rounded up 223 people, most of them in the United States illegally. Of those, 179 were released after questioning, under a policy that gives priority to the deportation of people with criminal records or a repeated history of immigration violations. Thirty immigrants fit this profile and were placed on a path to deportation, according to federal officials.But officials said workers on the carwash floor were never the investigators' target. From the investigation's start two years ago, they said, they had their eyes trained on the people in charge, whom they accused of running a scheme that also included identity theft and financial improprieties, in part for evading taxes on wages paid to the unauthorized workers."I want to make clear for the community that this was not an immigration-enforcement operation," Barbara Gonzalez, a spokeswoman for Immigration and Customs Enforcement, said outside one of the carwashes, in central Phoenix. "This was a criminal investigation."The raids — at 16 Danny's Family Car Wash locations, as well as the offices of a contracted staffing-services provider, HR Betty — happened as the Obama administration treads carefully around the minefield that is immigration enforcement and as an overhaul of the country's immigration system hangs in the balance in Congress.They began Saturday morning as dozens of customers lined up to have their vehicles cleaned. While some agents rounded up workers, others riffled through offices' drawers and computers, removing evidence they hope to use to shore up their case. Three other people were named in an indictment but not yet arrested, officials said."We're targeting the companies that are not playing by the rules, the companies that are not following the law," Ms. Gonzalez said. "That's our priority."As word spread through text messages — "We've just been raided by immigration," read one of them — relatives and friends of the carwash workers employed under someone else's Social Security number, a practice that stands at the heart of the criminal case, gathered on the sidelines. Many shouted words of encouragement while trying to get answers from the stoic agents.The raids rankled immigrant advocates, who gathered outside the federal courthouse before shouting "Justicia, justicia!" At the same time, they showed that the Obama administration, which has generally avoided high-profile worksite raids, is not afraid to punish employers who break immigration laws.The employees who were arrested — four of them United States citizens, the others Mexicans — were brought before Judge Michelle H. Burns in United States District Court here Monday afternoon to hear prosecutors lay out the accusations against them.The 11 men appeared in court still wearing their work uniforms — white polo shirts for some, black for others. All held mid- or upper-level leadership posts in the business, including that of general manager.The owners of the carwash business were not arrested. A federal official close to the investigation, who was not authorized to discuss it publicly, said other arrests were expected once evidence was analyzed.In addition to the 14 individuals, the indictment names 18 corporations, including Danny's Family Companies. A federal audit in 2011 found that many of the employees at the chain were in the country illegally. The company promised to fire them, which it did, but then began the process of rehiring the same people, under different identities, officials charged.Among the 30 people who face deportation is Juan Carlos Raynosa Espinoza, who had worked for Danny's carwash for nine years, most recently in Scottsdale, where he was arrested on Saturday while his wife, Laura Torres, was home making lunch for their two children, both United States citizens.Outside the ICE office on Monday, Ms. Torres said that her husband had refused to sign a voluntary deportation order put before him after he was detained, and that he had two other deportation orders against him from nearly 10 years ago."He is not a criminal. All he wants to do is work for his family," she said in Spanish. "My children are crying every night for their father, and I don't know how to explain to them what's happening."
WASHINGTON — Catholic bishops and priests from major dioceses across the country will preach a coordinated message next month backing changes in immigration policy, with some using Sunday Masses on Sept. 8 to urge Congressional passage of a legislative overhaul that includes a path to citizenship for unauthorized immigrants.The decision to embrace political action from the pulpit is part of a broader effort by the Roman Catholic Church and other faith groups that support President Obama's call for new immigration laws. It includes advertising and phone calls directed at 60 Catholic Republican lawmakers and "prayerful marches" in Congressional districts where the issue has become a divisive topic."We want to try to pull out all the stops," said Kevin Appleby, the director of migration policy at the United States Conference of Catholic Bishops, who said the immigration issue was at a now-or-never moment. "They have to hear the message that we want this done, and if you're not successful during the summer, you're not going to win by the end of the year."Catholic leaders, who have tried to wield their clout against Mr. Obama on issues like abortion, birth control and same-sex marriage, are betting that their congregations will be able to exert pressure on reluctant Republicans and wavering Democrats to support the president on immigration. They say they are motivated by the Bible's teachings and by the reality that many Latino immigrants are Catholics and represent a critical demographic for the church.The political campaign by Catholic priests is certain to catch the attention of Catholic members of Congress. Catholics are the largest single religious group in Congress, making up just over 30 percent of the members, according to the Pew Research Center's Religion and Public Life Project. The current House has 136 Catholic members, including Speaker John A. Boehner and 60 other Republicans, according to Pew.For some Republican members, vocal support by local priests and bishops could provide the religious rationale they need to support an overhaul in the face of criticism from conservatives. "The connection between a pastor and their congregation is really like nothing else in society," said Ali Noorani, the executive director of the National Immigration Forum.White House officials said they were counting on Catholics and members of other religious groups to help pass an immigration overhaul through a Republican-controlled House that is filled with members fighting against one. Cecilia Muñoz, the director of the White House Domestic Policy Council, said Catholic leaders had participated in outreach meetings at the White House."It's pretty rare for the Catholics to take on an issue like this straight to the pews," said Ms. Muñoz, who is leading Mr. Obama's immigration effort. She said Catholics had long been advocates for an immigration overhaul, but were now more organized. "This is actually a much more across-the-church effort, and it shows."Last year, Catholic activism pushed Mr. Obama to compromise on a plan to require religious employers to provide contraception health coverage. The Catholic Church often plays an outsize role in the political debate over abortion and marriage. But it remains unclear how much the Catholic campaign on immigration can change the minds of lawmakers who view the president's proposals as amnesty for lawbreakers.Representative Steve King, a Catholic Republican from Iowa and a leading opponent of the immigration overhaul, said the campaign may help persuade some colleagues who are already under political pressure to pass an immigration bill."If the church puts out a unified message, there will be some Catholic legislators who will want to accept that guidance, because they want to get there anyway," Mr. King said. "It gives them cover."Representative Daniel Lipinski, a Catholic Democrat from Illinois, said he had listened to the bishops and priests from his district. But he said he viewed their opinions on immigration as less binding than the church's positions on social issues."There are some issues that the church speaks authoritatively on, such as abortion, in protecting life," said Mr. Lipinski, who remains skeptical about promises of increased border security. "And then there are prudential judgments that are made, informed by Catholic theology, but it's not something that Catholics are required to follow."
LAS CRUCES, N.M. — Representative Steve Pearce, a New Mexico Republican, was up early last Thursday morning, tapping along to a mariachi beat and speaking what he calls West Texas Spanish."Mi madre is a teacher en Espanish," Mr. Pearce told Alejandra Soto, the host of a Spanish-language drive-time radio show in southern New Mexico.During the 10-minute interview, Mr. Pearce and Ms. Soto gamely talked past each other — he in English, she in Spanish — as he earnestly tried to answer her questions about immigration. They seemed to understand each other only some of the time."Vamos, vamos, let's go!" Mr. Pearce said as Ms. Soto talked over him in energetic, rapid-fire Spanish, revving up her morning listeners.Mr. Pearce's dogged outreach to Hispanics is one of the reasons he has continued to win re-election in New Mexico's Second Congressional District — where Mexico borders to the south and Hispanics make up 52 percent of the population, according to the Census Bureau — despite his opposition to a path to citizenship for the 11 million illegal immigrants already in the country.Mr. Pearce, 66, embodies the challenge, as well as the real possibility, of pushing an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws through a Republican-controlled House when Congress returns in September.Many Republicans see Mr. Pearce as a model for how their party can attract Hispanic voters. He is responsive to constituents when they ask for help and hears out even those he disagrees with on the question of immigration. Among non-Hispanic Republicans, Mr. Pearce represents the most heavily Hispanic district.Advocates working on behalf of immigrants, however, view Mr. Pearce as a target, as someone who, based on the demographics of his district alone, should be supporting a path to citizenship and could pay a steep political price if he does not."How he votes on this is going to be one of those defining votes that will either dog him or help him throughout his career," said Frank Sharry, the executive director of America's Voice, a group pushing for an overhaul of the immigration system. "He's facing a growing Latino vote, a district in a state that's trending blue, and if he gets to 'no' on immigration reform, that's going to really hurt him."Mr. Pearce says he wants to fix what he calls a broken immigration system, and he sees himself as a border-state pragmatist."One side says everybody just gets citizenship, the other side says deport them or put them in jail, whatever. And I'm saying there is another alternative that would allow families to stay together, that would allow people to work, that just would not make them citizens," Mr. Pearce said last week in response to a question at a town hall-style meeting in Deming. "Because that makes me very nervous as a policy."Later in the evening, he added: "I think that the plan I'm suggesting is the compromise plan. It's somewhere out between kick them out and give them full citizenship."Mr. Pearce's proposal would create a guest worker program, which would allow illegal immigrants to stay in the country as long as they were working. But it would not provide citizenship to those workers over time. He would allow illegal immigrants to become citizens, but they would first have to return to their home country and wait in line there."You can't get control of the borders if you tell people you can come here illegally and you can work until you work your way to the front of the line," Mr. Pearce said in an interview on Thursday. "The whole world would want to do it that way. Who would want to wait and do it properly?"Despite Mr. Pearce's strong opposition to a path to citizenship, advocates of an overhaul still believe that he might be persuadable, and various groups have descended on his district over the August break, holding marches and protests and filling his public meetings. "They simply realize that this is a 34 percent Republican district, and they're hoping to bring enough pressure that would change me," he said.
FORT WORTH — After years of enormous power and political influence, no member of the Bush family currently holds political office.But as the focus on military action in Syria drags former President George W. Bush's Iraq war policy back into the spotlight, the Bush family is quietly but forcefully gearing up for another, still-developing debate: The fight on Capitol Hill over a broad overhaul of the nation's immigration laws — a discussion critical to protecting the Bushes' legacy on what has, for decades, been a defining issue for them.In July, Mr. Bush, who has largely avoided the political spotlight since leaving office, attended a naturalization ceremony for newly sworn-in citizens at his presidential library in Dallas.Former Gov. Jeb Bush of Florida, his brother, has been traveling the country delivering speeches and writing opinion pieces pegged to his recent book, "Immigration Wars," written with Clint Bolick, which argues for change in the law.And Jeb Bush's two sons have been reaching out to Hispanics. George P. Bush, 37, is a founder of a political action committee — Hispanic Republicans of Texas — devoted to promoting Hispanics in Texas politics, and is running for office himself as a candidate for Texas land commissioner. Jeb Bush Jr., 29, is the founder of Sun PAC, a Florida group that recruits conservative Hispanic political candidates.For the Bushes, immigration is deeply personal. The family chose to root its political ambitions in Texas, and Jeb Bush's wife, Columba, is from the central Mexican town of León. The elder George Bush famously, and lovingly, once referred to his three Mexican-American grandchildren as "the little brown ones."Now, as the Republican Party struggles with how to attract Hispanic voters, members of the Bush dynasty seem more determined than ever to exert influence over the issue they have been helping to shape for years."For generations, the Bush family has been connected to Hispanics by history, geography and family, and as a result, they have a deep understanding and acute sensitivity to important cultural nuances and political issues that affect the population," said Mark McKinnon, a Republican strategist who worked on both of George W. Bush's presidential campaigns. "When it comes to issues affecting Hispanics, the Bush family has a strong compass."The family's outreach to Hispanics is also smart politics, likely to bolster its political future in 2016 and beyond. George W. Bush won re-election to the White House in 2004 with 44 percent of the Hispanic vote, a number neither subsequent Republican presidential nominee came close to matching, and Jeb Bush is often mentioned as a likely 2016 contender in large part because of his strong relationship with Hispanic voters and support for an immigration overhaul.Mr. McKinnon has already nicknamed George P. Bush "47." (His uncle, of course, is "43," and his grandfather is "41.")Jeb Bush speaks Spanish fluently and George W. less so, but in the words of friends, "fearlessly."During his 1998 re-election campaign for Texas governor, Mr. Bush made a concerted push to win El Paso, with its large Hispanic population; he won the county with just over 50 percent of the vote, and used the victory to position himself for a presidential run two years later."I want it to be known that a conservative candidate can carry the Hispanic vote," he told reporters at the time.George P. Bush said in a recent interview after a campaign event here that courting Hispanics has always been both the politically smart and morally right thing to do."My uncle obviously thought it was an important strategy for him, not only to win, but to expand the party, expand the base," he said. "For my dad, it might be a little bit more personal, in the sense that he married 'una Mexicana,' and it certainly changes one's perspective. But you know, being in Florida, it's similar demographics to what you see in Texas, so it's been important both from a political and a personal standpoint."In the preface to his book, Jeb Bush writes that immigration to him "means my wife and family.""It's just smart marketing; it's just smart business," said Henry Bonilla, who is Hispanic and is a former Republican House member from Texas. "Whether it's political business or corporate business, there are those who understand that it's a diverse nation and it's wise to be inclusive, and those who don't, and it was just innately part of the Bush culture from the get-go."
FRESNO, Calif. — A fiery plane crash here decades ago that killed 32 people, most of them unidentified Mexican farmworkers, inspired a protest song by Woody Guthrie that has been performed by Bruce Springsteen , Joan Baez and Bob Dylan , among others . Yet here in the heart of the Central Valley, one of the most productive agricultural counties in the country, the story of that crash had been largely forgotten.A fireball of lightning, and shook all our hillsWho are all these friends, all scattered like dry leaves?The radio says, "They are just deportees"But two years of painstaking detective work by a writer who is a descendant of farmworkers has answered the question posed in Mr. Guthrie's song, "Deportee." The victims were honored this week by more than 600 people gathered here at Holy Cross Cemetery for an elaborate memorial service and the unveiling of a large headstone that lists each victim.On Jan. 28, 1948, a plane chartered by federal immigration officials left Oakland, Calif., carrying two pilots, a flight attendant, an immigration guard and 28 Mexican farmworkers. Some were in the United States legally as part of the federal Braceros guest-worker program; others had crossed the border without documents. All 28 were being returned to Mexico.Eighty miles southwest of Fresno, road workers reported hearing what sounded like an explosion, only to look up and see the left wing shear off the Douglas DC-3 passing high above them. Nearly a dozen bodies were seen falling from a hole in the fuselage before the plane burst into flames and plummeted into a wooded canyon.Everyone aboard was killed. The bodies of the four crew members were shipped to family members, but the remains of the 28 Mexicans were buried in a mass grave here, at the edge of the cemetery.Although acres of headstones bear Spanish surnames, those crash victims remained unidentified. Near the mass grave, a diminutive stone read only: "28 Mexican Citizens Who Died In An Airplane Accident Near Coalinga California On Jan. 28, 1948 R.I.P."You won't have your names when you ride the big airplaneAll they will call you will be "deportees.""Woody always believed in the power of invoking people's names; he wrote many songs using names," Nora Guthrie, a daughter of the folk singer, wrote in an e-mail. "Sometimes, songs leave behind questions which ultimately can, and will, be answered by someone whose heart is pulled into the mystery."In the case of "Deportee," that person was Tim Z. Hernandez, 39, a writer and a son and grandson of Mexican farmworkers. In 2010, Mr. Hernandez came across several newspaper articles about the crash at a Fresno library while he was doing research for a novel."When I saw the newspaper stories, Woody Guthrie's lyrics became real to me," he said. "I thought, someone somewhere must have those names."Together with Carlos Rascon, the cemeteries director for the Roman Catholic Diocese of Fresno, Mr. Hernandez dug through records at the Fresno County recorder's office and coverage of the crash from a local Spanish-language newspaper. Where he could, Mr. Hernandez filled in information and double-checked name spellings by talking with surviving family members.At the ceremony on Monday, farm workers stood side by side with folk music fans as a mariachi band played, the bishop of Fresno prayed, incense burned and more than a dozen Aztec dancers performed.Caritina Paredes Murillo was 11 when news of her father's death in a plane wreck reached her family in Guanajuato State in central Mexico. For days, everyone in her house wept. But after 65 years, her memories of her father feel more like impressions now: the way he left for long stretches to work, and the sound of his voice singing ballads to her mother when he returned home."In my heart I feel happy and sad at the same time," said Ms. Paredes, 77, who traveled from Mexico to attend the ceremony. "It feels like they were all buried for the first time today."During the first of two renditions of "Deportee" on Monday, musicians read the victims' names as the crowd chanted in Spanish, "descansa en paz," rest in peace.Berenice Guzman, a history teacher at Dinuba High School in nearby Dinuba, Calif., had never heard of the plane wreck, or the Woody Guthrie song, until this year. Captivated, she told her students the story. They organized a bake sale to help raise $14,000 for the headstone and memorial service."They connected right away because many of their parents are farm workers from Mexico," Ms. Guzman said at the ceremony. "This is an agricultural community. For many of us here, the people in that crash could have been family."
HANFORD, Calif. — When Representative David Valadao came out in favor of a path to citizenship for millions of people living in the country illegally at an open forum this summer, the crowd erupted in applause, and young activists nearly knocked one another down as they rushed to embrace him.Since then, Mr. Valadao, a freshman Republican, has become a bit of an unlikely celebrity among Latino farmworkers and their families in California's Central Valley, where immigration has shaped the agricultural industry for decades.As the immigration debate simmers in Washington, California Republicans face a very different reality than a majority of their party colleagues, who elsewhere largely represent districts that are overwhelmingly white.More than half of California's 15 Republican members of Congress have districts that are at least 30 percent Latino, making them potentially vulnerable to Democratic challenges and prime targets for those pushing for a path to citizenship. In Mr. Valadao's district, Latinos make up 70 percent of the population.With Republicans all but relegated to a minority party in California — Democrats hold every statewide elected office, maintain a large majority in the State Legislature and hold a vast majority of Congressional seats — many here blame the party's decline on its stance on immigration."We're finally breaking out of denial," said Allan Hoffenblum, a longtime Republican consultant in state politics. "Until we solve our Latino problem, we're not going to be a viable state party, and it's hard to understand how that's possible without fixing immigration."Mr. Valadao, the son of Portuguese immigrants, is one of a few Republicans in the state offering full-throated support for sweeping changes to the country's immigration laws. Representatives Jeff Denham and Devin Nunes, whose districts include northern stretches of the state's agricultural center, have said they would support some kind of legalization process for the nation's roughly 11 million illegal immigrants, the most divisive issue in the debate.All of this has put pressure on Representative Kevin McCarthy, a Republican whose district is about one-third Latino and includes part of Bakersfield, a working-class, immigrant-heavy city that Mr. Valadao also represents. As the majority whip, the third-ranking leader of the Republican-controlled House, Mr. McCarthy is expected to play an important role in deciding which legislative proposals end up being voted on and which are squelched this fall.In the past, Mr. McCarthy has called the immigration process broken, saying that the priority must be on securing borders and that he is opposed to an amnesty. Aides to the lawmaker did not respond to repeated requests for an interview.One commercial appearing on cable television in his district attacks "obstructionists" blocking an immigration overhaul. Another accuses him of "talking about legalizing 11 million illegal aliens, making it easier for them to take jobs."After a union-backed protest in Mr. McCarthy's district in August, demonstrators marched into his office with pictures of immigrants, along with farm tools and produce, in an attempt to illustrate their impact on the community here. In the arid Central Valley, where dairy farms and peach and almond orchards stretch for miles, immigrants have provided the steadiest source of agricultural and service employees.Mr. McCarthy told a local radio station last week that most of the protesters had come from outside his district. Mr. McCarthy also faces pressure from those against illegal immigration. "He's shown that he is flexible on immigration and has said we need to be more open to foreign workers, but the great irony is that he's in a district with high unemployment," said Joe Guzzardi, the national media director for Californians for Population Stabilization, which opposes any kind of citizenship for those in the country illegally.Advocates of a comprehensive immigration overhaul argue that California is a cautionary tale for Republicans in the rest of the country and that if the party does not help pass legislation this year, it will risk losing Latino votes for decades to come. Frank Sharry, the executive director of America's Voice, which is pushing for an immigration overhaul, points to 1994 as the start of problems for the state Republican Party. Pete Wilson, the governor at the time, led the campaign for a state ballot initiative severely limiting access to public services, including schools and nonemergency medical care, for illegal immigrants. Voters approved the measure, but it was ruled unconstitutional by federal courts."California became one of the bluest states in the country because the Republican Party followed Pete Wilson off the anti-immigration cliff," Mr. Sharry said. "McCarthy isn't going to want to lose more seats, and he has to see that members who are becoming champions of immigration reform aren't just living to tell about it, but they're getting love letters."
WASHINGTON — Congress is likely to postpone consideration of an immigration overhaul until the end of the year, if not longer, even as advocates are preparing for an all-out, urgent push this fall to win their longstanding goal of a path to citizenship for millions of immigrants here illegally.In Washington, the sudden debate over military action in Syria and a looming face-off with President Obama over the budget and the nation's borrowing limit have shot to the top of the legislative agenda, while Republican angst about losing Hispanic voters in the 2012 presidential campaign has faded.In the House, where many Republicans view an overhaul bill passed by the Senate as a federal juggernaut that is too kind to immigrant lawbreakers, the legislative summer recess has done little to stoke enthusiasm for immediate action. Senior Republican aides in the House say immigration is at the back of the line, and unlikely to come up for months.The prospect of a delay is generating frustration among supporters of the legislation, who felt emboldened by a summer in which conservative opposition in House districts largely fizzled and immigrant groups seized the chance to lobby lawmakers on their home turf."We believe they can walk and chew gum at the same time," said Eliseo Medina, who leads the immigration campaign for the Service Employees International Union, referring to members of Congress. "The more they delay, the worse it will be for them."Throughout August, immigration groups organized hundreds of visits to Congressional offices, town hall-style meetings, vigils, marches and rallies, creating a constant buzz in the districts of many House lawmakers, particularly Republicans. On Wednesday, advocates delivered 600,000 petitions to the West Chester, Ohio, offices of Speaker John A. Boehner the old-fashioned way, in dozens of stacks of signed papers. On Sunday, Catholic priests around the country preached for a comprehensive immigration overhaul.At a Mass devoted to immigration in Cincinnati, a mix of Catholics, including immigrants from Mexico and Central America and African-Americans, prayed for Congress to act."Families in our communities are being ripped apart by deportations, and the system is in chaos," said Tony Stieritz, director of Catholic Social Action for the Cincinnati Archdiocese, who helped organize the Mass. "A vote for delay is a vote for crisis and disorder in the current system."José Cabrera, 18, a high school senior from Mexico who spoke at the Mass, said immigrant groups in Ohio expected to see legislation this year, adding that he and other students compared their activities to the civil rights march on Washington, recently celebrated on its 50th anniversary."We know this is the year," said Mr. Cabrera, who came here illegally when he was 4 years old and was recently granted a deportation deferral by the Obama administration. "I have put as much effort in as I can and even more. If they just keep pushing it back and back, a lot of activists will be very frustrated."The gulf between the expectations of advocates and the reality they face in Washington is widening every day. As they feel momentum slipping away, their anger is likely to intensify this fall.And time is not on their side. In June, the Senate passed a bipartisan plan to overhaul border security and grant illegal immigrants a chance to earn citizenship. If the House does not take up the immigration issue until 2014, members will face the prospect of voting on a highly contentious issue in the middle of a Congressional election year.Republican primaries will begin in the spring, and many lawmakers may be reluctant to overhaul the immigration system just before facing their conservative constituents. If Congress does not complete action early next year, Congressional aides said, the issue could be delayed until after the November elections.But leaders of groups supporting an immigration overhaul say they do not plan to let up.The organizations plan a mobilization in early October, with rallies in at least 40 cities on Oct. 5 followed by a march and rally in Washington on Oct. 8. Convinced that a majority exists in the House for the legislation, they will press for Mr. Boehner to allow a vote before the end of the year. Leaders said the Syria debate and the fiscal fight should not become "excuses" to set aside immigration."We're gearing up for late October — we're going to push really hard for votes this fall and negotiations with the Senate," said Frank Sharry, the executive director of America's Voice, an advocacy group. "We never figured we'd have an opportunity in September because of the budget stuff and with the debt ceiling."The government's authority to spend money under the existing budget will run out on Oct. 1 unless lawmakers reach a budget deal or agree to a temporary delay. And officials say the debt limit must be raised by mid-October or the nation will risk defaulting on its debts.Many immigration advocates said they were especially pleased that conservative activists and talk radio hosts had failed to generate significant opposition to an overhaul in August.At a rally in Richmond, Va., last month that was billed as a Tea Party show of strength, Representative Steve King of Iowa, a Republican who is an outspoken foe of any legal status for illegal immigrants, found himself addressing a nearly empty plaza.
WASHINGTON — More than 100 women were arrested on Capitol Hill on Thursday after they blocked a busy intersection to press the House of Representatives to move on immigration legislation in a protest that rallied national women's groups to the cause.The 115 women arrested included Terry O'Neill, president of the National Organization for Women, and Linda Meric, executive director of 9to5, both women's groups that have not been prominent in pushing Congress for a path to citizenship for millions of immigrants in the country illegally.In a choreographed demonstration, the women sat in a circle on Independence Avenue, disrupting traffic for about 30 minutes, then were handcuffed by Capitol police officers and taken away in vans. Organizers said 25 immigrants who are in the country without legal papers were among those arrested.Last week, House leaders said they would probably not take up contentious immigration legislation this fall, with lawmakers' attention focused on the fast-changing debate over Syria and Republicans at odds over how to deal with a looming Oct. 1 debt ceiling deadline and other urgent budget issues.The advocates' response came quickly, with the protesting women saying they were not willing to wait. Immigrant groups have been marshaling their forces for a fight on the House floor this fall, and leaders warned they could adopt increasingly aggressive tactics if the debate stalls in the House. In June, the Senate passed a broad immigration bill, with a 13-year path to citizenship for illegal immigrants.Pramila Jayapal, an organizer of the women's protest, said immigration groups had learned that they could expand their public appeal by stressing the impact on women and children of deportations, which the Obama administration has continued at a fast pace.Maria Hernandez, 37, an immigrant from Mexico who does not have legal status, said she participated in the protest even though she is raising three young daughters in San Francisco."Why not?" Ms. Hernandez said before her arrest. "I'm taking the same risk every time I go out of my house, every time I take my daughters to school."All protesters were given misdemeanor citations with $50 fines and were released by late afternoon, organizers said. The police brought no criminal charges, which could have triggered deportation proceedings against the illegal immigrants.Leaders of the liberal women's organizations said they were embracing immigration in a bid to expand their following among immigrant and Latina women, both fast-growing populations. Those groups have been under siege on other fronts, with states passing laws restricting abortion or reducing funding for clinics providing birth control and other health services.Ms. O'Neill of NOW said that although she has been active for many years, the sit-in was her first arrest. "We need to bring these issues to the fore in the minds of women voters and demand that Congress gets this done this year," she said.In recent days, some House Republicans revised their predictions, suggesting that some immigration bills could be voted on during the fall. A memorandum circulated to House Republicans last Friday by Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the majority leader, mentioned immigration as one issue Republicans should expect to address before November, although he listed it after other priorities like the budget, Syria and efforts to repeal President Obama's health care law.The chairman of the House Judiciary Committee, Representative Robert W. Goodlatte, Republican of Virginia, still hopes to see votes on immigration bills by the end of October, a judiciary aide said Thursday. Those votes could be on four bills the committee approved this year, including a tough measure to strengthen immigration enforcement.Mr. Goodlatte and other Republican leaders would insist on passing measures to enhance enforcement and border security before the House could consider any legal status for illegal immigrants, the judiciary aide said."We must have enforcement as a prerequisite," the aide said.But Representative Zoe Lofgren of California, a Democrat on the Judiciary Committee, said Mr. Goodlatte's plan would lead to "a train wreck." Ms. Lofgren, who addressed a rally before the sit-in, said the committee bills had no support among Democrats and might not pass even in the House. She said Democrats were waiting to see if Speaker John A. Boehner of Ohio would clear the way for a debate on a bipartisan bill that she and six other lawmakers have drafted.
When it comes to immigration reform, Senator Ted Cruz has made it abundantly clear what he opposes: giving citizenship to people who broke the law to come here.What has not been as evident is what he supports: legal status for millions of people here already, while making it easier for immigrants to come here through the front door."I have said many times that I want to see common-sense immigration reform pass," he said. "I think most Americans want to see the problem fixed."But for Mr. Cruz, a Tea Party favorite who represents a state with rapidly changing demographics, finding common ground will not be easy. Many of the bedrock Tea Party supporters who helped elect him are immigration hard-liners who object to even the slightest nod toward amnesty, a loaded word that generally means providing an avenue for legal residency to people who entered the United States illegally. Such conservatives tend to favor mass deportation, or "self-deportation," for the millions of undocumented immigrants.On the other hand, Hispanics in Texas are projected to eclipse the white population sometime in the next decade, and Mr. Cruz cannot afford to alienate large numbers of Latino voters with a strident anti-immigrant tone and a hard-line legislative approach. Major business interests also are supporting a path to citizenship.What Mr. Cruz has tried to articulate in both word and deed is a middle ground. It got no support from Democrats in Washington, but it goes further than many on the far right want to go by offering leniency to undocumented immigrants here already: A path to legal status, but not to citizenship. A green card with no right to naturalization.Immigration-reform legislation from the Senate's so-called Gang of Eight passed that chamber in June and includes a 13-year path to citizenship. Mr. Cruz pushed unsuccessfully for amendments that would have, among other things, eliminated the citizenship component.Asked about what to do with the people here illegally, however, he stressed that he had never tried to undo the goal of allowing them to stay."The amendment that I introduced removed the path to citizenship, but it did not change the underlying work permit from the Gang of Eight," he said during a recent visit to El Paso. Mr. Cruz also noted that he had not called for deportation or, as Mitt Romney famously advocated, self-deportation.Mr. Cruz said recent polling indicated that people outside Washington support some reform, including legal status without citizenship. He said he was against naturalization because it rewarded lawbreakers and was unfair to legal immigrants. It also perpetuates illegal crossings, he added.Besides barring citizenship while instituting some level of legalization for those here already, Mr. Cruz has proposed increasing the number of green cards awarded annually, to 1.35 million from 675,000. He also wants to eliminate the per-country limit that he said left applicants from countries like Mexico, China and India hamstrung when they tried to gain legal entry to this country.Mr. Cruz said the Obama administration and partisan Democrats would not yield on the citizenship requirement, which they know would kill the entire effort because of a lack of support in the House. The result, he said, will be a future campaign tool by which Democrats can blame Republicans for failing to overhaul immigration."If your objective is actually to pass a bill insisting on a path to citizenship, it is in both intent and effect a poison pill," he said, adding that he thinks many of the immigration groups working on the issue are "being taken advantage of."Democrats say that Mr. Cruz is not in line with what most Americans favor."The majority of Americans support a path to earned citizenship for people who have long been part of our communities — pass a background check, pay a fee and pledge allegiance to our flag," said United States Representative Pete Gallego, Democrat of Alpine."With so many people and groups in favor of immigration reform, common sense would dictate that those blocking reform are the ones out of the mainstream."Mr. Cruz has said the stalemate is denying help to farmers and ranchers who "have a real need for labor resources."On that score, he finds himself out of step with hard-liners who do not believe immigrant laborers are needed.Ira Mehlman, a national spokesman for the Federation for American Immigration Reform, which advocates increased border security and limited immigration, opposes expanding the pool of legal workers the way Mr. Cruz proposes. And citizenship or not, he added, legal status still means immigrants take resources from citizens already here."We're also opposed to the expansion of guest-worker programs," he said. "There is no evidence of a worker shortage."Instead the group wants tougher internal enforcement so illegal immigrants adhere to what he calls "voluntary compliance," or self-deportation. Likewise, the Texas Tea Party activist JoAnn Fleming said she opposed allowing illegal immigrants to get "in line ahead of people who have tried to do it the right way."Mr. Cruz routinely cites his own history as inspiration for his views on immigration. His father, Rafael Cruz, a North Texas pastor and Tea Party favorite in his own right, fled Cuba and worked as a dishwasher before attending the University of Texas at Austin on a student visa, and he is now "living the American dream," Ted Cruz says.But critics of Mr. Cruz argue that Cubans are awarded what some today would call amnesty. Federal law allows Cubans to adjust their legal status a year after arriving. Mr. Cruz said American refugee law had always been sympathetic to those in his father's situation, even before Fidel Castro took hold of the island."U.S. immigration law, for many decades, has included asylum and refugee status for those who have credible fears of persecution and oppression," he said. Cuba poses a different scenario from other countries, he said, because United States immigration law has recognized for decades that there is a qualitative difference between fleeing political persecution and fleeing poverty.Mexico, he said, is a great country, although its drug violence and poverty are horrific, and Mexicans with a credible fear of persecution should apply for asylum. But the problem is not as widespread there, he said."It is not the case that throughout the country of Mexico, everyone there has a credible fear of persecution," he said. "Our laws allow that to be made on a case-by-case basis."
PHOENIX — The inspectors who set out last year to review the use-of-force policies employed by the roughly 40,000 federal agents guarding the nation's borders faced a significant obstacle from the get-go: Neither of two separate systems to track complaints of misconduct offered a clear way to link a specific accusation to the use of excessive force.The systems — one operated by the Office of the Inspector General and the other run jointly by Customs and Border Protection and Immigration and Customs Enforcement, all of them arms of the Department of Homeland Security — used different designations to categorize the complaints, making it impossible for the inspectors to determine the total number of excessive-force accusations and investigations against agents, according to a redacted version of their report, released Tuesday.Although the discrepancy in the systems has been known at least since the inspectors finished their work in April, Customs and Border Protection and Immigration and Customs Enforcement had yet to add use of force as an option to categorize complaints, the report said.To civil rights groups, the shortcoming underlines one of the problems of having a fragmented mechanism to track misconduct that is partly under the authority of the agents' employer. "At the heart of this report is a question about independence," said Chris Rickerd, policy counsel at the American Civil Liberties Union, one of the groups that had pressed for the review.Since January 2010, agents have killed at least 15 people, including a 16-year-old, along the border with Mexico, sometimes during confrontations set off by rock-throwing and other assaults, other times under less clear circumstances.The report did not answer whether the agents were wrong in firing their weapons, frustrating the 16 members of Congress who demanded the review after a PBS documentary last year raised questions about the actions of Customs and Border Protection agents in San Diego in 2010, when a man in their custody died after being stunned several times by a Taser.Using the abbreviation by which the agency is known, Representative Lucille Roybal-Allard, Democrat of California, said, "I once again call on C.B.P. to examine the best practices of the nation's top police forces and take meaningful action to avert future cases of abuse and death at the hands of the federal border enforcement personnel."The report's scope was limited to the effects the surge in the number of agents in the past six years has had on training and performance and whether reforms adopted by the agency could help avoid deadly encounters. The changes include audits of whether use-of-force policies learned in the academy were understood and correctly applied in the field.Over all, the inspectors reviewed 21,000 records from 2007 to 2012, which yielded more than 2,000 allegations of abuse, excessive force or intentional discharge of a weapon. About 500 complaints could not be categorized because the records lacked enough information.The findings were mixed. Between 2006 and 2009, when the Border Patrol grew by almost 65 percent, financing for use-of-force training quadrupled. Despite this and other budgetary increases, Customs and Border Protection has yet to build a mock border fence in one of its training centers to simulate the kinds of situations the agents are likely to face, the report found.Several officials interviewed by the inspectors said that although border agents know the necessary tools and tactics of the job when they leave basic training, they are not fully prepared for some real-life situations, like the stress and fear they may face when rocks rain on them from the Mexican side of the fence.During an internal review, Customs and Border Protection's use-of-force division found that new border agents and customs officers were not trained on all of the less-lethal weapons available to them, like pepper spray and Tasers, or sufficiently trained on high-risk situations like rock assaults.In one instance, an internal audit found that new agents simply did not understand the use-of-force policies when they entered the field. Customs and Border Protection officials said it was a single episode out of 32 audits performed.In their response, enclosed in the report, the officials acknowledged the importance of having a mock border-fence area. They noted that while the agency had the building materials, it did not yet have money for construction, though they were working to incorporate at least one simulator in the current fiscal year, which ends Sept. 30."We should continue to expand the use of scenario-based training and continue to pursue new technologies to ensure field agents have the right skills," the response read.
LOS ANGELES — California is challenging the historic status of American citizenship with measures to permit noncitizens to sit on juries and monitor polls for elections in which they cannot vote and to open the practice of law even to those here illegally. It is the leading edge of a national trend that includes granting drivers' licenses and in-state tuition to illegal immigrants in some states and that suggests legal residency could evolve into an appealing option should immigration legislation fail to produce a path to citizenship.With 3.5 million noncitizens who are legal permanent residents in California, some view the changes as an acknowledgment of who is living here and the need to require some public service of them. But the new laws raise profound questions about which rights and responsibilities rightly belong to citizens over residents."What is more basic to our society than being able to judge your fellow citizens?" asked Jessica A. Levinson, a professor at Loyola Law School, referring to jury service. "We're absolutely going to the bedrock of things here and stretching what we used to think of as limits."One new state law allows legal permanent residents to monitor polls during elections, help translate instructions and offer other assistance to voting citizens. And immigrants who were brought into the country illegally by their parents will be able to practice law here, something no other states allow.In many ways, the new measures underscore the lock Democrats have over the State Capitol, where they hold an overwhelming majority in both houses. Gov. Jerry Brown, a Democrat, signed the poll worker legislation this month and has indicated his approval of the other bills. Many of the changes, including granting drivers' licenses to unauthorized immigrants, passed with overwhelming support and the backing of several Republicans.State legislatures across the country approved a host of new immigrant-friendly measures this year, a striking change from just three years ago, when many states appeared poised to follow Arizona's lead to enact strict laws aimed at curbing illegal immigration. More than a dozen states now grant illegal immigrants in-state college tuition, and nine states and the District of Columbia also allow them to obtain drivers' licenses.With an estimated 2.5 million illegal immigrants living in California — more than in any other state in the country — some say the state has no choice but to find additional ways to integrate immigrants."It's a recognition that how people are living and working in their community might trump their formal legal status," said Hiroshi Motomura, an immigration law professor at the University of California, Los Angeles. "There is an argument that in parts of California a jury without a legal permanent resident is not really a jury of peers. Some view citizenship as the final consecration of complete integration, but this says, 'Let's take who we have and get them to participate in our civil institutions.' "Early this month, the State Supreme Court suggested during a hearing that lawmakers could create a law to address the case of Sergio Garcia, who was brought to the United States illegally as a child. Mr. Garcia had met every other requirement to become a licensed lawyer. Within days, legislation was approved to allow immigrants who were brought here illegally as minors to obtain law licenses, with just three opposing votes.But the bill to allow noncitizens to sit on juries has proved more controversial. Several newspaper editorials have urged Mr. Brown to veto it.Rocky Chávez, a Republican assemblyman from northern San Diego County, said that allowing noncitizens to serve on a jury would make it harder to uphold American standards of law."What we call domestic violence is appropriate in other countries, so the question becomes, 'How do we enforce our own social norms?' " Mr. Chávez said. He added that granting more privileges would weaken immigrants' desires to become citizens. "Once we erase all these distinctions, what's next? What is going to convince someone it is essential to get citizenship?"
FALFURRIAS, Tex. — By the time the woman perished, she had probably slogged 25 miles through dry ranch lands in her quest to enter the United States. She was found just feet from a highway where she might have been picked up and taken to Houston with other migrants making the same journey.Not long ago, her body would have been taken to a funeral home for a cursory attempt at identification, then buried in this town an hour north of the Mexico border under a sign reading "unknown female."Her death, probably from hypothermia, is part of a mounting body count that has overwhelmed the sparsely populated Brooks County, providing further evidence that immigrants are shifting their migration routes away from the well-worn paths into Arizona and instead crossing into deep southern Texas. The changing patterns have put an extra burden on local governments with limited experience in such matters and even fewer financial resources."There are some counties that have the economic wherewithal to take on these issues, and there are other counties that just don't have any money, so that puts them into a real bad bind," said Raquel Rubio-Goldsmith, coordinator of the Binational Migration Institute at the University of Arizona, which researches immigration issues.But Brooks County is trying to step up to the challenge. Now, all newly recovered bodies and skeletal remains of people suspected of being immigrants will travel 90 miles to nearby Webb County for autopsies, DNA sampling and more intense efforts at identification.It is a big step for Brooks County, which has a population of just over 7,100 and where on a recent morning the chief deputy mopped the floors of the sheriff's office himself. He will also be making the weekly trips to deliver corpses to the medical examiner in Laredo.The county handled 129 bodies last year, which Judge Raul Ramirez, the county's top administrator, says blew a hole in the budget. And even though he and most other local officials see illegal immigration as a federal problem, federal money has not followed.Last year, Brooks County trailed only Pima County, Ariz., in the number of immigrant bodies recovered, and it already has 76 this year. Nearly a million people live in Pima County, and the 171 bodies found in 2012 were consistent with annual totals dating back to 2004, according to a report by the migration institute. Brooks County, on the other hand, averaged 50 to 60 dead before last year.Border Patrol apprehensions in the area have soared. The number of immigrants detained in Rio Grande Valley border sector in South Texas outpaced the historic leader, the Tucson sector, by more than 30,000. Those numbers are an imperfect measure of the overall flow of migrants, but most of the growth has involved Central American immigrants, who often take the more direct route to the United States through Texas.Immigrants typically die in Brooks County trying to circumvent a Border Patrol checkpoint. They are usually dropped off with guides south of the checkpoint and forced to hike for two or three days to a pickup spot north of the checkpoint.Dr. Corinne Stern, the Webb County medical examiner, puts her office's identification rate on nonskeletal remains at 65 to 70 percent. But the woman from the ranch remains a Jane Doe for now. Found on Aug. 26, her body was already in an advanced stage of decomposition.There are clues, though. She was wearing earrings and a ring on the middle finger of her left hand. She wore a Gold's Gym T-shirt and pink Converse sneakers with pink laces. She carried several phone numbers, which have not turned up anything yet.Tucked into one pocket of her shorts was a photograph of a boy about 5 years old. He is wearing a suit and what appears to be a graduation cap.In the past, unidentified immigrants were crammed into the local cemetery without DNA samples being taken. The cemetery did not even have accurate records for the dead. In May, Lori Baker, a Baylor University anthropologist, led a team to Falfurrias to exhume unidentified immigrants' graves.Ms. Baker identified 54 marked graves but found 63 burials. In some cases, the team opened a body bag expecting to find one person and found four other bags of remains. Some of the remains carried tags indicating that they came from a neighboring county.She plans to return for more exhumations next year, and she is encouraged by the county's progress, noting that the short-staffed sheriff's office is going to start taking DNA samples from family members who come looking for missing loved ones.Three days before the woman was found on El Tule Ranch, the ranch manager, Lavoyger Durham, proudly showed off his personal contribution to addressing the problem: a 55-gallon blue plastic drum holding one-gallon water jugs. The water station is topped with a 30-foot pole and a large blue flag.Mr. Durham, 68, said it was the first water station in Brooks County, and he has plans for several more. He would prefer for the government to erect a double-layer border fence. But in the meantime, he does not want to see people continue to die on the ranch. He estimates he has found 25 bodies on the property in the last 23 years."I'm trying to expose the killing fields of Brooks County," Mr. Durham said. "If dead human beings don't catch your attention, what the hell else is going to? We're just trying to be human about it."
About 11.7 million immigrants are living in the United States illegally, a population that has not varied much over the last three years but may recently be increasing again, according to new estimates published Monday by the Pew Research Center Hispanic Trends Project .As lawmakers in Washington debate an immigration overhaul that could include a pathway to legal status or citizenship for millions of unauthorized immigrants, the figures from the nonpartisan Pew Center are regarded by many demographers as the most reliable estimates of the number of people who might be eligible for those programs.The new estimates, which are based on the most recent census data and other official statistics, show that the population of immigrants here illegally did not decline significantly from 2009 to 2012, despite record numbers of about 400,000 deportations each year and stepped-up border enforcement by the Obama administration as well as laws to crack down on illegal immigration in states like Alabama, Arizona and Georgia.Recent figures, including reports from the Border Patrol of illegal crossings at the southwest border, suggest that the numbers began to grow again last year. But Pew researchers said the increases in the 2012 census data — the latest available — were too small for them to conclusively confirm the recent rise."For Congress working on the demands of a potential legalization program, these are pretty solid numbers," said Jeffrey S. Passel, senior demographer at Pew's Hispanic Trends Project, who wrote the report with D'Vera Cohn and Ana Gonzalez-Barrera.The Pew researchers, for the first time using larger census samples from past years, also went back to revise some of their previous estimates. The new figures, while only slightly different, show an even clearer picture of the surging growth in unauthorized immigrants to a peak of 12.2 million in 2007 from 3.5 million in 1990.In 2008 and 2009, there was a steep drop, with the numbers falling to an estimated 11.3 million. After 2009, the population leveled off and by some measures might have been gradually growing. The Pew report does not point to any causes of the changes. But Mr. Passel noted that the dates of the decrease matched the deepest years of the economic slowdown, with its high unemployment."We don't know what caused that decline, but it certainly coincides with the recession," Mr. Passel said. "And we can say that the current enforcement practices have not led to any measurable reduction beyond the 2009 period."Looking at Mexico, the report confirms "dramatic reductions in arrivals of new unauthorized immigrants" from there since 2007. The researchers cite Mexican census figures showing that the rate of migration to the United States dropped by two-thirds from 2007 to 2012. From 2007 to 2009, the report says, more undocumented Mexicans left the United States than came here illegally.But about six million Mexican-born immigrants still make up 52 percent of the unauthorized population, according to the Pew estimates."I don't see any sign of a return to mass undocumented migration from Mexico," said Douglas Massey, a sociology professor at Princeton who has studied Mexican migration patterns for decades. "The Mexican population in the United States is stable. Self-deportation is not working," he said, referring to policies advocated by some lawmakers to increase enforcement pressure on illegal immigrants to spur them to leave voluntarily.Recent increases in illegal arrivals are migrants from countries other than Mexico, including Central American nations, according to the Pew report.The report shows variations among states. In Texas, the unauthorized population never saw any significant decline in the last decade. In Florida and New Jersey, the numbers are growing again after falling in the first years of the recession. In California, Illinois and New York, the numbers declined after 2007 and never rebounded.The Pew researchers derive their estimates with a complex formula that calculates the number of legal immigrants in the country and subtracts that from the overall foreign-born population, which was 41.7 million last year. About 28 percent of that total was immigrants here illegally, according to the Pew report.
AUSTIN, Tex. — A new survey shows that Hispanics, the nation's largest minority group, have grown increasingly negative toward the Republican Party during the political battle over changing immigration law and lean surprisingly liberal on social issues like gay marriage — a combination of factors that presents a steep challenge for Republicans in trying to win back Hispanic voters.More than 6 in 10 Hispanic respondents said they felt closer to the Democratic Party than they had in the past, while only 3 in 10 said they felt closer to the Republican Party. When Hispanics were asked to offer descriptions of the parties, 48 percent of the responses about the Republicans were negative associations like "intolerant" and "out of touch," while 22 percent of the responses for the Democrats were negative.The outlook for Republicans has grown increasingly negative since 2004, when President George W. Bush won re-election with 44 percent of the Hispanic vote. The survey, released Friday by the Public Religion Research Institute, a nonprofit research group in Washington, found that 56 percent of registered Hispanic voters identified with the Democrats, while 19 percent said they identified with Republicans, and 19 percent as independents.The religious identities of Hispanics are also changing, with 69 percent saying they grew up Catholic, but only 53 percent saying they identify as Catholic now. Those saying they are evangelical Protestants have increased by six percentage points to 13 percent. But Hispanics, like Americans as a whole, are increasingly claiming no religion at all: 7 percent of Hispanics say they were raised in a faith but now have no religious affiliation, bringing the total percentage of Hispanics with no religion to 12 percent.Robert P. Jones, the chief executive of the institute, said in an interview: "If these trends continue, what we'll see is a growing polarization among Hispanics, anchored on one end by evangelicals, who tend to be conservative, and on the other end by religiously unaffiliated Hispanics. The unaffiliated voted for Obama by 80 percent, so you see really different political profiles."Conservatives have often claimed that Hispanics are a natural constituency for the Republican Party because they care about what the party considers family values. This holds true on abortion, with 52 percent saying abortion should be illegal in all or most cases, and 47 percent saying it should be legal. But on same-sex marriage, 55 percent of Hispanics favor allowing gay and lesbian couples to marry, compared with 43 percent who are opposed.And Hispanics in the poll said they were far more likely to vote for candidates based on their stances on immigration than on their stance on abortion or gay marriage.The parties' handling of immigration has been a major factor swaying Hispanics' allegiances. In the survey, 42 percent of Hispanics said that Democrats were better able to deal with immigration, while 16 percent said Republicans would do better.But in a finding that could be tantalizing for both parties, 21 percent of Hispanics polled said neither party is best able to handle immigration, and 17 percent said both parties are equally able to deal with immigration. About one in five registered Hispanic voters and more than one-third of Hispanic citizens who are not registered to vote said they were independents, suggesting they might be up for grabs between the parties.Latinos named health care as one of their primary concerns, and they were sharply divided on President Obama's health care law. Nearly half, 48 percent, said they would support repealing the law, while 47 percent opposed repeal, a finding that could be promising for Republicans battling that law.Hispanics in the poll had strong ideas about resolving illegal immigration. Sixty-seven percent of Latinos surveyed said unauthorized immigrants in the country should be allowed to become American citizens if they meet certain requirements. Only 17 percent said they should be allowed to become legal permanent residents but not citizens. An even smaller number, 10 percent, said they should be deported.In June, the Senate passed a broad immigration bill that includes a path to citizenship for all of an estimated 11.7 million immigrants here illegally. Republican leaders in the House said they would not take up that measure but that they could act on smaller bills that would strengthen enforcement and make other fixes to the system. Some Republicans have said they would consider legal status for illegal immigrants, but without any path to citizenship.Half of Hispanic adults are immigrants born outside the United States. But in contrast to widespread perceptions that many Latinos are here illegally and do not speak English well, the report cites census data showing that two-thirds of Hispanic adults are United States citizens and about two-thirds either speak English primarily or are bilingual.The poll was conducted between Aug. 23 and Sept. 3 and was released at a conference of religion news writers in Austin. Online interviews were conducted in English and Spanish with 1,563 Hispanic adults, citizens and noncitizens, who were part of the GfK KnowledgePanel, a nationally representative probability sample of Americans, and the margin of sampling error is plus or minus four percentage points.
Thousands of supporters of an immigration overhaul held rallies on Saturday at more than 150 sites in 40 states, trying to pressure Congress, despite the partisan turmoil in Washington, to focus on passing a pathway to citizenship for millions of immigrants here illegally.Hoping to display the wide reach of their movement, advocates held larger rallies in immigrant strongholds like Los Angeles, San Diego and Boston, with smaller demonstrations in places where immigrant groups have grown recently, including Atlanta; Rogers, Ark.; and Yakima, Wash. Organizers described the events, and a large rally they have planned for Tuesday on the National Mall in Washington, as their major show of force this year.On what they called a "National Day of Immigrant Dignity and Respect," supporters said more than 50,000 people had turned out nationwide. But the demonstrations came when few lawmakers on Capitol Hill were thinking about immigration, with the federal government shut down and the House of Representatives locked in a feud with President Obama and Democrats over health care and debt funding.Even while advocates have built up their strength — with a broad coalition of business, labor, religious and law enforcement groups calling for a comprehensive bill — they fear that momentum is slipping away for Congress to act this year.In Birmingham, Ala., several hundred demonstrators convened for a rally in a downtown park, then marched chanting through the center of town. Rally speakers, including Benard Simelton, the president of the N.A.A.C.P. in Alabama, portrayed the immigration effort as part of broader civil rights activism in the state. Many immigrants marched with small children."I know there has been a shutdown, but we want Congress to know that the time is now to act," said Evelyn Servin, an immigrant advocate. "We don't want any more deportations. The respect we deserve is really needed here in Alabama."In California, protests and vigils were held in 21 cities. In San Diego, several thousand people gathered in Balboa Park on the edge of downtown. They marched to the sound of drumbeats and horns shouting "Si, se puede" ("Yes, we can").Ana Nuñez, 30, a student, said she had been living in the United States since 1989 without documents but recently received a temporary deportation deferral. She said that she had not seen her ailing grandparents since leaving Mexico and that she hoped for permanent legal status so she could travel to see them."I want to physically feel them," Ms. Nuñez said, holding a yellow sign reading "Citizenship for 11 million #timeisnow."While the demonstrations were unfolding, Gov. Jerry Brown of California signed into law eight bills on Saturday expanding protections for immigrants in the state, including for those without legal papers. One bill restricted the ability of local and state police to detain immigrants on the basis of holds issued by federal enforcement officials, if the immigrants had not been arrested on serious charges."While Washington waffles on immigration, California is forging ahead," Mr. Brown said.Many events were focused on House Republican lawmakers whom advocates hope to persuade to vote for the overhaul. In Illinois, 26 marchers from church groups finished a two-day, 30-mile walk through unseasonal heat at the Taylorville offices of Representative Rodney Davis, a Republican. Many were immigrants here without legal papers, marchers said.In Springfield, Ohio, several dozen people protested outside the office of the speaker of the House, John A. Boehner.In Boston, some 1,000 demonstrators marched on Boylston Street, bustling with shoppers. The marchers headed down the street, hoisting signs with messages like "Don't Deport My Mom."Wilmer Carranza, a 16-year-old high school student who said his parents were here without immigration papers, said he was frustrated by the slow pace of immigration action in Washington."What if they get deported?" he said, referring to his parents. "What if I'm alone? What am I going to do?"
DAYTON, Ohio — Fighting back from the ravages of industrial decline, this city adopted a novel plan two years ago to revive its economy and its spirits: become a magnet for immigrants.The Dayton City Commission voted to make the city "immigrant friendly," with programs to attract newcomers and encourage those already here, as a way to help stem job losses and a drop in population.In north Dayton — until recently a post-apocalyptic landscape of vacant, gutted houses — 400 Turkish families have moved in, many coming from other American cities. Now white picket fences, new roofs and freshly painted porches are signs of a brisk urban renewal led by the immigrants, one clapboard house at a time."We want to invest in the places where we are accepted better," said Islom Shakhbandarov, a Turkish immigrant leader. "And we are accepted better in Dayton."Other struggling cities are trying to restart growth by luring enterprising immigrants, both highly skilled workers and low-wage laborers. In the Midwest, similar initiatives have begun in Chicago, Cleveland, Columbus, Indianapolis, St. Louis and Lansing, Mich., as well as Detroit, as it strives to rise out of bankruptcy. In June, officials from those cities and others met in Detroit to start a common network."We want to get back to the entrepreneurial spirit that immigrants bring," said Richard Herman, a lawyer in Cleveland who advises cities on ideas for development based on immigration.The new welcome for immigrants reflects a broader shift in public opinion, polls show, as the country leaves behind the worst of the recession. More Americans agree that immigrants, even some in the country illegally, can help the economy, giving impetus to Congressional efforts to overhaul an immigration system that many say is broken.Concerns about uncontrolled illegal immigration, which produced strict curbs in Arizona and other parts of the country, have not been an issue in Dayton. Officials here say their goal is to invite legal immigrants. But they make no effort to pursue residents without legal status, if they are otherwise law-abiding.The momentum for change in Dayton came from the immigrants. In 2010, Mr. Shakhbandarov told the newly elected mayor, Gary Leitzell, that he was thinking of asking Turkish immigrants across the United States to settle here. Most of the Turks in Dayton are refugees who fled persecution in Russia and other former Soviet bloc countries.Mr. Leitzell was intrigued. "I said, the worst thing that could happen is that 4,000 Turkish families could come to Dayton and fix up 4,000 houses," the mayor recalled. "So how do we facilitate their success?"With 14,000 empty dwellings in the city, officials were open to trying something different.Officials quickly realized that this city of 141,000 already had a small but fast-growing foreign-born population: more than 10,000 Muslims from different countries; refugees from Burundi and Somalia; college students from China, India and Saudi Arabia; Filipinos in health care jobs; and laborers from Latin America, many here illegally."The hospitals, the police, the libraries, the service agencies, the landlords, they were all dealing with immigrants, but no one was talking about it," said Tim Riordan, the city manager. "So we brought it out of the shadows."The officials hosted many town meetings to test whether Dayton's residents were ready to be hospitable. But the only vocal resistance came from anti-illegal-immigrant groups from other Ohio cities. In October 2011, the City Commission voted unanimously for the Welcome Dayton plan.Working with local organizations, the city found interpreters for public offices, added foreign-language books in libraries and arranged for English classes. Teachers went back to school to learn other languages.Local groups gave courses for immigrants opening small businesses and helped families of refugees and foreign students. City officials worked with Wright State University, a public institution, to find ways for immigrant doctors and engineers to cut through bureaucracy and gain certifications so they could practice in the United States.
LOS ANGELES — Breaking with Democrats in the State Legislature, Gov. Jerry Brown vetoed a bill on Monday that would have made California the first state to allow immigrants who are not citizens to serve on juries, saying that the responsibility should come only with citizenship.As leader of a state with 3.5 million noncitizens who are legal permanent residents, Mr. Brown in recent weeks had signed into law numerous measures that put California at the vanguard of expanding immigrant rights, including granting driver's licenses to illegal immigrants.On Saturday, he signed several such bills, most prominently legislation stopping local law officers from detaining immigrants and transferring them to federal authorities unless they have committed certain serious crimes. And he agreed in August to let noncitizens monitor polls for elections.But the governor drew the line at allowing legal immigrants to serve on juries. "Jury service, like voting, is quintessentially a prerogative and responsibility of citizenship," Mr. Brown said in a brief veto message. "This bill would permit lawful permanent residents who are not citizens to serve on a jury. I don't think that's right."Some legal scholars had said that the measure raised profound questions about what rights and responsibilities belonged to citizens alone, and a number of newspapers published editorials urging the governor to veto the bill after the Democratic-controlled Legislature passed it, with most Republicans opposing it.It "calls into question the very meaning of citizenship," The Sacramento Bee wrote in August, saying the legislation would provide an incentive to immigrants to avoid becoming citizens. "Why should green-card holders become citizens if they can enjoy the rights of citizenship?"Supporters said the measure would make it easier to assemble jury pools and grant legal immigrants a jury of their peers.While Mr. Brown faced pressure from fellow Democrats and advocates to sign the other bills giving immigrants new rights, there was no such campaign to convince him that allowing noncitizens to serve on juries was a pressing matter. By contrast, immigrants' rights groups held rallies and letter-writing campaigns urging Mr. Brown to sign the bill stopping local law enforcement agencies from detaining immigrants and transferring them to federal authorities unless they had committed certain serious crimes.Mr. Brown had vetoed similar legislation before, but his staff worked with immigrant advocates to devise a compromise that expands the kinds of crimes that would allow local authorities to hold on to arrested immigrants, like felony domestic violence and D.U.I. convictions.Under the new law, known as the Trust Act, unless immigrants have committed certain serious crimes, they cannot be detained past when they would otherwise become eligible for release."While Washington waffles on immigration, California's forging ahead," Mr. Brown said in a statement announcing his approval of the law on Saturday. "I'm not waiting."The batch of new laws also included one that would allow immigrants without legal status to be admitted to the state bar and practice law in California.There was little outcry about the governor's veto from immigrants' rights groups on Monday. Instead, they praised Mr. Brown for signing bills that they said amounted to "enormous momentum for immigrants.""We have really created a counterweight to other states like Arizona, that's really the story," said Jon Rodney, a spokesman for the California Immigrant Policy Center.Assemblyman Bob Wieckowski, a Democrat from the Bay Area and the chairman of the Judiciary Committee, which wrote the bill, said he did not plan to ask the Legislature to override the veto, but would introduce similar legislation next year."I hope and believe this is just a temporary mistake," Mr. Wieckowski said of the veto. "He has shown some enlightened thinking — he has just signed a bill that says even if you're undocumented you can go in front of a jury, so I hope he gets some more thoughts from constitutionally enlightened people around the country, and is convinced this is the right thing to do."Mr. Wieckowski said he still believed barring immigrants from jury duty was a sign of prejudice, particularly in a state where legal permanent residents make up nearly 10 percent of the population. He had believed Mr. Brown would sign the bill, he said, because the governor approved legislation allowing legal permanent residents to serve as poll workers.Assemblyman Rocky Chavez, a Republican from San Diego and the most vocal opponent of the jury duty bill, praised the governor for stopping a bill that "attempted to solve a problem that did not exist.""The debate over this bill attempted to create a social wedge in our communities over our justice system," he said in a statement. "The phrase 'jury of your peers' still means something in our criminal justice system."
WASHINGTON — As several thousand demonstrators rallied around them, eight members of the House of Representatives were arrested on Tuesday outside the Capitol in a protest to push Congress to pass broad immigration legislation that includes a path to citizenship for immigrants in the country illegally.The protests came as most attention in Congress was focused on the standoff over the partial government shutdown and the partisan disputes over health care and fiscal policy, pushing immigration to the side.The lawmakers, all Democrats, were detained by the Capitol Police after they stood silently in a line in the middle of a street that borders the Capitol lawn, blocking traffic. As the police handcuffed them behind their backs and led them away, a crowd pressed in, chanting, "Let them go!"The representatives arrested were Joseph Crowley and Charles B. Rangel of New York, Keith Ellison of Minnesota, Al Green of Texas, Luis V. Gutierrez and Jan Schakowsky of Illinois, Raul M. Grijalva of Arizona and John Lewis of Georgia. More than 150 other protesters, many from labor unions and immigrant organizations, were also arrested after they sat down and linked arms in the same street.The arrests came after a rally by thousands of supporters of an immigration overhaul held in the middle of the National Mall, with a stage and live music by the Tigres del Norte, a popular Mexican-American band.In a storm of Twitter posts, conservatives questioned how the immigration groups could hold a demonstration on the Mall, which is a national park, when national parks and memorials are closed as a result of the government shutdown. House Republicans have tried to reopen parks and monuments while keeping most of the federal government closed.Conservatives said the Obama administration was showing a double standard by allowing the rally a week after World War II veterans were blocked from entering their memorial on the Mall. The veterans went in despite barricades placed there. After that, the National Park Service said veterans would be allowed to enter the memorial during the shutdown.In a statement, the Park Service said it had allowed the immigration rally as an expression of "First Amendment rights," the same rationale it had provided for opening the war memorial."The Mall is supposed to be shut," said Brad Botwin, the director of Help Save Maryland, an anti-illegal-immigrant group, who joined a handful of people at the Mall to protest the immigration demonstration. "Why is the Park Service helping illegal immigrant groups and desperate labor unions to have a rally today?"From the stage, Representative Nancy Pelosi of California, the minority leader, thanked the White House for giving permission for the rally to proceed.At midday, House Democratic leaders broke away briefly from the tense debates inside the Capitol to tell the demonstrators that they would press for a vote on a bill in the House this year.Ms. Pelosi said Democrats would support broad legislation with a "path to earned citizenship" for unauthorized immigrants. Democrats said they were confident there was a majority in the House, including Republicans and Democrats, to pass such a bill."Let's get a vote on the floor," Ms. Pelosi said.Democrats are working to put their mark on the issue with the Latino and other immigrant groups at the rally. They introduced a bill in the House last week that closely matches broad legislation passed by the Senate in June. But that bill had no Republican sponsors and seemed unlikely to advance.Several House Republicans — including Mario Diaz-Balart and Ileana Ros-Lehtinen, both of Florida, and Jeff Denham and David Valadao, both of California — appeared at the rally to call for bipartisan efforts to pass an immigration overhaul.In an interview, Mr. Denham said immigration could be less divisive than the fiscal issues that led to the shutdown. He added that repairing the immigration system could be an "economic driver" that would help reduce the deficit.But Representative Zoe Lofgren, Democrat of California, said that given the raw feelings between the parties in the House, the prospects for action on immigration were not clear."A huge majority of the American people think we ought to fix the immigration system, and we have the votes to do it," Ms. Lofgren said. "But there is no vote. There is a problem here with the American democracy."
LAUDERHILL, Fla. — Paving the way for a new attempt to remove noncitizens from voter rolls, Florida's election chief tried to stoke confidence on Wednesday in the revamped plan before a largely skeptical crowd in immigrant-heavy South Florida.For Ken Detzner — Florida's secretary of state and the man in charge of elections — the meeting's combative tone was the latest measure of the distrust engendered by the state's move last year to try to weed out noncitizens from registration lists months before the polls opened. The Republican-driven decision to review the rolls took on political overtones because Hispanics in Florida vote largely for Democrats.Mr. Detzner, capping a five-city tour, defended his decision — if not the breakdown in the process last year — saying it is his obligation to ensure the integrity of the state's voter rolls. Only American citizens are permitted to vote in elections.But the driver's license data that Florida used to compile the list of potential noncitizens last year proved so unreliable that decorated war veterans turned up on the rosters sent to election supervisors. The supervisors chose not to participate in the process.Ultimately, Mr. Detzner called off the search, frustrated that the state was blocked from using a more expansive federal database to check immigration status. In the summer of 2012, the state was granted access to the Department of Homeland Security database after challenging the federal government in court.Mr. Detzner acknowledged the flaws in last year's effort. "The credibility and integrity of the elections process is based, as I said, on the voter rolls," he told the crowd, which included advocates for voter and immigrant rights. "I am the person who is responsible. I accept responsibility for the issues and problems that occurred last year."Designed to assure voters that the same mistakes will not be repeated, the new plan to review voter registration rolls for noncitizens will rely chiefly on the Homeland Security database. The database, which does not include the names of citizens, is used by the federal government and states to see if immigrants, depending on their status, are eligible for benefits."It's the federal government's database, and the only one we have that is reliable," Mr. Detzner said.The new effort also will include a series of safeguards and checks by state election employees to try to ensure that people are not being erroneously labeled noncitizens.But during the discussion here on Wednesday, the Palm Beach supervisor of elections, Susan Bucher, a critic of the effort, expressed concerns about the database's dependability.While the data in the federal database comes from the states, Mr. Detzner did not know which Florida agencies collect and funnel the information to Homeland Security. He and his staff also did not know how often the state data is updated to reflect changes in immigration status.In the 2012 agreement with Florida which allowed the state to use the information, the Department of Homeland Security said that the database was not a foolproof way of verifying citizenship.Ms. Bucher said state data is sometimes flawed. She said she recently handled a case involving a felon who had regained his right to vote, a change that was not reflected in a state database.She also called it onerous for the state's 67 election supervisors to double-check the federal database, which they can now do, and then make the final determination on a person's citizenship status. "My office doesn't know anything about documents for immigration," she said. "We don't have the staff. We are spending our money to run elections."The exchange between the two grew so heated that at one point Mr. Detzner cut off Ms. Bucher's questions.The audience proved no less combative. One person questioned the wisdom of pursuing the purge when so little fraud is evident. "There are more shark attacks each year in Florida than voter fraud cases," the person wrote in a question that was read aloud. "How much money is wasted on this?"The question, which drew a few laughs, was not quite accurate. Last year, 26 people in Florida were bitten by sharks and 85 noncitizens were removed from the rolls, although Mr. Detzner said the number was incomplete because the scrub of the rolls was never finished.He also said that he could not vouch for any one number."We did not really track that," he said. "And to be honest with you, the program last year was deficient in data collection because we never really initiated a whole program."As for the new plan, Mr. Detzner said that he was still unsure when it would begin but that if inconsistencies were found, he would suspend the search until they could be addressed.Nevertheless, he said, he is obligated to move forward in identifying noncitizens."We have a job to do; we are required to do it, we are sworn to do it," Mr. Detzner said. "This is not some type of mission. I will be the first to cheer, if I don't have anybody to remove, but I don't think that is realistic."
A detained Mexican woman who had been shackled to her hospital bed while giving birth in Nashville will receive $490,000 in a settlement and also has the prospect of a resident visa.The monetary settlement, which was approved on Tuesday by the council governing Nashville and Davidson County, Tenn., closes a five-year legal battle that began when the woman, Juana Villegas, was arrested in July 2008 after a traffic stop in a Nashville suburb.And in an unusual move, a federal judge has urged immigration authorities to give Ms. Villegas a special visa that is generally offered to crime victims. The judge said the visa was in order because of the violation of Ms. Villegas's civil rights. His finding created a new legal basis for the victims' visa, said Elliott Ozment, a lawyer who represented Ms. Villegas.Ms. Villegas, who was nine months pregnant when she was arrested, was in the country illegally. She was detained for six days because of an agreement between Davidson County and federal authorities that gave immigration enforcement powers to sheriffs' officers.As a result of that program, jail officers decided to hold her after learning that Ms. Villegas, who has been living in the United States since 1996, had once been deported.Soon after Ms. Villegas gave birth, she was returned to the jail without her newborn son. A hospital nurse gave her a breast pump, but she was not allowed to take it into the jail and developed a painful breast infection.In 2011 a federal judge in Tennessee, William J. Haynes Jr., ruled in Ms. Villegas's favor, finding that jail officers had shown "deliberate indifference" to her medical needs by cuffing her ankle to her hospital bed through most of her labor and during recovery. Nashville appealed, and a dispute over the amount of the damages was winding through the court when city officials decided this year to settle. Much has changed in Nashville since Ms. Villegas's arrest. In September 2008, the Davidson County sheriff issued a new policy ending the shackling of pregnant women in detention."We do not restrain pregnant inmates at any time unless they are threatening harm to themselves or to others," said Karla R. West, a spokeswoman for the Davidson County Sheriff's Office.Last year, Davidson County officials decided not to renew their federal immigration enforcement agreement. After intense criticism by immigrant advocate groups of the program, known as 287(g), the Obama administration has reduced it nationwide, declining to sign new agreements or renew existing ones.She will receive $100,000 from the settlement, and her lawyers, including the Sherrard & Roe law firm, will receive $390,000. Ms. Villegas, who continues to live in Nashville and has four children, all American citizens, was authorized to work legally as the case progressed. Judge Haynes has called for her to get the visa as well.Mr. Ozment said he continues to receive cases from other states of pregnant immigrants who have been shackled or restrained during detention. "This is not a lone problem, this is a systemic problem," Mr. Ozment said. The issue of the breast pump was not resolved in the settlement.Ms. Villegas, speaking by telephone on Thursday, said she was ultimately glad for the publicity surrounding her case."If my case had not become public, the sheriff would not have made any changes," Ms. Villegas said. "I'm glad other women who go to the jail here will not suffer what I went through."
As the fiscal crisis subsided and the government went back to work this week, President Obama and other leading Democrats were quick to say that an immigration overhaul should be back on the agenda in Congress.Mr. Obama raised the issue in his first comments after lawmakers reached a deal to reopen the government, and on the night the shutdown ended the three top Senate Democrats said they hoped to extend the bipartisan moment that produced the compromise by taking up immigration."Let's move on," said the Senate majority leader, Harry Reid of Nevada. He added that he hoped "the next venture is making sure we do immigration reform."But the possibilities for progress on the issue will be determined in the House of Representatives, where many conservative Republicans are fuming with frustration over their meager gains from the two-week shutdown and turning their ire against Mr. Obama, saying he failed to negotiate with them. It will be up to Speaker John A. Boehner of Ohio to discern whether relations with the White House are simply too raw for House Republicans to consider legislation on an issue the president has made a priority.Many Democrats and some Republicans are arguing that passing a broad immigration bill could be a way for Republicans to come back from the bruising they took in the polls during the shutdown. "When the Republican polling numbers are at 20 percent, there's a pretty strong argument to do something to get those poll numbers up, and immigration is a good way to do that," said Senator Charles E. Schumer, Democrat of New York.The effort to repair the immigration system has attracted support across the political spectrum, including from traditional Republican allies like business, agriculture and evangelical Christians. The Senate passed a sweeping bill in June on a bipartisan vote. But lawmakers on both sides agreed that the window for action on immigration is narrow, most likely limited to the remaining months of this year, before the next fiscal deadlines, or maybe to early next spring.Mr. Boehner would like to make progress this year on immigration, a spokesman said Friday. "The speaker remains committed to a step-by-step process to fix our broken immigration system," said the spokesman, Michael Steel.But House Republican leaders are waiting to gauge the intensity of distrust of the White House among fractious conservatives in their caucus."The president's attitude and actions over the past few weeks have certainly made getting anything done on immigration considerably harder," a senior Republican aide said.Several Republicans who had been working on immigration bills before the shutdown said they no longer believed Mr. Obama would negotiate fairly."I think what he has done over the last two and a half weeks, he's tried to destroy the Republican Party," Representative Raúl R. Labrador, Republican of Idaho, said Wednesday. "I think that anything we do right now with this president on immigration will be with that same goal in mind, which is to destroy the Republican Party and not to get good policies."If the House takes any action, it will probably be on smaller measures that emerged earlier this year from the Judiciary and Homeland Security Committees. The Judiciary Committee, led by Representative Robert W. Goodlatte of Virginia, approved four bills that deal with enforcement, agricultural guest workers and high-skilled visas. A homeland security bill would tighten border security.Republican lawmakers, including Mr. Goodlatte and Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the House majority leader, have been working on a bill to give legal status to young immigrants who came here illegally as children. But no bill has been introduced and no decisions have been made on who would introduce it, Republican aides said Friday.House Democrats predicted Republicans would be spurred on by an interest in showing skeptical voters that they can produce results."I'm more optimistic because what prevailed at the end of this Republican shutdown and potential default was a clear message that this is not how you run government," said Representative Xavier Becerra of California, the chairman of the House Democratic Caucus.Republicans who want an immigration bill were encouraged that Mr. Boehner survived the shutdown retaining the support of the conservatives who set it off; they hope the speaker will be emboldened to move on immigration legislation, which is still controversial within his conference.Many Democrats say Mr. Boehner could quickly pass a bill similar to the Senate's if he would allow a vote like the one that ended the shutdown, to pass legislation with both Democratic and Republican votes.Pressure for that option from advocacy groups is growing and intensifying. In recent days, protesters held sit-ins and blocked roadways at immigration detention centers in several cities."For our families, this is intensely personal," Kica Matos of the Fair Immigration Reform Movement, a rights coalition, said Friday. "It's about keeping mothers with sons, fathers with daughters. We will no longer stand for the Republican family separation agenda that has torn us apart for far too long."
WASHINGTON — President Obama on Thursday renewed his call for an immigration overhaul, telling an audience of activists at the White House that the fate of a bipartisan Senate bill now rests with Republicans in the House."Anyone still standing in the way of this bipartisan reform should at least explain why," Mr. Obama said to repeated applause in the East Room. "If House Republicans have new and different additional ideas for how we should move forward, then we should hear them. I will be listening."The Senate passed legislation in June by a vote of 68-32, giving a lift to Mr. Obama's plans to improve border security, require employers to verify the immigration status of their workers, and provide a path to citizenship for 11 million undocumented immigrants. White House strategists hoped that the vote would prompt action in the House, where Republicans had resisted similar calls for an overhaul of the system.But the effort stalled this summer, with many House Republicans expressing dissatisfaction with the increases in border security and saying they do not support any plan that would allow people in the country illegally to eventually become citizens.Mr. Obama's remarks on Thursday were aimed at rebooting the discussion after months in which attention shifted to concerns about Iran and Syria and contentious disputes at home with the House Republicans that led to a government shutdown."That's no reason that we shouldn't be able to work together on the things that we do agree on," Mr. Obama said as he urged the House to take up the immigration issue. "It's good for our economy. It's good for our national security. It's good for our people. And we should do it this year."House Republicans have said they want to pursue an immigration overhaul in a step-by-step manner, addressing different aspects of the issue with smaller, individual bills. Some have indicated, for example, that they support granting citizenship for immigrants who were brought to America as small children and grew up here.Mr. Obama said passage of legislation to address all the issues would help the nation's economy and allow millions of immigrants to emerge from "the shadows" and live their lives without fear of being sent back to their native countries.But even as he urged the activists to keep up the fight in the days and weeks ahead, Mr. Obama expressed a bit of pessimism about the likelihood that Congress will soon pass legislation that he can sign."Just because something is smart and fair and good for the economy and fiscally responsible and supported by business and labor and the evangelical community and many Democrats and many Republicans, that does not mean that it will actually get done," he said. "This is Washington after all."
WASHINGTON — A push to bring immigration legislation to the House floor, led by an unusual coalition of business executives, prominent conservatives and evangelical leaders, threatens to create another schism in the Republican Party and could have a noticeable effect on campaign contributions before the midterm elections.Several Republican executives and donors who are part of a lobbying blitz coming to Capitol Hill next week said they were considering withholding, or had already decided to withhold, future financial support to Republican lawmakers they believe are obstructing progress on immigration."I respect people's views and concerns about the fact that we have a situation in the United States where we have millions of undocumented immigrants," said Justin Sayfie, a lawyer from Florida who said he helped Mitt Romney raise more than $100,000 for his presidential campaign last year, in addition to helping other Republican candidates. "But we have what we have. This is October 2013. And the country will be better off if we fix it."Capitol Hill has for months been the focus of immigration advocates urging lawmakers to take up one of the four measures that have been approved by the Republican-led House Judiciary Committee. What is different about next week's lobbying effort is that it will include about 600 mostly conservative leaders in business, agriculture and religion who will focus on 80 representatives from 40 states — all of them Republican.The effort comes just weeks after House conservatives alienated many longtime supporters, including much of corporate America, by trying to block financing for Mr. Obama's health care law, a move widely blamed for the government shutdown. The intraparty tension that was apparent in the budget standoff could resurface in the immigration fight, though the sides may not align in exactly the same way.Sponsors of next week's event include the U.S. Chamber of Commerce; the National Immigration Forum; FWD.us, a political action group set up by Silicon Valley executives including Mark Zuckerberg, the founder of Facebook; and the Partnership for a New American Economy, which is led jointly by Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York, Rupert Murdoch and Bill Marriott Jr.Pushing back against the pressure to act from within their own party, a core group of conservatives said in interviews this week that they would not be intimidated by corporate America or other outside parties, even though in this case that includes farmers, evangelical leaders and some prominent conservatives."I care about the sovereignty of the United States of America and what it stands for, and not an open-door policy," said Representative Ted Yoho, Republican of Florida, who is one of several conservatives opposing all of the bills the House is currently considering.Though House Republican leaders — including Speaker John A. Boehner of Ohio and Representative Eric Cantor of Virginia, the majority leader — have expressed support for moving on their own immigration measure this year, given that the Senate has already passed a comprehensive bill, the prospect for any legislation before year's end is uncertain.There is intense division within the party over the proposals under consideration, and some hard-line conservative members have made it clear that they have no interest in advancing a key part of Mr. Obama's agenda.Even some who support a measure to increase border security say they would not vote for such a bill, fearing that it could become a vehicle to grant citizenship to an estimated 11 million immigrants in the United States illegally."We have seen the character of this president, and the way that he does business," said Representative Steve King, Republican of Iowa, explaining why he would oppose any measure.Looking to restart discussion on immigration after months when it was overshadowed by foreign policy crises and the budget dispute, Mr. Obama spoke at the White House on Thursday and said Democrats and Republicans in the House must unite to pass an immigration package."Everybody wins here if we work together to get this done," the president said.
WASHINGTON — For the business group from Utah, the lobbying blitz started well before their plane touched down in the nation's capital.Heading to Washington to spend Tuesday urging House Republicans to take up a broad immigration overhaul, the team of Utah business leaders buttonholed several members of their state's congressional delegation — Senators Orrin Hatch and Mike Lee, both Republicans, and Representatives Jim Matheson, a Democrat, and Chris Stewart, a Republican — as the lawmakers waited to board their flight Monday at the Salt Lake City airport."Our plea is to act now, do it now, lead," Stan Lockhart, a former chairman of the Utah Republican Party, said Tuesday in an interview as he explained the group's basic pitch. "Ask House leadership to lead, and let's pass what's possible now."Randy Parker, chief executive of the Utah Farm Bureau Federation, chimed in: "They need to act now. That's the bottom line."Mr. Lockhart and Mr. Parker are part of an unlikely coalition of business executives, evangelical groups and prominent conservatives coming together to urge House Republicans to put broad immigration legislation on the House floor, ideally before the end of this year.On Tuesday, the group of more than 600 leaders from roughly 40 states descended on the Capitol for meetings with nearly 150 Republican lawmakers. They are largely taking aim at House Republicans who they think could support a broad immigration overhaul, including some sort of legal status for the 11 million immigrants in the country illegally. The leaders are urging the lawmakers to take a more proactive role in pushing immigration legislation to a House vote."Our fly-in today is about moving votes on the Hill in support of reasonable immigration reform," Randel K. Johnson, the U.S. Chamber of Commerce's senior vice president for immigration and labor issues, said in a conference call with reporters. "I'm confident we're going to move the ball forward."The event's sponsors include the Chamber of Commerce; FWD.us, a political action group founded by Mark Zuckerberg, the creator of Facebook; the National Immigration Forum; and the Partnership for a New American Economy, which is led by Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York, Rupert Murdoch and Bill Marriott Jr.The effort kicked off in the morning with several panel discussions at the Chamber of Commerce, including one conversation in which the Bipartisan Policy Center, a nonprofit based in Washington, unveiled a new study that found a broad immigration overhaul would help the economy.Advocates then boarded buses to the Capitol. Members of the group from Utah said that while they believed most of their House lawmakers were largely supportive of at least some form of an immigration overhaul, their goal was to persuade them to get out in front on the issue."It's one thing to be with us," said Todd Bingham, president of the Utah Manufacturers Association. "It's another to lead out and actually create dialogue and create discussion and tell leadership in the House that we're not interested in waiting two years — we need to address this now."The push comes as conflicting messages continue to emerge from the immigration debate on Capitol Hill.Senator Marco Rubio, Republican of Florida and an author of the Senate-passed immigration bill that includes a path to citizenship for those immigrants already in the country illegally, seemed to backpedal slightly on Saturday. His spokesman told Breitbart News, a conservative news outlet, that House conservatives should not fall for a "ruse" that could lead to one of their more narrow, piecemeal immigration bills being used as vehicle to enter a conference negotiation between the House and the Senate, from which a broader immigration bill could emerge."On the surface, the statement didn't read well," said Alberto R. Cardenas, chairman of the American Conservative Union, when asked about Mr. Rubio's comments. "But maybe a good explanation from him will be persuasive, so I'm going to hold judgment."Alex Conant, a spokesman for Mr. Rubio, said that the senator was not backing away from his support for the Senate bill, but simply reflecting the political reality in the Republican-controlled House, where many conservatives refuse to support any immigration bill because they fear it could be used as a "Trojan horse" and lead to amnesty."An 'all or nothing' strategy on immigration reform would result in nothing," Mr. Conant said in a statement. "What is keeping us from progress on a series of immigration issues on which there is strong consensus is the fear that a conference committee on a limited bill will be used to negotiate a comprehensive one. We should take that option off the table so that we can begin to move on the things we agree on."Meanwhile, the group of business leaders from Utah remained intensely focused on their congressional delegation. Though they had scheduled meetings with only the four Utah House members, they were hoping to see Mr. Lee, their senator, who won election in 2010 with strong Tea Party support and has remained hesitant to support an immigration overhaul that he considers "amnesty."At roughly 11 a.m., good news arrived in the form of a text message: Mr. Lee would meet with them."Whatever is causing this issue to be stopped — whether it's compromise, whether it's breaking it into pieces — whatever is happening that's blocking him from taking up a banner and being a leader on this, we want him to get over the barriers," said Donna Milakovic, the executive vice president of the Utah Valley Chamber of Commerce.
Infosys, the giant Indian technology outsourcing company, has agreed to pay $34 million in a civil settlement after federal prosecutors in Texas found it had committed "systemic visa fraud and abuse" when bringing temporary workers from India for jobs in American businesses, according to court documents and officials familiar with the case. The payment is the largest ever in a visa case.After an investigation of more than two years, prosecutors on Wednesday will unveil the settlement as well as its accusations that Infosys "knowingly and unlawfully" brought Indian workers into the United States on business visitor visas since 2008, which avoided the higher costs and delays of a longer-term employment visa the workers should have had. They will charge that Infosys systematically submitted misleading information to American immigration authorities and consular officials to obtain the faster visas, unfairly gaining a competitive edge and undercutting American workers qualified for the jobs.Federal investigators also found extensive omissions and errors in the hiring records Infosys was required to keep for its employees, which could have allowed thousands of Indians to continue working in this country after their visas had expired, according to the documents.The lead prosecutor in the case, Shamoil Shipchandler, an assistant United States attorney in the Eastern District of Texas, said he could not comment on the settlement before a news conference scheduled for Wednesday in Plano, where Infosys has offices that handle its visa applications.Infosys has steadfastly denied any accusations of visa abuse and fought the case vigorously. "Those claims are untrue and only unproven assertions," the company said Tuesday in a statement. The company said its use of business visitor visas "was for legitimate business purposes and not in any way intended to circumvent the requirements" of the employment visa, which is known as H-1B.Infosys, which is based in Bangalore, said the resolution of the case was not yet completed. "Infosys' policy demands adherence to all laws, rules and regulations everywhere we operate and we continue to take our compliance obligations seriously," the statement said.The settlement is one of several setbacks in this country for Infosys, and could also affect other big Indian outsourcing companies that rely on the temporary H-1B employment visas to bring thousands of workers from India each year for technology contracts here. In a class-action lawsuit filed this year in Wisconsin, four American tech workers assert that Infosys broadly discriminates against Americans with its practice of employing mainly South Asians in the United States.The outcome in Texas is long-awaited relief to an American employee of Infosys, Jack B. Palmer. He spurred the federal investigation by bringing a whistle-blower lawsuit in Alabama in February 2011, saying that he had been punished and sidelined by Infosys executives after he reported witnessing widespread visa fraud. Since then, Mr. Palmer said by email, the case has continued to dominate his life. He has remained on the company's payroll while cooperating with a federal investigation that has ground slowly forward, but he has not been assigned any work or spoken with anyone at Infosys for many months."Despite the personal toll it took on me, it would have been much worse in the long run if I had turned the other cheek," Mr. Palmer said. "It was a question of right and wrong, following my conscience and following the law."Infosys strongly rejected Mr. Palmer's claims and fought his whistle-blower case, which was dismissed last year by a federal judge in Alabama.But the time Mr. Palmer has invested is likely to be worth it. Mr. Shipchandler and Mr. Palmer's lawyer, Kenneth Mendelsohn of Montgomery, Ala., declined to state a figure, but people familiar with the case said Mr. Palmer could receive as much as $5 million from the payment Infosys will make to the federal government, under a provision of federal false claims law.One of India's largest technology outsourcing companies, Infosys employs 160,000 people in 30 countries, including about 15,000 people in the United States.
WASHINGTON — Republicans are thankful for President Obama's health care law; it provides a respite from their bitter schisms.The government shutdown and the near-default were devastating for the party. If it takes a drubbing, as expected, in the Virginia gubernatorial race this week, there will be fresh recriminations.Looming is the immigration debate, which is even more divisive and politically perilous for Republicans. The House leadership is to decide in the next few weeks whether to take up piecemeal measures, with an eye toward an eventual resolution with a Senate-passed bill, or to scuttle the law.The party is as divided as the stakes are huge. Hundreds of conservative evangelicals and businesspeople were in Washington last week to lobby for a bill. This is unprecedented support from those quarters.But grass-roots activists and many right-wing politicians hate the Senate bill, which grants a pathway to citizenship for some undocumented immigrants. Its opponents argue that it's a Democratic scheme and a gift to Mr. Obama.This despite overwhelming evidence that the growing Hispanic and Asian-American electorates, as well as young voters, strongly support an immigration overhaul and are punishing Republicans at the polls. In an analysis of the 2012 elections, the Republican National Committee said that to attract more of the Hispanic vote, the party "must embrace and champion immigration reform."The House speaker, John A. Boehner of Ohio, and most other House Republican leaders understand this. They would like to bring up a number of popular measures like beefing up border security, requiring worker verification and perhaps even legalizing younger immigrants, and figure out later how to reconcile them with the Senate bill.The problem is the several dozen members in House who will vote against any measure, even those they support, suspecting that they could be falling into a trap leading to a deal with the Senate. The speaker needs Democratic votes to secure passage.But the House Democratic leader, Nancy Pelosi of California, who has a more unified caucus in support of immigration overhaul, will provide those votes only if the trap is real. Ms. Pelosi, the president and most Democrats insist on a comprehensive bill.Privately, Republicans are experimenting with different strategies, with Representative Paul Ryan of Wisconsin, the House Budget Committee chairman, in the forefront on the most controversial questions of legalization and citizenship. But the shutdown debacle has embittered some members and made them even less willing to be accommodating.Senator Marco Rubio of Florida, a conservative who played a leading role in the passage of the comprehensive bill in June, is emblematic of the divisiveness of the issue. His support for an overhaul has demonstrably hurt his presidential ambitions among rank-and-file Republicans.Some Republicans argue privately that even if immigration is a problem with voters nationally, it does not affect their hold on the House because most of the party's representatives are from safe districts. They ought to look at a recent study commissioned by the Campaign for Community Change. It is a left-wing group, but the data, based on demographic changes among Hispanics and Asian-Americans, suggest that, all things being equal, Republicans will lose more than a dozen seats in the next two elections because of the immigration issue alone.Frank Sharry, executive director of America's Voice and an advocate of immigration changes who has worked with Republicans and Democrats, shakes his head. "Every day, there is this relentless demographic change, and they act like nothing is happening," he said.One consideration is that the immigration debate can be postponed until next year, once Republican primaries are over; the calendar and election-year environment make that unlikely.That means that what the speaker and his lieutenants decide in the next few weeks could affect how Republicans fare in the next few decades.
Republicans in Congress studying the results from the governors' elections in New Jersey and Virginia on Tuesday see two starkly different test cases for how the party should move on immigration.In New Jersey, Gov. Chris Christie was boosted to a blowout victory by more than 20 points in part because he won half of Latino voters, while his Democratic rival, State Senator Barbara Buono, won 46 percent of those voters. According to exit polls, Mr. Christie improved his standing among Latinos by 18 percentage points over his first run for governor in 2009.In Virginia, the state's conservative attorney general, Kenneth T. Cuccinelli II, narrowly lost the race for governor he once seemed poised to win against Terry McAuliffe, a veteran Democratic fund-raiser, in part because Latino voters turned out in crucial urban areas and voted heavily against Mr. Cuccinelli.In both states, Latino voters said they were strongly influenced by the Republicans' positions on immigration."I think the national party is going to draw inspiration from what Christie did," said John Feehery, a Republican strategist. "The bigger lesson is you can't just go to Hispanic communities six months before an election and say, 'Hey, I need your vote,' " he said. "I think immigration reform fits into this."Republican leaders in the House of Representatives are facing growing pressure from a wide array of business, labor and religious groups to hold votes in coming weeks on immigration bills, including some measure to deal with 11.7 million immigrants here illegally. On Wednesday, the A.F.L.-C.I.O. announced it would spend more than $1 million in five districts over the next two weeks on television ads that sharply blame Republicans for the lack of immigration action in the House. In Chicago, about 150 demonstrators were arrested after they blocked a busy intersection calling for the House to hold a vote on the issue.Speaker John A. Boehner, Republican of Ohio, has said he is "hopeful" the House will act before the end of the year. But Republican leaders were waiting to see how the two governors' races would alter the landscape for their party.Mr. Christie's re-election, which lifted him to early presidential front-runner status, came after a campaign with ambitious outreach to Latinos, who were 9 percent of the voters on Tuesday. He had a full-time director for Hispanic outreach and started running ads in Spanish in May.Mr. Christie came into the race with a record on immigration that was strikingly at odds with the dominant views of his party. He has long supported a pathway to citizenship for illegal immigrants, which many Republicans oppose. During the campaign, he reversed himself, and said New Jersey should offer in-state college tuition rates to young undocumented immigrants, who call themselves Dreamers. For his efforts, Mr. Christie won the endorsement of the Latino Leadership Alliance of New Jersey, a major Hispanic organization."Now find another Republican in America who's won the Latino vote recently," Mr. Christie said Wednesday during a visit to the José Martí Freshman Academy in Union City, a Hispanic stronghold.   "You get in, you build relationships, you build trust, and then people are willing to give you a chance."In Virginia, where Latinos were only 4 percent of those who voted, Mr. Cuccinelli's campaign devoted little effort to those voters. He also had a record of forceful immigration positions. As a state senator in 2009, Mr. Cuccinelli sponsored a resolution urging Congress to amend the Constitution to deny citizenship to the children of illegal immigrants. He voted against an in-state tuition bill for Virginia.Mr. McAuliffe's campaign and People for the American Way, a liberal group supporting it, damaged Mr. Cuccinelli among Latinos with an ad casting a harsh light on an offhand comment he made in a radio interview in which he equated immigration policy with rat control.Mr. McAuliffe and several Latino organizations invested in turnout efforts, calculating that the Hispanic population in Virginia is growing astronomically, increasing more than 90 percent from 2000 to 2010. While the numbers of Latinos voting were too small for exit polling, they went heavily for Mr. McAuliffe, according to Gary M. Segura, the head of Latino Decisions, a polling organization, who conducted interviews with Hispanics on the eve of the election. Based on his data, Mr. Segura estimated that Latinos accounted for 35,000 out of about 55,000 votes in Mr. McAuliffe's slim margin of victory."I think this will be a booster shot," said Tamar Jacoby, a Republican who is president of ImmigrationWorksUSA, an organization of small businesses that advocates an immigration overhaul. She said that several top House leaders — Mr. Boehner, Eric Cantor, the majority leader, Representative Robert W. Goodlatte, chairman of the Judiciary Committee — have shown they are ready to take up immigration. Two of them, Mr. Cantor and Mr. Goodlatte, are from Virginia."The message is seeping in" among House Republicans about the strategic importance of Latinos, Ms. Jacoby said, "and this will help remind them."
A top Republican lawmaker told protesters he met with in his home district in California this week that the House of Representatives would not have time this year to vote on any immigration measure.Representative Kevin McCarthy, the majority whip, told demonstrators in his office in Bakersfield on Wednesday night that the 16 days remaining on the House calendar in 2013 were too short a window for the House to take up the complex issue. But he said he was committed to moving on immigration votes in the House next year.The comments were reported by Angelica Salas, the executive director of the Coalition for Humane Immigrant Rights of Los Angeles, who was one of the protesters who occupied Mr. McCarthy's office for 10 hours on Wednesday. Mr. McCarthy came to the office to speak with the protesters after 11 o'clock that night. His office confirmed the conversation on Friday evening.Mr. McCarthy's comments cemented what lawmakers were already broadly assuming on Capitol Hill. But they came after a week when an array of groups who want to see a broad immigration overhaul intensified protests across the country hoping to push Republican leaders to hold a vote before the end of the year.Another House Republican who is active on immigration said that despite the delay, he was not discouraged. That congressman, Mario Diaz-Balart of Florida, said he was working with other Republicans on a bill to strengthen border security and allow 11.7 million illegal immigrants in the country to "get right with the law." He said the measure could be ready early next year.On Friday, 12 women blocked a street for an hour outside the Racine, Wis., office of Representative Paul D. Ryan, a Republican.This week, advocates from a coalition of women's organizations blocked intersections or protested in offices of House Republican lawmakers in six other cities. Women were arrested at the state Republican Party headquarters in Bellevue, Wash., and in front of the Federal Building in Cleveland.On Thursday, another coalition that includes the A.F.L.-C.I.O. and the Service Employees International Union, two of the nation's largest labor organizations, announced a campaign focused on nine House Republicans, whose districts include significant numbers of Latino voters. They said they would call or visit thousands of voters in each district in coming days to press the message that the lawmakers had failed to advance an immigration bill."The bottom line is if the G.O.P. doesn't get right on immigration and win Latino voters, they will cease being a party that can win a national election," said Richard Trumka, president of the labor federation.Frustration is rising among advocates, after momentum they felt they had during a recess in August drifted away during the federal government shutdown and the fiscal battles this fall. In June, the Senate passed a broad bipartisan measure including a path to citizenship for immigrants here illegally. Advocates hoped for a vote in the House on a bill that could be paired with the Senate's. But tense divisions remain among House Republicans, with a core of conservatives rejecting any legalization for illegal immigrants as amnesty.In Bellevue on Thursday, more than 100 women entered the Republican Party offices, and some sat down, singing and chanting. The police arrested 33 women on charges of criminal trespassing."We wanted to tell the Republican leadership that inaction or a vote against immigration reform is hurting women and families," said Pramila Jayapal, a co-chairwoman of We Belong Together, the group organizing the event.On Friday, Kirby Wilbur, a former chairman of the Washington Republican Party, jumped into the debate on Twitter, saying the demonstrators were "left wing witches and hags" who "look so old and ugly."Republican leaders in the state quickly disavowed the tweet. "The ghost of Kirby Wilbur has no influence on the Washington State Republican Party," said Keith Schipper, a spokesman.Mr. Diaz-Balart, who also faced protesters this week, said the bill he is working on would not offer any special treatment or access to citizenship for illegal immigrants. He said he was trying to attract at least 117 Republican votes — a majority of the caucus — and Democratic support. He expected the House to pass at least a half dozen other measures. "I'm as optimistic as I've ever been about the chances of getting this done in this Congress," he said.
WASHINGTON — Signaling an end to the push for major immigration legislation this year, Speaker John A. Boehner on Wednesday ruled out negotiations between the House and the Senate on an expansive immigration overhaul similar to one approved by the Senate with bipartisan support in June.Speaking to reporters, Mr. Boehner said that while House Republicans were working on a "common-sense, step-by-step approach in terms of how we deal with immigration," they were unwilling to enter into talks with the Senate on a broad bill that would include a path to citizenship for the 11 million immigrants already in the country illegally."The idea that we're going to take up a 1,300-page bill that no one had ever read, which is what the Senate did, is not going to happen in the House," he said. "And frankly, I'll make clear we have no intention of ever going to conference on the Senate bill."With few legislative days left in 2013 and nearly all the focus on the health care law and House-Senate budget talks, Mr. Boehner said House Republicans had little interest in detouring on to immigration legislation that divides their party. His stance means the immigration fight would be pushed into 2014. If there was to be movement, it would probably have to come earlier in the year before the midterm elections get too close.But the speaker, in an encounter earlier Wednesday with two young immigrants without legal status, did indicate he continued to see immigration legislation as a priority. The pair, brought to the United States as children by their parents, approached him at Pete's Diner, his dawn breakfast haunt, to urge him to support a broad immigration overhaul."How would you feel if you had to tell your kids at the age of 10 that you were never coming home?" said Carmen Lima, a 17-year-old who explained that she had a similar conversation with her father, who was here illegally, at that age."I'm trying to find some way to get this thing done," Mr. Boehner told her. "It's, uh, as you know, not easy, not going to be an easy path forward. But I've made it clear since the day after the election it's time to get this done."The Republican-controlled House had already been working on a piecemeal approach to immigration legislation, in which it would take up individual — and more narrow — bills, like a measure to improve border security or to overhaul the guest worker program. An aide to Mr. Boehner said that he was not ruling out negotiations with the Senate on any immigration bill, but simply throwing water on the idea that the House would pass one or two smaller bills and then merge them in a conference committee with the Senate's larger plan.The speaker's comments also were intended to quell the concerns of some hard-line members who feared that supporting even a narrow border security bill could be used as a "Trojan horse" that would lead to the House's being forced to consider a larger, Senate-influenced bill that endorses what they consider "amnesty." Mr. Boehner's remarks came less than a week after another member of his leadership team, Representative Kevin McCarthy of California, the No. 3 Republican, said that the House would not have time before the end of the year to vote on any immigration legislation.Representative Steve Israel of New York, the chairman of the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee, said all he cared about was the final product. "The process is irrelevant," he said. "How John Boehner gets to a vote, and when he gets to a vote, is immaterial to us. We will help him with the vote, but he has to get something to the floor."As the immediate prospects for a bill dimmed, one of the leading Republican senators behind the effort criticized the administration's handling of border security. John McCain, Republican of Arizona, said at a confirmation hearing for Jeh C. Johnson, the nominee for secretary of the Department of Homeland Security, that the administration had refused to provide information on how it was policing the border.After Mr. Johnson stopped short of committing to provide the border data without consulting with homeland security officials, Mr. McCain said that he would not vote to confirm him until Mr. Johnson gave a "yes answer" to sharing the information."How can we carry out our functions of oversight if we don't get the kind of information we need to make the decisions that this committee to make?" Mr. McCain said.
He shook the hands of a group of Hispanic teenagers sitting in the front row, welcoming them like old friends. The teenagers, who had been brought to the country illegally by their parents as young children, had come the day before to lobby Mr. Tipton to support a broad immigration overhaul."You were there yesterday!" he said to one of the teenagers, who were dressed in red and had already attended several other events in his district. "Well, thanks for taking the time. Did you have a good drive?" He turned to another member of the group. "I have not got you to smile once," he said, offering a smile of his own, before moving to the front of the room to start his meeting.Mr. Tipton has come to know the immigration advocates in his district — and their issue — well. As House Republicans have all but ruled out the possibility of passing any sweeping legislation before the end of the year, immigration advocates are operating with an increased sense of urgency. Their goal is to pressure lawmakers like Mr. Tipton to support an overhaul, creating a call for action from Republican House members that they hope Speaker John A. Boehner and his leadership team will find impossible to ignore.But persuading Mr. Tipton, a two-term lawmaker who rode into office on the Tea Party wave in 2010, to support any broad immigration legislation will be a tough sell.In an interview at his Pueblo office, he said he was "calling for immigration reform a long time ago," but has yet to make up his mind on the crux of the debate: what to do with the 11 million immigrants already in the country illegally."We've got some that were looking for a better life, but they broke the laws to this country," he said. "That can't be without penalty."Mr. Tipton has shown some willingness to compromise on the question of the young undocumented immigrants, known as Dreamers, who were brought here by their parents as young children. He said he would handle their plight "compassionately."Democrats, perhaps optimistically, hope to get Mr. Tipton to sign on to the broad bill they recently introduced, which includes a path to citizenship for the 11 million undocumented immigrants already in the country. Immigration advocacy groups hope to show him that there could be political consequences if he does not take steps to help overhaul the nation's immigration system.According to the most recent census, Mr. Tipton's district, which covers nearly the entire western half of the state as well as part of its southern border with New Mexico, is 24 percent Hispanic. Combined with the large agricultural businesses on the Western Slope, the demographic forces alone would seem to compel Mr. Tipton to support some form of immigration overhaul. President Obama won the state narrowly in both 2008 and 2012, and Mr. Tipton won re-election last year with 53 percent of the vote.This month, a coalition of immigration advocates, as well as labor and religious groups, inaugurated the "Cost of Inaction," a voter education and outreach campaign that targets nine House Republicans, Mr. Tipton included, to push for a vote on an immigration overhaul before the end of the year. Though the Senate passed its own broad immigration bill in June with bipartisan support, immigration advocates have become increasingly frustrated with the House, which has made little progress on legislation of its own and is unlikely to take a vote this year."We feel that to move them, we have to awaken the electoral vulnerability that Republicans face, both specific Republicans that have large and growing immigrant electorates and also the party as a national party," said Tom Snyder, the immigration campaign director for the A.F.L.-C.I.O., one of the groups behind the campaign. "It's very hard to think about them winning a presidential election with an immigrant electorate that's growing and overwhelmingly hostile to the party."
A consistent and solid majority of Americans — 63 percent — crossing party and religious lines favors legislation to create a pathway to citizenship for immigrants living in the United States illegally, while only 14 percent support legal residency with no option for citizenship, according a report published Monday by the nonpartisan Public Religion Research Institute.Those surveyed expressed strong support for citizenship for 11.7 million immigrants in the country without documents just as Congress appears to be shifting away from that approach, with Republican leaders in the House working on measures that would offer legal status without a direct path to naturalization.Sixty percent of Republicans, 57 percent of independents and 73 percent of Democrats favor a pathway to citizenship, according to the report. Majorities of Protestants, Catholics and Americans with no religious affiliation also support that plan.The institute found that there is slightly less support for limiting the immigrants to legal residency than there is for a tough enforcement strategy of identifying and deporting them, a policy favored by 18 percent.The report is based on results from four national surveys, one in Ohio and focus groups in Arizona, Florida and Ohio. It compares results from a national poll in March with a similar bilingual telephone survey that was conducted nationwide in English and Spanish from Nov. 6 to 10 among 1,005 adults, with a margin of sampling error of plus or minus three percentage points. The nonprofit research institute conducts surveys on public policy issues and religious values.Support for citizenship has not changed significantly since March, the institute found.The group drilled down into that issue, creating subgroups for the November survey who were asked questions with differing levels of detail about the requirements immigrants should have to meet to become citizens. When there was no mention of requirements, 59 percent supported an option for citizenship. When the question specified that immigrants would have to pay back taxes, learn English and pass background checks, support increased to 71 percent.The requirements were "most important for Republicans," the report said. When the question did not mention requirements, only about four in 10 Republicans supported citizenship. When the requirements were described in more detail, Republican support increased to 62 percent.In June, the Senate passed a broad bipartisan bill with a 13-year pathway to citizenship that includes the hurdles mentioned in the poll: paying back taxes and passing English tests and criminal background checks. House leaders have said they will not take up that measure, but will address immigration issues in smaller bills. Several House Republican leaders have said they are drafting measures that would provide "lawful status" for many unauthorized immigrants but no "special path" to citizenship.According to the report, nearly seven in 10 Americans believe the 13-year wait for citizenship under the Senate bill is too long, while 24 percent said it was just right.The institute found that Americans living in Ohio — the home state of Speaker John A. Boehner, a Republican — are significantly more likely than those in Arizona and Florida to say "things have gotten worse" in the country over all and to hold negative views of immigrants. Nevertheless, the surveys found similarly broad agreement in all three states on a pathway to citizenship, with 60 percent of Ohio residents favoring that approach.Nearly two-thirds of Americans — 65 percent — say the United States' immigration system is either completely or mostly broken. Those who say it is "completely broken" have increased to 34 percent from 23 percent in March, according to the report.
Obama Speaks About Immigration Overhaul: President Obama made the case for changes in immigration policy in a speech in San Francisco during which a man heckled him. The confrontation began 21 minutes and 18 seconds into the speech.SAN FRANCISCO — President Obama is often heckled, but it is rare for a guest who is part of a White House-approved backdrop to shout out a protest while the president is in mid-speech.But that is what happened here on Monday when Mr. Obama called on Congress to pass an overhaul of the nation's immigration laws."Mr. Obama, my family has been separated for 19 months now!" yelled a young man who stood with others on the riser behind the president at the Betty Ann Ong Chinese Recreation Center.Mr. Obama continued to speak, but the man did not let up. "You have a power to stop deportation for all undocumented immigrants in this country," he said.The president turned to address him. "Actually, I don't," he said. "And that's why we're here."As the event's organizers tried to remove the man, Mr. Obama signaled no. "I respect the passion of these young people because they feel deeply about the concerns for their families," he said. But, he continued, the United States is a nation of laws, and "it is not simply a matter of us just saying we're going to violate the law."In his remarks, Mr. Obama reiterated his support for an immigration overhaul split into multiple pieces of legislation, as House Republicans have proposed."We can carve that bird if you want," said Mr. Obama, who will pardon a Thanksgiving turkey on Wednesday after he returns to Washington. "Drumstick here, breast meat there — as long as all the pieces get done soon."His acceptance of a piecemeal approach is part of an effort to keep immigration legislation alive after House Republican leaders made it clear they would not accept the broad framework of the bipartisan bill the Senate passed this year. They compared that measure to Mr. Obama's health care law, saying it was another unwieldy federal program full of hidden mandates and poorly understood provisions.But some in the Republican Party are warning their colleagues to express their objections carefully, and not just for fear of alienating Latino voters.Asia has passed Latin America in recent years as the largest source of immigrants to the United States. "On the national level, at least on the presidential, you've seen throughout the years more and more support for the Democratic Party," said Christine Chen, the executive director of the nonpartisan group Asian and Pacific Islander American Vote. But "even a month before the election, 30 percent of our electorate that was polled was actually undecided."Shawn Steel, a Republican committeeman from California who has pressed his party to reach out to Asian-American voters, said that many Asians were trapped in a bureaucratic backlog even though "they followed the rules, they paid the fees, they had the interviews.""Largely because of the inefficient immigration policy, they are being denied an expedited hearing," Mr. Steel said. He argued that an "aggressive amnesty" would give a "special favoritism to those that did not wait in line," which would be unfair to many Asians.The broad bipartisan bill that passed the Senate in June offers major benefits for Asian immigrants but also includes provisions that could reduce future immigration from some Asian countries.The bill would eliminate the cap on the number of residency visas, known as green cards, available each year for spouses and children of legal permanent residents, a group that includes many Asian immigrants. It would also eliminate within 10 years the current backlog of more than four million foreigners who applied through legal channels and have been waiting, in many cases for a decade or more, for green cards. Under those terms, foreigners who had been waiting the longest for family and employment green cards, including many Asians, could receive their visas quickly.But the bill would also eliminate categories of green cards for siblings of United States citizens and for married sons or daughters of citizens who are over 31 years old. Many Asian immigrants have applied through those categories, and Asian-American groups opposed those provisions.The young man at the immigration event was not the only one asking Mr. Obama to make changes unilaterally. At the first of two events for Democratic Party contributors in San Francisco, a man repeatedly yelled "executive order" as the president discussed impediments to his agenda.
AUSTIN, Tex. — The meeting began, as so many in middle-school auditoriums do, uncomfortably. Parents squeezed into chairs fit for 12-year-old knees. The speaker's first question fell flat."Estamos listos a aprender mucho?" repeated Montserrat Garibay, an official with the local teachers' union. Are we ready to learn a lot?The response — "Si!" — sounded more convincing the second time around. So Ms. Garibay, 34, dressed in jeans and a T-shirt that said "My Dream is Our Dream," pressed ahead with her presentation. For the next several hours, she led a step-by-step workshop on navigating the country's immigration laws, with a focus on President Obama's pledge to let certain undocumented minors remain in the country.At a time when Latinos have surpassed whites to account for a majority of public school students in Texas, Ms. Garibay is taking an unusually direct approach to one of the most deeply entrenched challenges in education: the achievement gap in test scores and low graduation rates that are plaguing schools disproportionately populated by the children of immigrants.By focusing her seminar on helping families and children navigate the bureaucracy of the immigration system, Ms. Garibay is hoping to help schools close their achievement gaps with others."I knew firsthand what the families were going through," she said in an interview. "And I just needed to do something."Awareness campaigns like Ms. Garibay's can accomplish only so much. In Washington, an immigration overhaul has been shelved for the year. Texas lawmakers have only partly reversed billions of dollars of cuts in education financing. Still, Ms. Garibay and some of her peers emphasize the potential for helping individual families, communities and schools."We know what has happened in our classrooms, the changing demographics of our students," said Rita Haecker, the president of the Texas State Teachers Association, with 65,000 members. The seminar, she said, "is going to help all of us in the future."In Texas, Ms. Garibay's message has found a ready audience. For many of the parents who attend her workshops, deportation remains the most acute fear, but their children face other pressures. Many are expected to bring home a paycheck as well as, or instead of, good grades. And they know all too well the limited value of a diploma without a Social Security number to match."I've been on both sides," Ms. Garibay said. "It's not easy."Born in Mexico City, Ms. Garibay and her sister crossed the border as children with their mother, who was fleeing an abusive husband. The girls spoke no English. They stayed with an aunt in Texas, assuming the visit would be temporary until their mother took a job as a maid in a nursing home. Ms. Garibay learned English well enough to pass the state standardized tests in two years."She had that deep desire," recalls her first teacher, Chris Hernandez. After high school, Ms. Garibay returned to Mexico, where she studied at the University of Guanajuato. For those two years, she was unable to return to the United States to see her mother and sister. Eventually, she secured a tourist visa, enrolled at a community college in Austin and then earned a degree from the University of Texas.Her path from undocumented child immigrant to permanent resident to visa holder to citizen took two decades. Her sister, who at 33 is too old to qualify for the amnesty program known as Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals, is still working to attain citizenship."I don't take anything for granted," Ms. Garibay said.When she started teaching pre-kindergarten, the connections between education and immigration policy soon emerged on the playground. One day, she recalled, a boy ran to hide under a slide when a police car passed, yelling, "La migra!""It was just a police car," Ms. Garibay said. "This 4-year-old kid shouldn't have to be scared. I started wondering, 'What could we do as teachers to help the families?' I knew I had to do something, because I've lived it."Using a $5,000 grant from the National Education Association, she held one of her first workshops last summer at Mendez Middle School in southeast Austin, where 35 percent of the students speak little to no English. She expected some apprehension. A few years ago, federal immigration enforcement agents had conducted raids in the neighborhood. The sign flashing in front of the school — "Foro Comunitario de Inmigración," or Community Immigration Forum — called for a leap of faith from residents to get involved without being afraid of repercussions.About 100 families showed up, attending workshops on citizenship and civil rights. The turnout, which Ms. Garibay said was disappointing, underscored the limitations of her campaign."The jury's certainly still out," said Margie McHugh, a researcher at the Migration Policy Institute, a research organization in Washington. "It's not going to be easy to help all these young people make their way through."Since then, Ms. Garibay's efforts have started to gain the attention of national union leaders. In a speech in October, Randi Weingarten, the president of the American Federation of Teachers, singled out Ms. Garibay as someone who "sees the impact on children and families with heartbreaking frequency."In January, Ms. Garibay will take an at-large position on the Democratic National Committee. For now, she is planning her next workshop, with a goal of producing 300 citizenship applications."It's not all about academics," she said. "If you don't take care of the social and emotional part of our students, it doesn't matter how much money you put into it."
WASHINGTON — A longtime labor leader and two other advocates of an immigration overhaul ended their water-only fasts on Tuesday in a tent on the National Mall, the 22nd day of an effort to press the House to take up legislation on the issue.In a ceremony choreographed to evoke the civil rights and farmworker movements of the 1960s, the labor leader, Eliseo Medina, 67, took a bite of bread and a sip of apple juice. Looking tired, Mr. Medina did not speak during the event. Afterward, he rose and walked away, leaning on the arm of another advocate.Mr. Medina, a senior official in the Service Employees International Union, made a symbolic handoff to Representative Joseph P. Kennedy III, Democrat of Massachusetts, who said he would fast for 24 hours. The scene was reminiscent of the end of a 25-day fast in 1968 by Cesar Chavez of the United Farm Workers, who received his first food from Senator Robert F. Kennedy, Representative Kennedy's grandfather.About a dozen Democratic lawmakers were on hand Tuesday to show support, including the House minority leader, Nancy Pelosi of California, and Representative Steny H. Hoyer of Maryland. Labor Secretary Thomas E. Perez also attended.Cristian Avila, 23, a student from Arizona, and Dae Joong Yoon, 43, the executive director of a Korean immigrant organization in Los Angeles, also ended their fasts. Lisa Sharon Harper of Sojourners, a religious group, ended a three-week fast in which she had been drinking juice.In a statement, the activists said they had "succeeded in raising awareness about families being ripped apart by deportation." But they acknowledged that the protest had not produced any action in the House. They said Speaker John A. Boehner of Ohio had not responded to invitations to meet with them.Mr. Boehner's office said Tuesday that the speaker had hired Rebecca Tallent, the immigration policy director of the Bipartisan Policy Center, to handle immigration issues. Although House Republican leaders have said there is not enough time to move forward on immigration before the end of the year, Mr. Boehner's choice of Ms. Tallent appeared to signal that he planned House action in 2014.Mr. Boehner "remains hopeful" about immigration legislation, his spokesman, Michael Steel, said Tuesday. "Our House committees are going to continue their work to make progress on that goal," Mr. Steel said.Ms. Tallent is a former chief of staff for Senator John McCain, the Arizona Republican who was an author of a broad immigration bill that passed the Senate this year. Mr. Boehner has said the House will not consider the Senate bill.But the Bipartisan Policy Center, a research group in Washington, has mobilized Republicans like Jeb Bush of Florida and Haley Barbour of Mississippi, both former governors, to support immigration legislation that includes legal status for immigrants here illegally. Ms. Tallent has criticized immigration advocates like the ones who fasted for adopting tactics that she says are not persuasive to conservative Republicans.Also on Tuesday, seven other advocates in Washington began what they said would be longer fasts, while Rudy Lopez, an immigration activist in his 13th day of fasting, said he would continue. Activists in California said they would start a two-week fast and vigil at the offices in Bakersfield of Representative Kevin McCarthy, the No. 3 House Republican.
LOS ANGELES — The dance plays out daily in MacArthur Park, Boyle Heights, South Los Angeles and elsewhere across this sprawling metropolis: A lone police car rolls slowly past a popular corner, sending dozens of street vendors scrambling for cover, pushing tamale carts around corners and into the doorways of nearby shops.But decades of police crackdowns have failed to curb this enormous illegal market. When the police vanish, the vendors move back into place, hawking sliced mangoes, DVDs, flowers, bicycles and more.So now, Los Angeles officials are preparing to embark on a very different strategy: embracing street vending.A plan introduced last month in the City Council would legalize and regulate vendors, opening the door to the mouthwatering prospect of pork cheek street tacos that have the blessings of the county Health Department."Street vending is a fact of life around here," said Jose Huizar, the city councilman behind the plan to legalize street food. "Los Angeles is good at some things, but we are behind the ball on others. We need regulations. The way it works right now, everyone loses."New York, Dallas and Seattle have already passed laws regulating street vending. But despite the ubiquity of "danger dogs," the bacon-wrapped hot dogs that sizzle on sidewalk griddles outside Lakers games and concert venues, almost all street vending has remained entirely illegal here. (Food trucks, which have running water and other amenities, are legal and tightly regulated.)Over the last several years, vendors — a huge portion of them immigrants from Latin America, many in the country illegally — have waged their most aggressive campaign yet for legal status on the city's streets, modeling their effort on the national push to overhaul immigration laws.As a result, the fight to legalize sidewalk peddlers goes beyond questions of commerce, offering a window on the larger debate about the place of immigrants in American culture.Opposition to legalizing street vending remains fierce in some quarters of the city, where residents complain of blocked sidewalks, potentially unsafe food and streets littered with trash; some restaurant owners gripe that sidewalk businesses poach their customers."I teach my kids to wash their hands before they eat," said Bob Richardson, a resident of East Rancho Dominguez, an unincorporated part of Los Angeles County adjacent to Los Angeles, where street vending has become more common in recent years. "I don't know what those people do before they serve the food. I believe it's unsafe, and it should be outlawed."But the current efforts to legalize street vending is evidence of a shift in attitudes toward immigrants — and street food — here in the two decades since the last major push to legalize street vending two decades ago amid an anti-immigrant fervor in the state.These days, food aficionados and Pulitzer Prize-winning critics debate which stand serves the best $1 tacos al pastor."For a long time in Los Angeles, the feeling was that street vending was a third world activity, not worthy of the Anglo version of Los Angeles that emerged in the mid-20th century," said Mark Vallianatos, an instructor of urban and environmental policy at Occidental College here, who has been part of the campaign to legalize street vending.But Latinos now make up about half of the city's population, and an estimated one in 10 residents of Los Angeles County are immigrants in the country illegally. Mayors past and present have called vigorously for federal immigration reform, and the police chief has publicized policy changes intended to reduce deportations of illegal immigrants arrested for minor crimes."Now, being pro-immigrant is a winner in L.A.," Mr. Vallianatos said. "Street food has become hip and popular all over the city, not just with low-income Latinos. People are starting to see it as part of what makes our city great."The vendors have tried to frame their struggle as a fight for human dignity, drawing connections with the fight for an immigration overhaul.Backed by some of the same groups involved in that effort, like the Coalition for Humane Immigrant Rights of Los Angeles, they are invoking the same narrative of hardworking people who want to be able to support their families without fear of random arrests and deportation."We are just trying to make a living," said Guadalupe Becerril, an unauthorized immigrant, as she sold crepes and pancakes on the patch of East Los Angeles sidewalk that her cart has occupied for 10 years.Though Ms. Becerril said she has not been arrested, the police broke up the popular unlicensed street market where she used to work and have confiscated her entire business multiple times, she said."My dream is that they will let us be here legally," Ms. Becerril said.
WASHINGTON — White House officials on Thursday abruptly changed their story about whether President Obama had ever met his father's half brother, a Boston man who faced deportation to Kenya after a drunken-driving arrest in 2011.Two years ago, White House officials told The Boston Globe that the president had never met Onyango Obama, known as Omar, Mr. Obama's uncle. But Jay Carney, the White House press secretary, said Thursday that the 2011 statement was incorrect. In fact, the two men lived together briefly while the president was a student at Harvard Law, Mr. Carney said.The president "had met Omar Obama when he moved to Cambridge for law school," Mr. Carney said, and "he stayed with him for a brief period of time until the president's apartment was ready."Mr. Carney added: "After that, they saw each other once every few months while the president was in Cambridge, and then, after law school, they gradually fell out of touch. The president has not seen Omar Obama in 20 years and has not spoken with him in roughly 10 years."White House officials explained the abrupt change in the story by saying that no one asked the president in 2011 whether he knew his uncle. Instead, Mr. Carney told reporters that White House officials then had simply relied upon the president's own books and the public record to determine that they had never met."Back when this arose, folks looked at the record, including the president's book, and there was no evidence that they had met," Mr. Carney said. "That was what was conveyed. Nobody spoke to the president."Mr. Carney said that he decided to ask the president about the issue directly in the last several days after Omar Obama asserted during a deportation hearing that he had briefly lived with his famous nephew."When Omar Obama said the other day, and there were reports that he had said the other day, that President Obama, back when he was a law school student, had stayed with him in Cambridge, I thought it was the right thing to do to go ask him," Mr. Carney said. "Nobody had asked him in the past."That answer was quickly mocked by conservatives on Thursday. The Drudge Report, a conservative news website, called it a presidential "flip-flop."Questions about the relationship between the two men arose after Omar Obama's arrest and subsequent deportation proceedings in 2011, when The Globe reported that he had told the police, "I think I will call the White House." The White House said at the time that no administration official had or would take any action in the cases.Mr. Carney repeated that assertion on Thursday, saying that there had been "absolutely zero interference" by the White House in Omar Obama's case. On Tuesday, a judge in Boston ruled that Omar Obama could stay in the United States and apply for eventual citizenship after he testified that he had lived in the country for 50 years, paid income tax and been arrested only once.
The Obama administration deported 368,644 foreigners during the 2013 fiscal year, immigration enforcement officials reported on Thursday, 10 percent fewer than in 2012 but nonetheless bringing the total number deported under President Obama to more than 1.9 million, by far the most for an American president.The officials said 98 percent of those deported fit into one or more of the priority categories set by Immigration and Customs Enforcement: convicted criminals, national security risks, serious immigration offenders and recent border crossers.According to the agency's report, 59 percent had been convicted of a crime, a slight increase from last year. Among those, nearly three-quarters had committed serious offenses, the officials said.John Sandweg, the acting director of the immigration agency, said on a conference call with reporters that the percentage of serious offenders deported was a record high, a result he credited to a multiyear effort and "a strong and focused immigration strategy."The annual figures will provide fuel for all sides in the immigration debate.Many Republicans have argued that Mr. Obama has weakened immigration enforcement, and they can now point to the decline in deportations since last year.Advocates for immigrants said on Thursday that the total number deported under Mr. Obama bolstered their demand for him to do more to slow deportations."President Obama is on pace to break the two million deportations record any day now," said Angelica Salas, the executive director of the Coalition for Humane Immigrant Rights of Los Angeles. The decrease this year was "a drop in the bucket," Ms. Salas said. "Only a much larger drop would be significant."For the first time this year, the immigration agency broke down the statistics to show that about two-thirds of deportees were arrested as they tried to cross the border illegally, and about one-third were arrested inside the country.Among those detained away from the borders, 82 percent had been convicted of a crime, a record share, the officials said.Mr. Sandweg said the high percentage of criminals helped explain the decrease in deportations over all. He said many of those cases had to pass through immigration courts, which are notoriously clogged, and took more time. A growing number of the recent border crossers deported were not from Mexico, Mr. Sandweg said, adding that those cases are more time consuming.The Obama administration's deportations caused wide concern among Latinos, according to a national survey published on Thursday by the Pew Research Center Hispanic Trends Project, a nonpartisan group in Washington.About six in 10 Hispanics who were foreign born and 46 percent of all Hispanics said they worry "a lot" or "some" that they, a family member or a close friend could be deported, the survey found.Hispanics said legislation that would provide protection from deportation was more important for unauthorized immigrants than a path to United States citizenship, the survey found. Among all Hispanics surveyed, 55 percent said deportation relief was more important, while 35 percent said it was more important to have a chance at citizenship. Among Hispanic immigrants, the poll found, protection from deportation was more important than citizenship, by 61 percent to 27 percent.The Pew survey was conducted by landline and cellular telephones, in English and Spanish, from Oct. 16 to Nov. 3. Its margin of error was plus or minus 5 percentage points.
NEW ORLEANS — Karen Sandoval's promising life in this city fell apart in one day last summer when she went to buy school supplies for her two daughters.Ms. Sandoval, a Honduran immigrant here illegally, was riding with the man her girls have always called their father. Immigration agents, seeing a dilapidated car, pulled them over. They released Ms. Sandoval but detained her partner, a Nicaraguan also here illegally, and he was soon deported.Now Ms. Sandoval, 28, is grieving her loss and scrambling to support her children without her partner, Enrique Morales, and the income from his thriving flooring business. She sees no future for the girls, who are both American citizens, in her home country or his. So Ms. Sandoval is facing the possibility that she may never see Mr. Morales again."It is very difficult to explain to two little girls that Daddy will not be with us anymore," Ms. Sandoval said.Since taking office, President Obama has deported more than 1.9 million foreigners, immigration officials announced last week, a record for an American president. The officials said they focused on removing criminals, serious immigration offenders and recent border crossers, with 98 percent of deportees in 2013 in those groups, while sparing workers and their families. Mr. Obama is also pressing for an overhaul of immigration laws with a path to citizenship for those here illegally.But immigrant leaders say the enforcement has a broad impact on their communities, with deportations still separating bread-winning parents from children and unauthorized immigrants from family members here legally, including American citizens.Administration officials say the deportation numbers — more than 368,000 this fiscal year — are driven by a congressional requirement that more than 30,000 immigrants be detained daily. They acknowledge that the lines are becoming harder to draw between high-priority violators and those with strong family ties.For immigrants, the steady deportations have compounded their frustration with Congress, where the House took no action this year after the Senate passed a bipartisan overhaul bill in June. Increasingly advocates are turning their pressure on the president, saying he should use his executive powers to halt removals.A 24-year-old South Korean, Ju Hong, brought attention to those demands when he repeatedly interrupted Mr. Obama during a speech in San Francisco last month, calling on him to stop deportations of all unauthorized immigrants in the country. In recent days, anti-deportation protesters blocked entrances to immigration detention centers in southwestern Ohio, Northern Virginia and downtown Los Angeles, with more than two dozen people arrested.In New Orleans, street sweeps by Immigration and Customs Enforcement agents this year also led to a protest. On Nov. 14, nearly two dozen demonstrators, including 14 immigrants without legal status, tied up midday traffic at one of the city's busiest intersections for nearly three hours until the local police arrested them."Our people feel they can't go to the store to buy food or walk their children to school," said Santos Alvarado, 51, a Honduran construction worker who joined the protest here even though he has legal papers. "We couldn't be quiet any longer."Many immigrants here have been stunned by the arrests, in which some people seemed to be stopped based solely on their Latino appearance, because they had been living here uneventfully since they came in the chaotic days after Hurricane Katrina in 2005 to work on reconstruction.One of those workers, Jimmy Barraza, was unloading a carful of groceries on Aug. 16 when agents pulled up with pistols drawn, handcuffing him as well as his teenage son, a United States citizen. A mobile fingerprint check of Mr. Barraza, who is also Honduran, revealed an old court order for his deportation.Mr. Barraza, 28, won release from detention but is still fighting to remain. His wife is a longtime legal immigrant, and he has two other younger children who are American citizens."If they deport me," he said, "who will keep my son in line? Who will support my family?"
